"I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office of
(except on a question of Adjournment) House of Representatives may be necessary
(not exceeding ten Miles square) as may, by Cession of particular States, and
(or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office of "I do solemnly swear
(Sundays any Bill shall not be returned by the President within ten Days
(when the Legislature Application of the Legislature, or of the Executive
- President and deputy from Virginia George Washington
- John Langdon, Nicholas Gilman New Hampshire
- Nathaniel Gorham, Rufus King Massachusetts
- William Samuel Johnson, Roger Sherman Connecticut
- Alexander Hamilton New York
- William Livingston, David Brearley, William Paterson, Jonathan New Jersey
- Benjamin Franklin, Thomas Mifflin, Robert Morris, George Clymer, Pennsylvania
- George Read, Gunning Bedford Jr., John Dickinson, Richard Bassett, Delaware
- James McHenry, Daniel of St Thomas Jenifer, Daniel Carroll Maryland
- John Blair, James Madison Jr. Virginia
- William Blount, Richard Dobbs Spaight, Hugh Williamson North Carolina
- John Rutledge, Charles Cotesworth Pinckney, Charles Pinckney, South Carolina
- William Few, Abraham Baldwin Georgia
1 Section
1 Section
1 Section
1 Section
1 Amendment
1 and 2 shall take effect on the 15th day of October following the 5. Sections
1. Article
1. Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude, except as a punishment for crime
1. All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the
1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or
1. After one year from the ratification of this article the manufacture, sale,
1. The terms of the President and Vice President shall end at noon on the 20th
1. The eighteenth article of amendment to the Constitution of the United States
1. No person shall be elected to the office of the President more than twice,
1. The District constituting the seat of Government of the United States shall
1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote in any primary or other
1. In case of the removal of the President from office or of his death or
1. The right of citizens of the United States, who are eighteen years of age or
10 Section
10 Amendment
11 Amendment
12 Amendment
13 Amendment
14 Amendment
15 Amendment
15th day of October following the 5. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on the
16 Amendment
17 Amendment
18 Amendment
19 Amendment
2 Section
2 Section
2 Section
2 Section
2 Amendment
2 shall take effect on the 15th day of October following the 5. Sections 1 and
2. Article
2. Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate
2. Representatives shall be apportioned among the several States according to
2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate
2. The Congress and the several States shall have concurrent power to enforce
2. The Congress shall assemble at least once in every year, and such meeting
2. The transportation or importation into any State, Territory, or possession
2. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an
2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate
2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate
2. Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of the Vice President, the
2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate
20 Amendment
20th 1. The terms of the President and Vice President shall end at noon on the
21 Amendment
22 Amendment
23 Amendment
24 Amendment
25 Amendment
26 Amendment
27 Amendment
3 Section
3 Section
3 Section
3 Section
3 Amendment
3. Article
3. No person shall be a Senator or Representative in Congress, or elector of
3. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an
3. If, at the time fixed for the beginning of the term of the President, the
3. The article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an
3. Whenever the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Senate
3d day of January, and the terms of Senators and Representatives at noon on the
3d day of January, unless they shall by law appoint shall begin at noon on the
4 Section
4 Section
4 Section
4 Amendment
4. Article
4. The validity of the public debt of the United States, authorized by law,
4. The Congress may by law provide for the case of the death of any of the
4. Whenever the Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers
5 Section
5 Amendment
5. Article
5. The Congress shall have power to enforce, by appropriate legislation, the
5. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on the 15th day of October following the
6 Section
6 Amendment
6. Article
6. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an
7 Section
7 Amendment
7. Article
8 Section
8 Amendment
9 Section
9 Amendment
a more perfect Union, We the People of the United States, in Order to form
a Congress of the All legislative Powers herein granted shall be vested in
a Senate and House of Representatives. United States, which shall consist of
a Representative who shall not have attained to the Age of No Person shall be
a Citizen of the United States, and who twenty five Years, and been seven Years
a Term of Years, and excluding Indians not including those bound to Service for
a Senator who shall not have attained to the Age of thirty No person shall be
a Citizen of the United States, and who shall not, Years, and been nine Years
a President pro tempore, The Senate shall choose their other Officers, and also
a be on the first Monday in December, unless they shall by Law appoint
a Majority of each shall constitute a Quorum to do its own Members, and
a Quorum to do its own Members, and a Majority of each shall constitute
a smaller number may adjourn from day to day, and may be Business; but
a Member. disorderly Behavior, and, with the Concurrence of two-thirds, expel
a Journal of its Proceedings, and from time to time Each House shall keep
a Compensation for their The Senators and Representatives shall receive
a Member of either House during his Continuance in Office. shall be
a Law, be presented to the President of the United shall, before it become
a Law. But in all such Cases the Votes of both Houses shall be shall become
a Law, excepted) after it shall have been presented to him, the Same shall be
a Law. prevent its Return, in which Case it shall not be
a question of Adjournment) House of Representatives may be necessary (except on
a Bill. to the Rules and Limitations prescribed in the Case of
a longer Term than two Years; for
a Navy; To provide and maintain
a tax or duty may be imposed the Year one thousand eight hundred and eight, but
a regular Statement and Account of the Receipts and made by Law; and
a Tender in Payment of Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder, gold and silver Coin
a foreign Power, or engage in War, unless actually with another State, or with
a President of the United States of The executive Power shall be vested in
a Number of Electors, equal to the whole Number of Senators and Representatives
a List of all the Persons voted for, and with themselves. And they shall make
a Majority of the whole Number of shall be the President, if such Number be
a immediately choose by Ballot one of them for President; and if no Person have
a quorum taken by States, the Representation from each State having one Vote;
a Member or Members from two-thirds of the for this Purpose shall consist of
a Majority of all the States shall be necessary to a Choice. In States, and
a Choice. In States, and a Majority of all the States shall be necessary to
a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States, at No person except
a Citizen of the United States, at No person except a natural born Citizen, or
a have attained to the Age of thirty-five Years, and been fourteen Years
a President shall be elected. removed, or
a Compensation, The President shall, at stated Times, receive for his Services,
a Compensation which shall not be diminished during their their Services
a Party; to Jurisdiction; to Controversies to which the United States shall be
a State and Citizens of Controversies between two or more States; between
a same State claiming Lands under Grants of different States, and between
a State shall be Party, the supreme Court shall have original those in which
A Person charged in any State with Treason, Felony, or other Crime, who shall
a Republican The United States shall guarantee to every State in this Union
a Convention for Legislatures of two thirds of the several States, shall call
a Qualification to any Office or public Trust under the United required as
a redress of grievances. the Government for
A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a free State, the
a free State, the A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of
a manner to be prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor in time of war, but in
a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, No person shall be held to answer for
a presentment or indictment of a Grand Jury, except in cases arising unless on
a Grand Jury, except in cases arising unless on a presentment or indictment of
a witness against himself, nor be deprived of life, criminal case to be
a speedy and In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to
a dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by
a majority of the whole number of Electors President, if such number be
a quorum for this states, the representation from each state having one vote;
a member or members from two-thirds of the states, and purpose shall consist of
a majority of all the states shall be necessary to a choice. And if the House
a choice. And if the House a majority of all the states shall be necessary to
a President whenever the right of choice of Representatives shall not choose
a majority of the whole number of Electors Vice-President, if such number be
a majority, then from the two highest numbers appointed, and if no person have
a quorum for the on the list, the Senate shall choose the Vice-President;
a purpose shall consist of two-thirds of the whole number of Senators, and
a choice. But no person majority of the whole number shall be necessary to
a punishment for crime 1. Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude, except as
a State, or Representatives in Congress, the Executive and Judicial officers of
a Senator or Representative in Congress, or elector of 3. No person shall be
a United States, or under any State, who, having previously taken an oath, as
a member of member of Congress, or as an officer of the United States, or as
a vote of two-thirds of each House, remove enemies thereof. But Congress may by
a different day.
a President shall not have been chosen before the time fixed for President. If
a President qualify, then the Vice President elect shall act as President until
a President elect nor a Vice President elect shall have qualified, neither
a Vice President elect shall have qualified, neither a President elect nor
a President act shall be selected, and such person shall act accordingly until
a President whenever persons from whom the House of Representatives may choose
a Vice President death of any of the persons from whom the Senate may choose
a term to which some other person was elected President more than two years of
A number of electors of appoint in such manner as the Congress may direct:
a State, but in no event more than the least populous State; they shall be in
a State; and they shall meet in the District and perform such appointed by
a vacancy in the office of the Vice President, the 2. Whenever there is
a Vice President who shall take office upon President shall nominate
a majority vote of both Houses of Congress. confirmation by
a written declaration to the contrary, such powers and duties transmits to them
a majority of either the principal officers 4. Whenever the Vice President and
a majority of either the principal officers of unless the Vice President and
Ability, preserve, President of the United States, and will to the best of my
Abraham Baldwin Georgia - William Few,
abridge wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any law which shall
abridged by the United States or by any State on account of race, color, or
abridged by the United States or by any State on account of sex.
abridged by the United States or any State by reason of failure to denied or
abridged by the United States or by any older, to vote shall not be denied or
abridged, except for participation in rebellion, United States, or in any way
abridging the freedom of speech, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or
absence of the Vice President, or when he shall exercise the Office of in the
absent Members, in such Manner, and authorized to compel the Attendance of
absolutely necessary for executing on Imports or Exports, except what may be
accept of any present, Emolument, Office, or Title, of any kind the Congress,
acceptance of Congress, become the Seat of the Government of the United the
according to their respective Numbers, which may be included within this Union,
according to liable and subject to Indictment, Trial, Judgment and Punishment,
according be repassed by two thirds of the Senate and House of Representatives,
according to the discipline and the Authority of training the Militia
according to the rules of the common law.
according to 2. Representatives shall be apportioned among the several States
accordingly until a President act shall be selected, and such person shall act
accordingly, until the Disability be President, and such Officer shall act
Account of the Receipts and made by Law; and a regular Statement and
account of race, color, or abridged by the United States or by any State on
account of sex. abridged by the United States or by any State on
account of age. State on
accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory
accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy and In all criminal prosecutions, the
act as the President and Vice President, declaring what Officer shall then
act accordingly, until the Disability be President, and such Officer shall
act as President, as in the case of the death or other the Vice-President shall
act as President until a President qualify, then the Vice President elect shall
act as President, or the manner in which one who is to declaring who shall then
act shall be selected, and such person shall act accordingly until a President
act accordingly until a President act shall be selected, and such person shall
Act, or on Confession in open Court. same overt
acted as President, for and no person who has held the office of President, or
acting as President, during the term be holding the office of President, or
acting as President during the remainder of such term. President or
Acting President. shall be discharged by the Vice President as
Acting shall immediately assume the powers and duties of the office as
Acting President; otherwise, the President shall resume the powers the same as
Acts, Records, Full Faith and Credit shall be given in each State to the public
Acts, Records and Proceedings shall be Laws prescribe the Manner in which such
actual Enumeration shall be made within three Years after the first Meeting The
actual States, and of the Militia of the several States, when called into the
actual service in time in the land or naval forces, or in the Militia, when in
actually with another State, or with a foreign Power, or engage in War, unless
adding to the whole Number of free Persons, which shall be determined by
addition to those appointed by the States, but they shall be considered, for
adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort. No Person them, or in
adjourn from day to day, and may be Business; but a smaller number may
adjourn for more than three days, nor to any other Place than that the other,
adjourn them to such Time as he Respect to the Time of Adjournment, he may
Adjournment in like Manner as if he had signed it, unless the Congress by their
Adjournment) House of Representatives may be necessary (except on a question of
Adjournment, he may adjourn them to such Time as he Respect to the Time of
admiralty and maritime public Ministers and Consuls; to all Cases of
admit of delay. invaded, or in such imminent Danger as will not
admit, shall not be prohibited by the Congress prior to shall think proper to
admitted by the Congress into this Union; but no new States New States may be
Adoption of this Constitution, shall be eligible to the Office the time of the
Adoption of this All Debts contracted and Engagements entered into, before the
Advice and Consent of the Senate, to make He shall have Power, by and with the
Advice and Consent of the Senate, shall appoint nominate, and by and with the
affect the first and thousand eight hundred and eight shall in any Manner
affect the election or term of This amendment shall not be so construed as to
affecting Ambassadors, other shall be made, under their Authority; to all Cases
affecting Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, and In all Cases
affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office of "I do solemnly swear (or
Affirmation, to support this Constitution; but no religious Test shall ever be
affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be searched, and the
Affirmation. When the President of the that Purpose, they shall be on Oath or
Affirmation: Oath or
after the first Meeting The actual Enumeration shall be made within three Years
after they shall be assembled in Consequence of the first Election, Immediately
after Objections at large on their Journal, and proceed to reconsider it. If
after it shall have been presented to him, the Same shall be a Law, excepted)
after the Choice of the President, the Person having the greatest every Case,
After one year from the ratification of this article the manufacture, sale, 1.
after purpose if not in session. If the Congress, within twenty one days
after Congress is required to assemble, determines by within twenty one days
against the Bill shall be entered on the Journal of each House respectively. If
against the Law of Nations; Offenses
against the United States, except in Grant Reprieves and Pardons for Offenses
against the United States, shall consist only in levying War against Treason
against Treason against the United States, shall consist only in levying War
against Invasion; and on Form of Government, and shall protect each of them
against domestic Violence. cannot be convened)
against the United States under this Constitution, shall be as valid
against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and effects,
against himself, nor be deprived of life, criminal case to be a witness
against him; to have compulsory accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses
against one of the United States suit in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted
against the same, or given aid or comfort to the insurrection or rebellion
against the United States, or any claim for in aid of insurrection or rebellion
Age of No Person shall be a Representative who shall not have attained to the
Age of thirty No person shall be a Senator who shall not have attained to the
Age of thirty-five Years, and been fourteen Years a have attained to the
age in such State. number of male citizens twenty-one years of
age or 1. The right of citizens of the United States, who are eighteen years of
age, and citizens of the inhabitants of such State, being twenty-one years of
age. State on account of
agree to pass the Bill, it such Reconsideration two thirds of that House shall
Agreement or Compact Troops, or Ships of War in time of Peace, enter into any
Aid and Comfort. No Person them, or in adhering to their Enemies, giving them
aid or comfort to the insurrection or rebellion against the same, or given
aid of insurrection or rebellion against the United States, or any claim for in
Alexander Hamilton New York -
All legislative Powers herein granted shall be vested in a Congress of the
all other Persons. taxed, three fifths of
all Impeachments. When sitting for The Senate shall have the sole Power to try
all Cases, except Treason, Felony and Breach of the States. They shall in
All bills for raising Revenue shall originate in the House of Representatives;
all such Cases the Votes of both Houses shall be shall become a Law. But in
all Duties, Imposts and Excises shall be Welfare of the United States; but
all Cases whatsoever, over such District To exercise exclusive Legislation in
all Places purchased by the Consent States, and to exercise like Authority over
all Laws which shall be necessary and proper for carrying into To make
all other Powers vested by this Execution the foregoing Powers, and
all public Money shall be published from time to time. Expenditures of
all Duties and Imposts, laid by its inspection Laws: and the net Produce of
all such Laws shall be subject to the Revision and Control United States; and
all the Persons voted for, and with themselves. And they shall make a List of
all the Certificates, and the of the Senate and House of Representatives, open
all the States shall be necessary to a Choice. In States, and a Majority of
all other Officers of the United States, whose Appointments are not herein and
all Vacancies that may happen during The President shall have Power to fill up
all shall take Care that the Laws be faithfully executed, and shall Commission
all civil Officers of the United States, The President, Vice President and
all Cases, in Law and Equity, arising under The judicial Power shall extend to
all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other shall be made, under their Authority; to
all Cases of admiralty and maritime public Ministers and Consuls; to
all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, and In
all the other Cases before mentioned, the supreme Court shall Jurisdiction. In
all Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and The Trial of
all Privileges and Immunities The Citizens of each State shall be entitled to
all needful Rules and The Congress shall have Power to dispose of and make
all Intents and proposing Amendments, which, in either Case, shall be valid to
All Debts contracted and Engagements entered into, before the Adoption of this
all Treaties made, or which shall be made, under the Pursuance thereof; and
all executive and judicial Officers, both of several State Legislatures, and
all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy and In
all persons voted for as Vice-President, and they shall make distinct lists of
all persons voted for as Vice-President and of the number of President, and of
all the certificates and the votes shall then be counted; Representatives, open
all the states shall be necessary to a choice. And if the House a majority of
All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the 1.
all such debts, obligations and the loss or emancipation of any slave; but
all territory subject to or the exportation thereof from the United States and
Alliance, or Confederation; grant Letters No State shall enter into any Treaty,
alone, in the Courts of Law, or in the Heads of proper, in the President
also a President pro tempore, The Senate shall choose their other Officers, and
alter such Regulations, except but the Congress may at any time by Law make or
Ambassadors and other public Ministers; he shall think proper; he shall receive
Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, Judges of the supreme Court,
Ambassadors, other shall be made, under their Authority; to all Cases affecting
Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, and In all Cases affecting
Amendment which may be made prior to the Year One Congress; Provided that no
Amendment 1
Amendment 2
Amendment 3
Amendment 4
Amendment 5
Amendment 6
Amendment 7
Amendment 8
Amendment 9
Amendment 10
Amendment 11
Amendment 12
Amendment 13
Amendment 14
Amendment 15
Amendment 16
Amendment 17
amendment shall not be so construed as to affect the election or term of This
Amendment 18
amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of the several States, as
Amendment 19
Amendment 20
amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of the
Amendment 21
amendment to the Constitution of the United States 1. The eighteenth article of
amendment to the Constitution by conventions in the several States, as provided
Amendment 22
amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of the
Amendment 23
Amendment 24
Amendment 25
Amendment 26
Amendment 27
amendment. duties as provided by the twelfth article of
Amendments as on other Bills. but the Senate may propose or concur with
Amendments to this Constitution, or, on the Application of the propose
Amendments, which, in either Case, shall be valid to all Intents and proposing
America the and Eighty seven and of the Independence of the United States of
America. United States of
America. He shall hold his Office during the Term of four Years, and, together
among the several States Representatives and direct Taxes shall be apportioned
among the several States, and To regulate Commerce with foreign Nations, and
among the several States according to 2. Representatives shall be apportioned
among the several States, and whatever source derived, without apportionment
an Inhabitant of that State in which he shall be shall not, when elected, be
an Inhabitant of that State for which he shall be chosen. when elected, be
an uniform Rule of Naturalization, and uniform Laws on the subject To establish
an Office of Trust or Profit under the United Representative, or Person holding
an Elector. States, shall be appointed
an Inhabitant of the same State persons, of whom one at least shall not lie
an equal Number of Votes, then the House of Representatives shall have
an establishment of religion, or Congress shall make no law respecting
an impartial jury of the State and district wherein the crime public trial, by
an inhabitant President and Vice-President, one of whom, at least, shall not be
an oath, as a United States, or under any State, who, having previously taken
an officer of the United States, or as a member of member of Congress, or as
an executive or judicial officer of any State, to any State legislature, or as
an 3. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as
an 6. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as
an 3. The article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as
an 2. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as
an election of Representatives shall Representatives, shall take effect, until
and secure the Blessings of Liberty to defence, promote the general Welfare,
and our Posterity, do ordain and establish this Constitution for the ourselves
and establish this Constitution for the ourselves and our Posterity, do ordain
and House of Representatives. United States, which shall consist of a Senate
and the Electors in each State shall Year by the People of the several States,
and been seven Years a Citizen of the United States, and who twenty five Years,
and who twenty five Years, and been seven Years a Citizen of the United States,
and direct Taxes shall be apportioned among the several States Representatives
and excluding Indians not including those bound to Service for a Term of Years,
and within every subsequent Term of ten of the Congress of the United States,
and until such enumeration shall be shall have at Least one Representative;
and Providence Plantations one, Connecticut Massachusetts eight, Rhode Island
and Georgia three. six, Virginia ten, North Carolina five, South Carolina five
and other Officers; and The House of Representatives shall choose their Speaker
and The House of Representatives shall choose their Speaker and other Officers;
and each Senator shall State, chosen by the Legislature thereof, for six Years;
and of the Year, of the second Class at the Expiration of the fourth Year,
and if Vacancies happen by Resignation, or otherwise, chosen every second Year;
and been nine Years a Citizen of the United States, and who shall not, Years,
and who shall not, Years, and been nine Years a Citizen of the United States,
and also a President pro tempore, The Senate shall choose their other Officers,
And no Person shall be United States is tried, the Chief Justice shall preside:
and disqualification to hold and enjoy any Office of honor, Trust or Office,
and enjoy any Office of honor, Trust or Office, and disqualification to hold
and subject to Indictment, Trial, Judgment and Punishment, according to liable
and Punishment, according to liable and subject to Indictment, Trial, Judgment
and Manner of holding Elections for Senators and The Times, Places
and The Times, Places and Manner of holding Elections for Senators
and such Meeting shall The Congress shall assemble at least once in every Year,
and Qualifications of Each House shall be the Judge of the Elections, Returns
and a Majority of each shall constitute a Quorum to do its own Members,
and may be Business; but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day,
and authorized to compel the Attendance of absent Members, in such Manner,
and from time to time Each House shall keep a Journal of its Proceedings,
and the Yeas and Nays of the Members of either House on any question Secrecy;
and Nays of the Members of either House on any question Secrecy; and the Yeas
and Representatives shall receive a Compensation for their The Senators
and paid out of the Treasury of the United Services, to be ascertained by Law,
and Breach of the States. They shall in all Cases, except Treason, Felony
and in going to and returning from the same; and for their respective Houses,
and returning from the same; and for their respective Houses, and in going to
and for their respective Houses, and in going to and returning from the same;
and no Person holding any Office under the United States, during such time;
and the Senate, Every Bill which shall have passed the House of Representatives
and proceed to reconsider it. If after Objections at large on their Journal,
and if approved by two thirds of that House, it shall likewise be reconsidered,
and Nays, and the Names of the Persons voting for and determined by Yeas
and the Names of the Persons voting for and determined by Yeas and Nays,
and determined by Yeas and Nays, and the Names of the Persons voting for
and Every Order, Resolution, or Vote to which the Concurrence of the Senate
and before the Same shall be presented to the President of the United States;
and House of Representatives, according be repassed by two thirds of the Senate
and Limitations prescribed in the Case of a Bill. to the Rules
and collect Taxes, Duties, Imposts and The Congress shall have Power To lay
and The Congress shall have Power To lay and collect Taxes, Duties, Imposts
and provide for the common Defence and general Excises, to pay the Debts
and general Excises, to pay the Debts and provide for the common Defence
and Excises shall be Welfare of the United States; but all Duties, Imposts
and among the several States, and To regulate Commerce with foreign Nations,
and To regulate Commerce with foreign Nations, and among the several States,
and uniform Laws on the subject To establish an uniform Rule of Naturalization,
and of foreign Coin, and fix the To coin Money, regulate the Value thereof,
and fix the To coin Money, regulate the Value thereof, and of foreign Coin,
and Measures; Standard of Weights
and current Coin To provide for the Punishment of counterfeiting the Securities
and Post Roads; To establish Post Offices
and useful Arts, by securing for limited To promote the Progress of Science
and Inventors the exclusive Right to their respective Writings Times to Authors
and Discoveries;
and punish Piracies and Felonies committed on the high Seas, and To define
and Felonies committed on the high Seas, and To define and punish Piracies
and To define and punish Piracies and Felonies committed on the high Seas,
and Reprisal, and make Rules concerning To declare War, grant Letters of Marque
and make Rules concerning To declare War, grant Letters of Marque and Reprisal,
and Water; Captures on Land
and support Armies, but no Appropriation of Money to that Use shall be To raise
and maintain a Navy; To provide
and Regulation of the land and naval Forces; To make Rules for the Government
and naval Forces; To make Rules for the Government and Regulation of the land
and repel Invasions; suppress Insurrections
and disciplining, the Militia, and for To provide for organizing, arming,
and for To provide for organizing, arming, and disciplining, the Militia,
and the Authority of training the Militia according to the discipline
and (not exceeding ten Miles square) as may, by Cession of particular States,
and to exercise like Authority over all Places purchased by the Consent States,
and other needful Buildings; And Forts, Magazines, Arsenals, dock-Yards,
And Forts, Magazines, Arsenals, dock-Yards, and other needful Buildings;
and proper for carrying into To make all Laws which shall be necessary
and all other Powers vested by this Execution the foregoing Powers,
and eight, but a tax or duty may be imposed the Year one thousand eight hundred
and a regular Statement and Account of the Receipts and made by Law;
and Account of the Receipts and made by Law; and a regular Statement
and made by Law; and a regular Statement and Account of the Receipts
And no Person No Title of Nobility shall be granted by the United States:
and Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills of Credit; make any Thing but of Marque
and silver Coin a Tender in Payment of Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder, gold
and the net Produce of all Duties and Imposts, laid by its inspection Laws:
and Imposts, laid by its inspection Laws: and the net Produce of all Duties
and all such Laws shall be subject to the Revision and Control United States;
and Control United States; and all such Laws shall be subject to the Revision
and Representatives a Number of Electors, equal to the whole Number of Senators
and vote by Ballot for two The Electors shall meet in their respective States,
And they shall make a List of all the Persons voted for, and with themselves.
and with themselves. And they shall make a List of all the Persons voted for,
and certify, and of the Number of Votes for each; which List they shall sign
and of the Number of Votes for each; which List they shall sign and certify,
and House of Representatives, open all the Certificates, and the of the Senate
and the of the Senate and House of Representatives, open all the Certificates,
and if there be more than one who have such Majority, and Electors appointed;
and Electors appointed; and if there be more than one who have such Majority,
and if no Person have a immediately choose by Ballot one of them for President;
and a Majority of all the States shall be necessary to a Choice. In States,
and the Day on The Congress may determine the Time of choosing the Electors,
and been fourteen Years a have attained to the Age of thirty-five Years,
and Duties of the said Resignation, or Inability to discharge the Powers
and the Congress may by Office, the same shall devolve on the Vice President,
and Vice President, declaring what Officer shall then act as the President
and such Officer shall act accordingly, until the Disability be President,
and he shall not receive within that Period any other shall have been elected,
and will to the best of my Ability, preserve, President of the United States,
and defend the Constitution of the United States." protect
and Navy of the United The President shall be Commander in Chief of the Army
and of the Militia of the several States, when called into the actual States,
and he shall have Power to relating to the Duties of their respective Offices,
and Pardons for Offenses against the United States, except in Grant Reprieves
and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, to make He shall have Power, by
and Consent of the Senate, to make He shall have Power, by and with the Advice
and he shall Treaties, provided two thirds of the Senators present concur;
and by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, shall appoint nominate,
and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, shall appoint nominate, and by
and Consent of the Senate, shall appoint nominate, and by and with the Advice
and Consuls, Judges of the supreme Court, Ambassadors, other public Ministers
and all other Officers of the United States, whose Appointments are not herein
and which shall be established by Law: but the Congress otherwise provided for,
and recommend to their Consideration such Measures as he shall judge Union,
and expedient; he may, on extraordinary Occasions, convene both necessary
and in Case of Disagreement between them, with Houses, or either of them,
and other public Ministers; he shall think proper; he shall receive Ambassadors
and shall Commission all shall take Care that the Laws be faithfully executed,
and all civil Officers of the United States, The President, Vice President
and Conviction of, Treason, shall be removed from Office on Impeachment for,
and Misdemeanors. Bribery, or other high Crimes
and in such inferior Courts as the Congress may from time to time ordain and
and and in such inferior Courts as the Congress may from time to time ordain
and inferior Courts, shall hold establish. The Judges, both of the supreme
and shall, at stated Times, receive for their Offices during good Behavior,
and Equity, arising under The judicial Power shall extend to all Cases, in Law
and Treaties made, or which this Constitution, the Laws of the United States,
and Consuls; to all Cases of admiralty and maritime public Ministers
and maritime public Ministers and Consuls; to all Cases of admiralty
and Citizens of Controversies between two or more States; between a State
and between a same State claiming Lands under Grants of different States,
and foreign States, Citizens or Subjects. State, or the Citizens thereof,
and Consuls, and In all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other public Ministers
and In all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls,
and Fact, with such Exceptions, and have appellate Jurisdiction, both as to Law
and have appellate Jurisdiction, both as to Law and Fact, with such Exceptions,
and The Trial of all Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment, shall be by Jury;
and Comfort. No Person them, or in adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid
and Credit shall be given in each State to the public Acts, Records, Full Faith
and judicial Proceedings of every other State. And the Congress may by general
And the Congress may by general and judicial Proceedings of every other State.
and Proceedings shall be Laws prescribe the Manner in which such Acts, Records
and the Effect thereof. proved,
and Immunities The Citizens of each State shall be entitled to all Privileges
and be found in another State, shall on demand of the flee from Justice,
and make all needful Rules and The Congress shall have Power to dispose of
and The Congress shall have Power to dispose of and make all needful Rules
and nothing in this Constitution shall be so construed as to Prejudice States;
and shall protect each of them against Invasion; and on Form of Government,
and on Form of Government, and shall protect each of them against Invasion;
and proposing Amendments, which, in either Case, shall be valid to all Intents
and eight shall in any Manner affect the first and thousand eight hundred
and thousand eight hundred and eight shall in any Manner affect the first
and that no State, fourth Clauses in the Ninth Section of the first Article;
and Engagements entered into, before the Adoption of this All Debts contracted
and the Laws of the United States which shall be made in This Constitution,
and all Treaties made, or which shall be made, under the Pursuance thereof;
and the Authority of the United States, shall be the supreme Law of the Land;
and Representatives before mentioned, and the Members of the The Senators
and the Members of the The Senators and Representatives before mentioned,
and all executive and judicial Officers, both of several State Legislatures,
and judicial Officers, both of several State Legislatures, and all executive
and of the several States, shall be bound by Oath or the United States
and Eighty seven and of the Independence of the United States of America the
and of the Independence of the United States of America the and Eighty seven
and deputy from Virginia George Washington - President
and to petition of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble,
and bear Arms, shall not be infringed. right of the people to keep
and The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers,
and seizures, shall not be violated, and effects, against unreasonable searches
and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated,
and particularly describing the place to be searched, and the affirmation,
and the affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be searched,
and In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy
and district wherein the crime public trial, by an impartial jury of the State
and to be informed of the nature and cause of the ascertained by law,
and cause of the ascertained by law, and to be informed of the nature
and to have the Assistance of process for obtaining witnesses in his favor,
and no fact tried by a dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved,
and unusual punishments inflicted.
and vote by ballot for The Electors shall meet in their respective states,
and Vice-President, one of whom, at least, shall not be an inhabitant President
and in distinct ballots the person voted for as voted for as President,
and they shall make distinct lists of all persons voted for as Vice-President,
and of all persons voted for as Vice-President and of the number of President,
and of the number of President, and of all persons voted for as Vice-President
and certify, and transmit sealed to votes for each, which lists they shall sign
and transmit sealed to votes for each, which lists they shall sign and certify,
and House of The President of the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate
and the votes shall then be counted; Representatives, open all the certificates
and if no person have such majority, then from the persons having appointed;
and purpose shall consist of a member or members from two-thirds of the states,
And if the House a majority of all the states shall be necessary to a choice.
and if no person have a majority, then from the two highest numbers appointed,
and a purpose shall consist of two-thirds of the whole number of Senators,
and subject to the 1. All persons born or naturalized in the United States,
and of the State jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States
and Vice-President of the United States, choice of electors for President
and Judicial officers of a State, or Representatives in Congress, the Executive
and citizens of the inhabitants of such State, being twenty-one years of age,
and Vice-President, or hold any office, civil or military, under the President
and bounties for services in including debts incurred for payment of pensions
and the loss or emancipation of any slave; but all such debts, obligations
and void. claims shall be held illegal
and collect taxes on incomes, from The Congress shall have power to lay
and whatever source derived, without apportionment among the several States,
and each Senator shall State, elected by the people thereof, for six years;
and all territory subject to or the exportation thereof from the United States
and the several States shall have concurrent power to enforce 2. The Congress
and Vice President shall end at noon on the 20th 1. The terms of the President
and the terms of Senators and Representatives at noon on the 3d day of January,
and Representatives at noon on the 3d day of January, and the terms of Senators
and the terms of their successors shall then article had not been ratified;
and such meeting 2. The Congress shall assemble at least once in every year,
and the Congress may by law provide for the case wherein shall have qualified;
and such person shall act accordingly until a President act shall be selected,
and for the case of the the right of choice shall have devolved upon them,
and 2 shall take effect on the 15th day of October following the 5. Sections 1
and no person who has held the office of President, or acted as President, for
and shall not prevent any person who may Article was proposed by the Congress,
and Vice President equal to the whole number of Senators and President
and President and Vice President equal to the whole number of Senators
and Vice President, to be electors the purposes of the election of President
and they shall meet in the District and perform such appointed by a State;
and perform such appointed by a State; and they shall meet in the District
and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration that he
and duties of his office, and until he is unable to discharge the powers
and until he is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office,
and duties transmits to them a written declaration to the contrary, such powers
and a majority of either the principal officers 4. Whenever the Vice President
and the Speaker of provide, transmit to the President pro tempore of the Senate
and duties of his office, the Vice President unable to discharge the powers
and duties of the office as Acting shall immediately assume the powers
and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration Senate
and duties of his office that no inability exists, he shall resume the powers
and a majority of either the principal officers of unless the Vice President
and the transmit within four days to the President pro tempore of the Senate
and duties of his office. Thereupon President is unable to discharge the powers
and duties of his office, the Vice President shall continue to discharge powers
and duties of his office.
and No law, varying the compensation for the services of the Senators
and, with the Concurrence of two-thirds, expel a Member. disorderly Behavior,
and, together America. He shall hold his Office during the Term of four Years,
another State, or with a foreign Power, or engage in War, unless actually with
another State; between Citizens of different States; between Citizens of the
another State, shall on demand of the flee from Justice, and be found in
another State, or by Citizens or Subjects of any Foreign State. by Citizens of
another, shall, in Consequence of any Law or Regulation therein, escaping into
another. one State, be obliged to enter, clear, or pay Duties in
another: nor shall Vessels bound to, or from, Ports of one State over those of
answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, No person shall be held to
any State, the Executive When vacancies happen in the Representation from
any State, the Executive thereof may during the Recess of the Legislature of
any Office of honor, Trust or Office, and disqualification to hold and enjoy
any time by Law make or alter such Regulations, except but the Congress may at
any question Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays of the Members of either House on
any other Place than that the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to
any Speech or Debate in either House, they shall not be questioned in any other
any other any Speech or Debate in either House, they shall not be questioned in
any civil Office under the Authority of the United States which be appointed to
any Office under the United States, during such time; and no Person holding
any Bill shall not be returned by the President within ten Days (Sundays
any Department or Constitution in the Government of the United States, or in
any of the States now existing The Migration or Importation of such Persons as
any State. No Tax or Duty shall be laid on Articles exported from
any Regulation of Commerce or Revenue to the No Preference shall be given by
any Office of Profit or Trust under them, shall, without the Consent of holding
any present, Emolument, Office, or Title, of any kind the Congress, accept of
any kind the Congress, accept of any present, Emolument, Office, or Title, of
any King, Prince or foreign State. whatever, from
any Treaty, Alliance, or Confederation; grant Letters No State shall enter into
any Thing but of Marque and Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills of Credit; make
any Bill of Attainder, gold and silver Coin a Tender in Payment of Debts; pass
any ex post facto Law, or Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts, or grant
any Imposts or Duties No State shall, without the Consent of the Congress, lay
any State on Imports or Exports, shall be for the Use of the Treasury of the
any duty of Tonnage, keep No State shall, without the Consent of Congress, lay
any Agreement or Compact Troops, or Ships of War in time of Peace, enter into
any Person be eligible to that Office who shall not of President; neither shall
any other shall have been elected, and he shall not receive within that Period
any of them. Emolument from the United States, or
any subject principal Officer in each of the executive Departments, upon
any State, the Trial shall be at such committed; but when not committed within
any State with Treason, Felony, or other Crime, who shall A Person charged in
any Law or Regulation therein, escaping into another, shall, in Consequence of
any other State; nor any shall be formed or erected within the Jurisdiction of
any shall be formed or erected within the Jurisdiction of any other State; nor
any Claims of the United States, or of any particular State.
any particular State. any Claims of the United States, or of
any Manner affect the first and thousand eight hundred and eight shall in
any Thing in the Constitution or Judges in every State shall be bound thereby,
any State to the Contrary notwithstanding. Laws of
any Office or public Trust under the United required as a Qualification to
any house, without the No Soldier shall, in time of peace be quartered in
any person be subject for the same offense of War or public danger; nor shall
any to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in
any Court of the United States, than jury, shall be otherwise re-examined in
any The Judicial power of the United States shall not be construed to extend to
any Foreign State. by Citizens of another State, or by Citizens or Subjects of
any place subject to their jurisdiction. States, or
any law which shall abridge wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce
any the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall
any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of State deprive
any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the law; nor deny to
any election for the excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right to vote at
any of the male the members of the Legislature thereof, is denied to
any way abridged, except for participation in rebellion, United States, or in
any office, civil or military, under the President and Vice-President, or hold
any State, who, having previously taken an oath, as a United States, or under
any State legislature, or as an executive or judicial officer of any State, to
any State, to any State legislature, or as an executive or judicial officer of
any State shall assume or pay any debt or obligation incurred United States nor
any debt or obligation incurred United States nor any State shall assume or pay
any claim for in aid of insurrection or rebellion against the United States, or
any slave; but all such debts, obligations and the loss or emancipation of
any State on account of race, color, or abridged by the United States or by
any census or enumeration. without regard to
any State in the Senate, the When vacancies happen in the representation of
any State may empower the vacancies: Provided, That the legislature of
any Senator chosen before it becomes valid as part of the Constitution.
any State on account of sex. abridged by the United States or by
any of the 4. The Congress may by law provide for the case of the death of
any of the persons from whom the Senate may choose a Vice President death of
any State, Territory, or possession 2. The transportation or importation into
any person holding the office of President, when this Article shall not apply to
any person who may Article was proposed by the Congress, and shall not prevent
any primary or other 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote in
any State by reason of failure to denied or abridged by the United States or
any poll tax or other tax. pay
any older, to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by
appellate Jurisdiction, both as to Law and Fact, with such Exceptions, and have
Application of the Legislature, or of the Executive (when the Legislature
Application of the propose Amendments to this Constitution, or, on the
apply to any person holding the office of President, when this Article shall not
appoint a be on the first Monday in December, unless they shall by Law
appoint nominate, and by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, shall
appoint shall begin at noon on the 3d day of January, unless they shall by law
appoint in such manner as the Congress may direct: A number of electors of
appoint, in such Manner as the Legislature thereof may direct, Each State shall
appointed to any civil Office under the Authority of the United States which be
appointed an Elector. States, shall be
appointed by the States, but they shall be considered, for addition to those
appointed by a State; and they shall meet in the District and perform such
appointed, and if no person have a majority, then from the two highest numbers
appointed; and if there be more than one who have such Majority, and Electors
appointed; and if no person have such majority, then from the persons having
Appointment of the Officers, States, reserving to the States respectively, the
Appointment of such inferior Officers, as they think may by Law vest the
Appointments until the next Meeting of the Legislature, which make temporary
Appointments are not herein and all other Officers of the United States, whose
appointments until the people fill the executive thereof to make temporary
apportioned among the several States Representatives and direct Taxes shall be
apportioned among the several States according to 2. Representatives shall be
apportionment among the several States, and whatever source derived, without
appropriate 2. Congress shall have power to enforce this article by
appropriate legislation, the 5. The Congress shall have power to enforce, by
appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by
appropriate legislation. this article by
appropriate legislation. Congress shall have power to enforce this article by
appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by
appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by
appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by
Appropriation of Money to that Use shall be To raise and support Armies, but no
Appropriations No Money shall be drawn from the Treasury, but in Consequence of
approve he shall sign it, but if not he shall return it, with his States; If he
approved by two thirds of that House, it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if
approved by him, or being disapproved by him, shall shall take Effect, shall be
are not herein and all other Officers of the United States, whose Appointments
are reserved to the States respectively, or to prohibited by it to the States,
are citizens of the United States and of the State jurisdiction thereof,
are eighteen years of age or 1. The right of citizens of the United States, who
arising under The judicial Power shall extend to all Cases, in Law and Equity,
arising unless on a presentment or indictment of a Grand Jury, except in cases
Armies, but no Appropriation of Money to that Use shall be To raise and support
arming, and disciplining, the Militia, and for To provide for organizing,
Arms, shall not be infringed. right of the people to keep and bear
Army and Navy of the United The President shall be Commander in Chief of the
Arrest during their Attendance at the Session of Peace, be privileged from
Arsenals, dock-Yards, and other needful Buildings; And Forts, Magazines,
Article 1.
Article 2.
Article 3.
Article 4.
Article 5.
Article 6.
Article 7.
article by appropriate 2. Congress shall have power to enforce this
article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this
article the manufacture, sale, 1. After one year from the ratification of this
article by appropriate legislation. this
article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 3. This
article by appropriate legislation. Congress shall have power to enforce this
article had not been ratified; and the terms of their successors shall then
article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 6. This
article of amendment to the Constitution of the United States 1. The eighteenth
article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 3. The
Article shall not apply to any person holding the office of President, when this
Article was proposed by the Congress, and shall not prevent any person who may
Article becomes operative from holding the office of within which this
article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 2. This
article of amendment. duties as provided by the twelfth
article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this
article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this
article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this
article. provisions of this
article. ratification of this
Article; and that no State, fourth Clauses in the Ninth Section of the first
Articles exported from any State. No Tax or Duty shall be laid on
Arts, by securing for limited To promote the Progress of Science and useful
as they shall by Law direct. The Number of Years, in such Manner
as equally as may be into three Classes. The Seats of the they shall be divided
as may be into three Classes. The Seats of the they shall be divided as equally
as to the Place of Choosing Senators.
as each House may provide. under such Penalties
as may in their Judgment require publish the same, excepting such Parts
as on other Bills. but the Senate may propose or concur with Amendments
as if he had signed it, unless the Congress by their Adjournment in like Manner
as may be employed in the Service of the United governing such Part of them
as may, by Cession of particular States, and (not exceeding ten Miles square)
as any of the States now existing The Migration or Importation of such Persons
as will not admit of delay. invaded, or in such imminent Danger
as follows: with the Vice-President chosen for the same Term, be elected,
as the Legislature thereof may direct, Each State shall appoint, in such Manner
as the President and Vice President, declaring what Officer shall then act
as they think may by Law vest the Appointment of such inferior Officers,
as he shall judge Union, and recommend to their Consideration such Measures
as he Respect to the Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn them to such Time
as the Congress may from time to time ordain and and in such inferior Courts
as to Law and Fact, with such Exceptions, and have appellate Jurisdiction, both
as the Congress shall make. under such Regulations
as the Congress may by Law have directed. Place or Places
as well as of without the Consent of the Legislatures of the States concerned
as of without the Consent of the Legislatures of the States concerned as well
as to Prejudice States; and nothing in this Constitution shall be so construed
as part of this Constitution, when ratified by the Legislatures of Purposes,
as the one or the other Mode of Ratification may be proposed by the thereof,
as valid against the United States under this Constitution, shall be
as under the Confederation. Constitution,
as a Qualification to any Office or public Trust under the United required
as President, and in distinct ballots the person voted for as voted for
as voted for as President, and in distinct ballots the person voted for
as Vice-President, and they shall make distinct lists of all persons voted for
as Vice-President and of the number of President, and of all persons voted for
as the highest numbers not exceeding three on the list of those voted for
as President, as in the case of the death or other the Vice-President shall act
as in the case of the death or other the Vice-President shall act as President,
as Vice-President, shall be the The person having the greatest number of votes
as a punishment for crime 1. Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude, except
as a United States, or under any State, who, having previously taken an oath,
as an officer of the United States, or as a member of member of Congress, or
as a member of member of Congress, or as an officer of the United States, or
as an executive or judicial officer of any State, to any State legislature, or
as the legislature may direct. vacancies by election
as to affect the election or term of This amendment shall not be so construed
as part of the Constitution. any Senator chosen before it becomes valid
as an 3. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified
as amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of the several States,
as President until a President qualify, then the Vice President elect shall act
as President, or the manner in which one who is to declaring who shall then act
as an 6. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified
as an 3. The article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified
as provided amendment to the Constitution by conventions in the several States,
as President, for and no person who has held the office of President, or acted
as President, during the term be holding the office of President, or acting
as President during the remainder of such term. President or acting
as an 2. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified
as the Congress may direct: A number of electors of appoint in such manner
as provided by the twelfth article of amendment. duties
as Acting President. shall be discharged by the Vice President
as Congress may by law of the executive departments or of such other body
as Acting shall immediately assume the powers and duties of the office
as Congress may by law provide, the executive department or of such other body
as Acting President; otherwise, the President shall resume the powers the same
ascertained by Law, and paid out of the Treasury of the United Services, to be
ascertained by law, and to be informed of the nature and cause of the
assemble at least once in every Year, and such Meeting shall The Congress shall
assemble at least once in every year, and such meeting 2. The Congress shall
assemble, and to petition of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to
assemble, determines by within twenty one days after Congress is required to
assembled in Consequence of the first Election, Immediately after they shall be
assembling within forty eight hours for that Congress shall decide the issue,
Assistance of process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have the
assume or pay any debt or obligation incurred United States nor any State shall
assume the powers and duties of the office as Acting shall immediately
at Least one Representative; and until such enumeration shall be shall have
at the Expiration of the second Senators of the first Class shall be vacated
at the Expiration of the fourth Year, and of the Year, of the second Class
at the Expiration of the sixth Year, so that one third may be third Class
at any time by Law make or alter such Regulations, except but the Congress may
at least once in every Year, and such Meeting shall The Congress shall assemble
at the Desire of one fifth of those Present, be entered on the Journal. shall,
at the Session of Peace, be privileged from Arrest during their Attendance
at large on their Journal, and proceed to reconsider it. If after Objections
at least shall not lie an Inhabitant of the same State persons, of whom one
at No person except a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States,
at stated Times, receive for his Services, a Compensation, The President shall,
at the End the Recess of the Senate, by granting Commissions which shall expire
at stated Times, receive for their Offices during good Behavior, and shall,
at such committed; but when not committed within any State, the Trial shall be
at common law, where the value in controversy shall exceed twenty In Suits
at least, shall not be an inhabitant President and Vice-President, one of whom,
at any election for the excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right to vote
at noon on the 20th 1. The terms of the President and Vice President shall end
at noon on the 3d day of January, and the terms of Senators and Representatives
at least once in every year, and such meeting 2. The Congress shall assemble
at noon on the 3d day of January, unless they shall by law appoint shall begin
at the time fixed for the beginning of the term of the President, the 3. If,
Attainder or ex post facto Law shall be passed. No Bill of
Attainder of Treason shall work Corruption of Blood, or Forfeiture except
Attainder, gold and silver Coin a Tender in Payment of Debts; pass any Bill of
attained to the Age of No Person shall be a Representative who shall not have
attained to the Age of thirty No person shall be a Senator who shall not have
attained to the Age of thirty-five Years, and been fourteen Years a have
attainted. during the Life of the Person
Attendance of absent Members, in such Manner, and authorized to compel the
Attendance at the Session of Peace, be privileged from Arrest during their
Attest: William Jackson, Secretary
Authority thereof shall issue Writs of Election to fill such Vacancies.
Authority of the United States which be appointed to any civil Office under the
Authority of training the Militia according to the discipline and the
Authority over all Places purchased by the Consent States, and to exercise like
Authority of the State from which he fled, be delivered up, to be executive
Authority of the United States, shall be the supreme Law of the Land; and the
authority of such State shall issue writs of election to fill such executive
Authority; to all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other shall be made, under their
authorized to compel the Attendance of absent Members, in such Manner, and
authorized by law, 4. The validity of the public debt of the United States,
Authors and Inventors the exclusive Right to their respective Writings Times to
bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel Excessive
Baldwin Georgia - William Few, Abraham
Ballot for two The Electors shall meet in their respective States, and vote by
Ballot one of them for President; and if no Person have a immediately choose by
Ballot the Vice-President. them by
ballot for The Electors shall meet in their respective states, and vote by
ballot, President, the House of Representatives shall choose immediately, by
ballots the person of the same state with themselves; they shall name in their
ballots the person voted for as voted for as President, and in distinct
Bankruptcies throughout the United States; of
basis of representation therein shall be reduced in the or other crime, the
Bassett, Delaware - George Read, Gunning Bedford Jr., John Dickinson, Richard
be vested in a Congress of the All legislative Powers herein granted shall
be composed of Members chosen every second The House of Representatives shall
be a Representative who shall not have attained to the Age of No Person shall
be an Inhabitant of that State in which he shall be shall not, when elected,
be shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State in which he shall
be apportioned among the several States Representatives and direct Taxes shall
be included within this Union, according to their respective Numbers, which may
be determined by adding to the whole Number of free Persons, which shall
be made within three Years after the first Meeting The actual Enumeration shall
be shall have at Least one Representative; and until such enumeration shall
be entitled to choose three, made, the State of New Hampshire shall
be composed of two Senators from each The Senate of the United States shall
be assembled in Consequence of the first Election, Immediately after they shall
be divided as equally as may be into three Classes. The Seats of the they shall
be into three Classes. The Seats of the they shall be divided as equally as may
be vacated at the Expiration of the second Senators of the first Class shall
be third Class at the Expiration of the sixth Year, so that one third may
be a Senator who shall not have attained to the Age of thirty No person shall
be an Inhabitant of that State for which he shall be chosen. when elected,
be chosen. when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State for which he shall
be President of the Senate, but The Vice President of the United States shall
be equally divided. shall have no Vote, unless they
be on Oath or Affirmation. When the President of the that Purpose, they shall
be United States is tried, the Chief Justice shall preside: And no Person shall
be Profit under the United States: but the Party convicted shall nevertheless
be prescribed in each State by the Legislature thereof; Representatives, shall
be on the first Monday in December, unless they shall by Law appoint a
be the Judge of the Elections, Returns and Qualifications of Each House shall
be Business; but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day, and may
be entered on the Journal. shall, at the Desire of one fifth of those Present,
be sitting. in which the two Houses shall
be ascertained by Law, and paid out of the Treasury of the United Services, to
be privileged from Arrest during their Attendance at the Session of Peace,
be questioned in any other any Speech or Debate in either House, they shall not
be appointed to any civil Office under the Authority of the United States which
be a Member of either House during his Continuance in Office. shall
be presented to the President of the United shall, before it become a Law,
be sent, together with the Objections, to the other House, by which it shall
be reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds of that House, it shall likewise
be shall become a Law. But in all such Cases the Votes of both Houses shall
be entered on the Journal of each House respectively. If against the Bill shall
be returned by the President within ten Days (Sundays any Bill shall not
be a Law, excepted) after it shall have been presented to him, the Same shall
be a Law. prevent its Return, in which Case it shall not
be necessary (except on a question of Adjournment) House of Representatives may
be presented to the President of the United States; and before the Same shall
be approved by him, or being disapproved by him, shall shall take Effect, shall
be repassed by two thirds of the Senate and House of Representatives, according
be Welfare of the United States; but all Duties, Imposts and Excises shall
be To raise and support Armies, but no Appropriation of Money to that Use shall
be employed in the Service of the United governing such Part of them as may
be necessary and proper for carrying into To make all Laws which shall
be prohibited by the Congress prior to shall think proper to admit, shall not
be imposed the Year one thousand eight hundred and eight, but a tax or duty may
be suspended, unless when The privilege of the Writ of Habeas Corpus shall not
be passed. No Bill of Attainder or ex post facto Law shall
be laid, unless in Proportion to the No capitation, or other direct, Tax shall
be taken. Census or Enumeration herein before directed to
be laid on Articles exported from any State. No Tax or Duty shall
be given by any Regulation of Commerce or Revenue to the No Preference shall
be obliged to enter, clear, or pay Duties in another. one State,
be drawn from the Treasury, but in Consequence of Appropriations No Money shall
be published from time to time. Expenditures of all public Money shall
be granted by the United States: And no Person No Title of Nobility shall
be absolutely necessary for executing on Imports or Exports, except what may
be for the Use of the Treasury of the any State on Imports or Exports, shall
be subject to the Revision and Control United States; and all such Laws shall
be vested in a President of the United States of The executive Power shall
be elected, as follows: with the Vice-President chosen for the same Term,
be entitled in the Congress: but no Senator or to which the State may
be appointed an Elector. States, shall
be counted. The Person having the greatest Number of Votes Votes shall then
be the President, if such Number be a Majority of the whole Number of shall
be a Majority of the whole Number of shall be the President, if such Number
be more than one who have such Majority, and Electors appointed; and if there
be Manner choose the President. But in choosing the President, the Votes shall
be necessary to a Choice. In States, and a Majority of all the States shall
be the Vice President. But if there Number of Votes of the Electors shall
be the same throughout the which they shall give their Votes; which Day shall
be eligible to the Office the time of the Adoption of this Constitution, shall
be eligible to that Office who shall not of President; neither shall any Person
be President, and such Officer shall act accordingly, until the Disability
be elected. removed, or a President shall
be increased nor diminished during the Period for which he which shall neither
be Commander in Chief of the Army and Navy of the United The President shall
be established by Law: but the Congress otherwise provided for, and which shall
be faithfully executed, and shall Commission all shall take Care that the Laws
be removed from Office on Impeachment for, and Conviction of, Treason, shall
be vested in one supreme Court, The judicial Power of the United States, shall
be diminished during their their Services a Compensation which shall not
be made, under their Authority; to all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other shall
be a Party; to Jurisdiction; to Controversies to which the United States shall
be Party, the supreme Court shall have original those in which a State shall
be by Jury; and The Trial of all Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment, shall
be held in the State where the said Crimes shall have been such Trial shall
be at such committed; but when not committed within any State, the Trial shall
be convicted of Treason unless on the Testimony of two Witnesses to the shall
be given in each State to the public Acts, Records, Full Faith and Credit shall
be Laws prescribe the Manner in which such Acts, Records and Proceedings shall
be entitled to all Privileges and Immunities The Citizens of each State shall
be found in another State, shall on demand of the flee from Justice, and
be delivered up, to be executive Authority of the State from which he fled,
be executive Authority of the State from which he fled, be delivered up, to
be discharged from such Service or Labour, But shall be delivered up on Claim
be delivered up on Claim be discharged from such Service or Labour, But shall
be due. of the Party to whom such Service or Labour may
be admitted by the Congress into this Union; but no new States New States may
be formed or erected within the Jurisdiction of any other State; nor any shall
be formed by the Junction of two or more States, or parts of States, State
be so construed as to Prejudice States; and nothing in this Constitution shall
be convened) against domestic Violence. cannot
be valid to all Intents and proposing Amendments, which, in either Case, shall
be proposed by the thereof, as the one or the other Mode of Ratification may
be made prior to the Year One Congress; Provided that no Amendment which may
be deprived of its equal Suffrage in the Senate. without its Consent, shall
be as valid against the United States under this Constitution, shall
be made in This Constitution, and the Laws of the United States which shall
be made, under the Pursuance thereof; and all Treaties made, or which shall
be the supreme Law of the Land; and the Authority of the United States, shall
be bound thereby, any Thing in the Constitution or Judges in every State shall
be bound by Oath or the United States and of the several States, shall
be Affirmation, to support this Constitution; but no religious Test shall ever
be sufficient for the The Ratification of the Conventions of nine States, shall
be infringed. right of the people to keep and bear Arms, shall not
be quartered in any house, without the No Soldier shall, in time of peace
be prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to
be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and The right of the people to
be violated, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not
be searched, and the affirmation, and particularly describing the place to
be seized. persons or things to
be held to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, No person shall
be subject for the same offense of War or public danger; nor shall any person
be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any to
be compelled in any to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall
be a witness against himself, nor be deprived of life, criminal case to
be deprived of life, criminal case to be a witness against himself, nor
be liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor shall private property
be informed of the nature and cause of the ascertained by law, and to
be confronted with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory accusation; to
be preserved, and no fact tried by a dollars, the right of trial by jury shall
be otherwise re-examined in any Court of the United States, than jury, shall
be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel Excessive bail shall not
be construed The enumeration in the Constitution, of certain rights, shall not
be construed to extend to any The Judicial power of the United States shall not
be an inhabitant President and Vice-President, one of whom, at least, shall not
be counted; Representatives, open all the certificates and the votes shall then
be the The person having the greatest Number of votes for President, shall
be a majority of the whole number of Electors President, if such number
be taken by the President. But in choosing the President, the votes shall
be necessary to a choice. And if the House a majority of all the states shall
be the The person having the greatest number of votes as Vice-President, shall
be a majority of the whole number of Electors Vice-President, if such number
be necessary to a choice. But no person majority of the whole number shall
be eligible to constitutionally ineligible to the office of President shall
be apportioned among the several States according to 2. Representatives shall
be reduced in the or other crime, the basis of representation therein shall
be a Senator or Representative in Congress, or elector of 3. No person shall
be questioned. But neither the suppressing insurrection or rebellion, shall not
be held illegal and void. claims shall
be denied or 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not
be composed of two Senators from each The Senate of the United States shall
be so construed as to affect the election or term of This amendment shall not
be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 3. This article shall
be denied or The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not
be selected, and such person shall act accordingly until a President act shall
be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 6. This article shall
be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 3. The article shall
be elected to the office of the President more than twice, 1. No person shall
be elected to the office of the President more than once. But this shall
be holding the office of President, or acting as President, during the term
be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 2. This article shall
be entitled if it were Representatives in Congress to which the District would
be in a State, but in no event more than the least populous State; they shall
be considered, for addition to those appointed by the States, but they shall
be electors the purposes of the election of President and Vice President, to
be Vice President, or for Senator or Representative in Congress, shall not
be discharged by the Vice President as Acting President. shall
be denied or abridged by the United States or by any older, to vote shall not
be, for the Erection of of the Legislature of the State in which the Same shall
bear Arms, shall not be infringed. right of the people to keep and
bear to the whole proportion which the number of such male citizens shall
become a Law, be presented to the President of the United shall, before it
become a Law. But in all such Cases the Votes of both Houses shall be shall
become the Seat of the Government of the United the acceptance of Congress,
become President elect shall have died, the Vice President elect shall
become President. resignation, the Vice President shall
becomes valid as part of the Constitution. any Senator chosen before it
becomes operative from holding the office of within which this Article
Bedford Jr., John Dickinson, Richard Bassett, Delaware - George Read, Gunning
been seven Years a Citizen of the United States, and who twenty five Years, and
been nine Years a Citizen of the United States, and who shall not, Years, and
been created, or the Emoluments whereof shall have been increased shall have
been increased shall have been created, or the Emoluments whereof shall have
been presented to him, the Same shall be a Law, excepted) after it shall have
been fourteen Years a have attained to the Age of thirty-five Years, and
been elected, and he shall not receive within that Period any other shall have
been such Trial shall be held in the State where the said Crimes shall have
been committed, which district shall have been previously shall have
been previously shall have been committed, which district shall have
been duly convicted, shall exist within the United whereof the party shall have
been ratified as an 3. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have
been ratified; and the terms of their successors shall then article had not
been chosen before the time fixed for President. If a President shall not have
been ratified as an 6. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have
been ratified as an 3. The article shall be inoperative unless it shall have
been ratified as an 2. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have
before it become a Law, be presented to the President of the United shall,
before the Same shall be presented to the President of the United States; and
before directed to be taken. Census or Enumeration herein
Before he enter on the Execution of his Office, he shall take the following
before mentioned, the supreme Court shall Jurisdiction. In all the other Cases
before the Adoption of this All Debts contracted and Engagements entered into,
before mentioned, and the Members of the The Senators and Representatives
before the fourth day of March next following, then shall devolve upon them,
before it becomes valid as part of the Constitution. any Senator chosen
before the time fixed for President. If a President shall not have been chosen
begin at noon on the 3d day of January, unless they shall by law appoint shall
begin.
beginning of the term of the President, the 3. If, at the time fixed for the
beginning of his term, or if the President elect shall have failed to the
Behavior, and, with the Concurrence of two-thirds, expel a Member. disorderly
Behavior, and shall, at stated Times, receive for their Offices during good
being disapproved by him, shall shall take Effect, shall be approved by him, or
being necessary to the security of a free State, the A well regulated Militia,
being twenty-one years of age, and citizens of the inhabitants of such State,
belonging to the United Regulations respecting the Territory or other Property
Benjamin Franklin, Thomas Mifflin, Robert Morris, George Clymer, Pennsylvania -
best of my Ability, preserve, President of the United States, and will to the
between them, with Houses, or either of them, and in Case of Disagreement
between two or more States; between a State and Citizens of Controversies
between a State and Citizens of Controversies between two or more States;
between Citizens of different States; between Citizens of the another State;
between Citizens of the another State; between Citizens of different States;
between a same State claiming Lands under Grants of different States, and
between the States so ratifying the Same. Establishment of this Constitution
beverage purposes is hereby prohibited. the jurisdiction thereof for
Bill which shall have passed the House of Representatives and the Senate, Every
Bill shall be entered on the Journal of each House respectively. If against the
Bill shall not be returned by the President within ten Days (Sundays any
Bill of Attainder or ex post facto Law shall be passed. No
Bill of Attainder, gold and silver Coin a Tender in Payment of Debts; pass any
Bill, it such Reconsideration two thirds of that House shall agree to pass the
Bill. to the Rules and Limitations prescribed in the Case of a
bills for raising Revenue shall originate in the House of Representatives; All
Bills of Credit; make any Thing but of Marque and Reprisal; coin Money; emit
Bills. but the Senate may propose or concur with Amendments as on other
Blair, James Madison Jr. Virginia - John
Blessings of Liberty to defence, promote the general Welfare, and secure the
Blood, or Forfeiture except Attainder of Treason shall work Corruption of
Blount, Richard Dobbs Spaight, Hugh Williamson North Carolina - William
body as Congress may by law of the executive departments or of such other
body as Congress may by law provide, the executive department or of such other
born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States, at No person except a natural
born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the 1. All persons
borrow money on the credit of the United States; To
both Houses shall be shall become a Law. But in all such Cases the Votes of
both of Law provide for the Case of Removal, Death, Resignation or Inability,
both necessary and expedient; he may, on extraordinary Occasions, convene
both of the supreme and inferior Courts, shall hold establish. The Judges,
both as to Law and Fact, with such Exceptions, and have appellate Jurisdiction,
both Houses shall deem it necessary, shall The Congress, whenever two thirds of
both of several State Legislatures, and all executive and judicial Officers,
both Houses of Congress. confirmation by a majority vote of
both Houses that the President is unable to discharge the two thirds vote of
bound to Service for a Term of Years, and excluding Indians not including those
bound to, or from, Ports of one State over those of another: nor shall Vessels
bound thereby, any Thing in the Constitution or Judges in every State shall be
bound by Oath or the United States and of the several States, shall be
bounties for services in including debts incurred for payment of pensions and
Branch of have the Qualifications requisite for Electors of the most numerous
branch of the State legislatures. requisite for electors of the most numerous
Breach of the States. They shall in all Cases, except Treason, Felony and
Brearley, William Paterson, Jonathan New Jersey - William Livingston, David
Bribery, or other high Crimes and Misdemeanors.
Broom Jacob
Buildings; And Forts, Magazines, Arsenals, dock-Yards, and other needful
Business; but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day, and may be
but each State Representatives shall not exceed one for every thirty Thousand,
but The Vice President of the United States shall be President of the Senate,
but the Party convicted shall nevertheless be Profit under the United States:
but the Congress may at any time by Law make or alter such Regulations, except
but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day, and may be Business;
but the Senate may propose or concur with Amendments as on other Bills.
but if not he shall return it, with his States; If he approve he shall sign it,
But in all such Cases the Votes of both Houses shall be shall become a Law.
but all Duties, Imposts and Excises shall be Welfare of the United States;
but no Appropriation of Money to that Use shall be To raise and support Armies,
but a tax or duty may be imposed the Year one thousand eight hundred and eight,
but in Consequence of Appropriations No Money shall be drawn from the Treasury,
but of Marque and Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills of Credit; make any Thing
but no Senator or to which the State may be entitled in the Congress:
But in choosing the President, the Votes shall be Manner choose the President.
But if there Number of Votes of the Electors shall be the Vice President.
but the Congress otherwise provided for, and which shall be established by Law:
but when not committed within any State, the Trial shall be at such committed;
but no The Congress shall have power to declare the Punishment of Treason,
But shall be delivered up on Claim be discharged from such Service or Labour,
but no new States New States may be admitted by the Congress into this Union;
but no religious Test shall ever be Affirmation, to support this Constitution;
but in a manner to be prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor in time of war,
but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or no Warrants shall issue,
But in choosing the President, the votes shall be taken by the President.
But no person majority of the whole number shall be necessary to a choice.
But when the right to vote at any election for the excluding Indians not taxed.
But Congress may by a vote of two-thirds of each House, remove enemies thereof.
But neither the suppressing insurrection or rebellion, shall not be questioned.
but all such debts, obligations and the loss or emancipation of any slave;
But this shall be elected to the office of the President more than once.
but in no event more than the least populous State; they shall be in a State,
but they shall be considered, for addition to those appointed by the States,
Butler Pierce
by the People of the several States, and the Electors in each State shall Year
by adding to the whole Number of free Persons, which shall be determined
by Law direct. The Number of Years, in such Manner as they shall
by the Legislature thereof, for six Years; and each Senator shall State, chosen
by Resignation, or otherwise, chosen every second Year; and if Vacancies happen
by the Legislature thereof; Representatives, shall be prescribed in each State
by Law make or alter such Regulations, except but the Congress may at any time
by Law appoint a be on the first Monday in December, unless they shall
by Law, and paid out of the Treasury of the United Services, to be ascertained
by which it shall be sent, together with the Objections, to the other House,
by two thirds of that House, it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved
by Yeas and Nays, and the Names of the Persons voting for and determined
by the President within ten Days (Sundays any Bill shall not be returned
by their Adjournment in like Manner as if he had signed it, unless the Congress
by him, or being disapproved by him, shall shall take Effect, shall be approved
by him, shall shall take Effect, shall be approved by him, or being disapproved
by two thirds of the Senate and House of Representatives, according be repassed
by securing for limited To promote the Progress of Science and useful Arts,
by Congress; prescribed
by Cession of particular States, and (not exceeding ten Miles square) as may,
by the Consent States, and to exercise like Authority over all Places purchased
by this Execution the foregoing Powers, and all other Powers vested
by the Congress prior to shall think proper to admit, shall not be prohibited
by any Regulation of Commerce or Revenue to the No Preference shall be given
by Law; and a regular Statement and Account of the Receipts and made
by the United States: And no Person No Title of Nobility shall be granted
by its inspection Laws: and the net Produce of all Duties and Imposts, laid
by Ballot for two The Electors shall meet in their respective States, and vote
by Ballot one of them for President; and if no Person have a immediately choose
by States, the Representation from each State having one Vote; a quorum taken
by Ballot the Vice-President. them
by Office, the same shall devolve on the Vice President, and the Congress may
by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, to make He shall have Power,
by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, shall appoint nominate, and
by Law: but the Congress otherwise provided for, and which shall be established
by Law vest the Appointment of such inferior Officers, as they think may
by granting Commissions which shall expire at the End the Recess of the Senate,
by Jury; and The Trial of all Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment, shall be
by Law have directed. Place or Places as the Congress may
by general and judicial Proceedings of every other State. And the Congress may
by the Congress into this Union; but no new States New States may be admitted
by the Junction of two or more States, or parts of States, State be formed
by the Legislatures of Purposes, as part of this Constitution, when ratified
by Conventions in three fourths three fourths of the several States, or
by the thereof, as the one or the other Mode of Ratification may be proposed
by Oath or the United States and of the several States, shall be bound
by the Unanimous Consent of the States present the Done in Convention
by consent of the Owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed
by Oath or no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported
by an impartial jury of the State and district wherein the crime public trial,
by law, and to be informed of the nature and cause of the ascertained
by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a dollars, the right of trial
by a dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried
by the people. to deny or disparage others retained
by the Constitution, nor The powers not delegated to the United States
by it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to prohibited
by Citizens of another State, or by Citizens or Subjects of any Foreign State.
by Citizens or Subjects of any Foreign State. by Citizens of another State, or
by ballot for The Electors shall meet in their respective states, and vote
by ballot, President, the House of Representatives shall choose immediately,
by the President. But in choosing the President, the votes shall be taken
by appropriate 2. Congress shall have power to enforce this article
by a vote of two-thirds of each House, remove enemies thereof. But Congress may
by law, 4. The validity of the public debt of the United States, authorized
by appropriate legislation, the 5. The Congress shall have power to enforce,
by the United States or by any State on account of race, color, or abridged
by any State on account of race, color, or abridged by the United States or
by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article
by the people thereof, for six years; and each Senator shall State, elected
by election as the legislature may direct. vacancies
by appropriate legislation. this article
by the legislatures of the several States, as amendment to the Constitution
by the Congress. submission hereof to the States
by the United States or by any State on account of sex. abridged
by any State on account of sex. abridged by the United States or
by appropriate legislation. Congress shall have power to enforce this article
by law appoint shall begin at noon on the 3d day of January, unless they shall
by law provide for the case wherein shall have qualified; and the Congress may
by law provide for the case of the death of any of the 4. The Congress may
by the legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment to the Constitution
by conventions in the several States, as provided amendment to the Constitution
by the Congress. to the States
by the Congress, and shall not prevent any person who may Article was proposed
by the legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment to the Constitution
by the Congress.
by the States, but they shall be considered, for addition to those appointed
by a State; and they shall meet in the District and perform such appointed
by the twelfth article of amendment. duties as provided
by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article
by the United States or any State by reason of failure to denied or abridged
by reason of failure to denied or abridged by the United States or any State
by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article
by a majority vote of both Houses of Congress. confirmation
by the Vice President as Acting President. shall be discharged
by law of the executive departments or of such other body as Congress may
by law provide, the executive department or of such other body as Congress may
by within twenty one days after Congress is required to assemble, determines
by the United States or by any older, to vote shall not be denied or abridged
by any older, to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or
by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce this article
call a Convention for Legislatures of two thirds of the several States, shall
called into the actual States, and of the Militia of the several States, when
calling forth the Militia to execute the Laws of the Union, To provide for
cannot be convened) against domestic Violence.
capital, or otherwise infamous crime, No person shall be held to answer for a
capitation, or other direct, Tax shall be laid, unless in Proportion to the No
Captures on Land and Water;
Care that the Laws be faithfully executed, and shall Commission all shall take
Carolina five, South Carolina five and Georgia three. six, Virginia ten, North
Carolina five and Georgia three. six, Virginia ten, North Carolina five, South
Carolina - William Blount, Richard Dobbs Spaight, Hugh Williamson North
Carolina - John Rutledge, Charles Cotesworth Pinckney, Charles Pinckney, South
Carroll Maryland - James McHenry, Daniel of St Thomas Jenifer, Daniel
carrying into To make all Laws which shall be necessary and proper for
Case it shall not be a Law. prevent its Return, in which
Case of a Bill. to the Rules and Limitations prescribed in the
Case of the Removal of the President from Office, or of his Death, In
Case of Removal, Death, Resignation or Inability, both of Law provide for the
Case of Disagreement between them, with Houses, or either of them, and in
case to be a witness against himself, nor be deprived of life, criminal
case of the death or other the Vice-President shall act as President, as in the
case wherein shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for the
case of the death of any of the 4. The Congress may by law provide for the
case of the the right of choice shall have devolved upon them, and for the
case of the removal of the President from office or of his death or 1. In
Case, after the Choice of the President, the Person having the greatest every
Case, shall be valid to all Intents and proposing Amendments, which, in either
Cases of Impeachment shall not extend further than to removal from Judgment in
Cases the Votes of both Houses shall be shall become a Law. But in all such
Cases whatsoever, over such District To exercise exclusive Legislation in all
Cases of Rebellion or Invasion the public Safety may require it. in
Cases of Impeachment.
Cases affecting Ambassadors, other shall be made, under their Authority; to all
Cases of admiralty and maritime public Ministers and Consuls; to all
Cases affecting Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, and In all
Cases before mentioned, the supreme Court shall Jurisdiction. In all the other
Cases of Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and The Trial of all Crimes, except in
cases arising unless on a presentment or indictment of a Grand Jury, except in
Cases, except Treason, Felony and Breach of the States. They shall in all
Cases, in Law and Equity, arising under The judicial Power shall extend to all
cause of the ascertained by law, and to be informed of the nature and
cause, supported by Oath or no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable
Census or Enumeration herein before directed to be taken.
census or enumeration. without regard to any
certain rights, shall not be construed The enumeration in the Constitution, of
certificates and the votes shall then be counted; Representatives, open all the
Certificates, and the of the Senate and House of Representatives, open all the
certify, and of the Number of Votes for each; which List they shall sign and
certify, and transmit sealed to votes for each, which lists they shall sign and
Cession of particular States, and (not exceeding ten Miles square) as may, by
charged in any State with Treason, Felony, or other Crime, who shall A Person
Charles Cotesworth Pinckney, Charles Pinckney, South Carolina - John Rutledge,
Charles Pinckney, South Carolina - John Rutledge, Charles Cotesworth Pinckney,
Chief Justice shall preside: And no Person shall be United States is tried, the
Chief of the Army and Navy of the United The President shall be Commander in
Choice of the President, the Person having the greatest every Case, after the
choice of Representatives shall not choose a President whenever the right of
choice of electors for President and Vice-President of the United States,
choice shall have devolved upon them, and for the case of the the right of
choice shall have devolved upon them. whenever the right of
Choice. In States, and a Majority of all the States shall be necessary to a
choice. And if the House a majority of all the states shall be necessary to a
choice. But no person majority of the whole number shall be necessary to a
choose three, made, the State of New Hampshire shall be entitled to
choose their Speaker and other Officers; and The House of Representatives shall
choose their other Officers, and also a President pro tempore, The Senate shall
choose by Ballot one of them for President; and if no Person have a immediately
choose the President. But in choosing the President, the Votes shall be Manner
choose from should remain two or more who have equal Votes, the Senate shall
choose immediately, by ballot, President, the House of Representatives shall
choose a President whenever the right of choice of Representatives shall not
choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the on the list, the Senate shall
choose a President whenever persons from whom the House of Representatives may
choose a Vice President death of any of the persons from whom the Senate may
Choosing Senators. as to the Place of
choosing the President, the Votes shall be Manner choose the President. But in
choosing the Electors, and the Day on The Congress may determine the Time of
choosing the President, the votes shall be taken by the President. But in
chosen every second The House of Representatives shall be composed of Members
chosen by the Legislature thereof, for six Years; and each Senator shall State,
chosen every second Year; and if Vacancies happen by Resignation, or otherwise,
chosen for the same Term, be elected, as follows: with the Vice-President
chosen before it becomes valid as part of the Constitution. any Senator
chosen before the time fixed for President. If a President shall not have been
chosen.
chosen. when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State for which he shall be
Citizen of the United States, and who twenty five Years, and been seven Years a
Citizen of the United States, and who shall not, Years, and been nine Years a
Citizen of the United States, at No person except a natural born Citizen, or a
Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States, at No person except a natural born
Citizens of Controversies between two or more States; between a State and
Citizens of different States; between Citizens of the another State; between
Citizens of the another State; between Citizens of different States; between
Citizens thereof, and foreign States, Citizens or Subjects. State, or the
Citizens or Subjects. State, or the Citizens thereof, and foreign States,
Citizens of each State shall be entitled to all Privileges and Immunities The
Citizens in the several States. of
Citizens of another State, or by Citizens or Subjects of any Foreign State. by
Citizens or Subjects of any Foreign State. by Citizens of another State, or by
citizens of the United States and of the State jurisdiction thereof, are
citizens of the United States; nor shall any the privileges or immunities of
citizens of the inhabitants of such State, being twenty-one years of age, and
citizens shall bear to the whole proportion which the number of such male
citizens twenty-one years of age in such State. number of male
citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or 1. The right of
citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or The right of
citizens of the United States to vote in any primary or other 1. The right of
citizens of the United States, who are eighteen years of age or 1. The right of
civil Office under the Authority of the United States which be appointed to any
civil Officers of the United States, The President, Vice President and all
civil or military, under the President and Vice-President, or hold any office,
Claim be discharged from such Service or Labour, But shall be delivered up on
claim for in aid of insurrection or rebellion against the United States, or any
claiming Lands under Grants of different States, and between a same State
Claims of the United States, or of any particular State. any
claims shall be held illegal and void.
Class shall be vacated at the Expiration of the second Senators of the first
Class at the Expiration of the fourth Year, and of the Year, of the second
Class at the Expiration of the sixth Year, so that one third may be third
Classes. The Seats of the they shall be divided as equally as may be into three
Clauses in the Ninth Section of the first Article; and that no State, fourth
clear, or pay Duties in another. one State, be obliged to enter,
Clymer, Pennsylvania - Benjamin Franklin, Thomas Mifflin, Robert Morris, George
coin Money, regulate the Value thereof, and of foreign Coin, and fix the To
Coin To provide for the Punishment of counterfeiting the Securities and current
coin Money; emit Bills of Credit; make any Thing but of Marque and Reprisal;
Coin a Tender in Payment of Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder, gold and silver
Coin, and fix the To coin Money, regulate the Value thereof, and of foreign
collect Taxes, Duties, Imposts and The Congress shall have Power To lay and
collect taxes on incomes, from The Congress shall have power to lay and
color, or abridged by the United States or by any State on account of race,
comfort to the insurrection or rebellion against the same, or given aid or
Comfort. No Person them, or in adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and
Commander in Chief of the Army and Navy of the United The President shall be
commenced or prosecuted against one of the United States suit in law or equity,
Commerce with foreign Nations, and among the several States, and To regulate
Commerce or Revenue to the No Preference shall be given by any Regulation of
Commission all shall take Care that the Laws be faithfully executed, and shall
Commissions which shall expire at the End the Recess of the Senate, by granting
committed on the high Seas, and To define and punish Piracies and Felonies
committed within any State, the Trial shall be at such committed; but when not
committed, which district shall have been previously shall have been
committed; but when not committed within any State, the Trial shall be at such
common establish Justice, insure domestic Tranquility, provide for the
common Defence and general Excises, to pay the Debts and provide for the
common law, where the value in controversy shall exceed twenty In Suits at
common law. according to the rules of the
Compact Troops, or Ships of War in time of Peace, enter into any Agreement or
compel the Attendance of absent Members, in such Manner, and authorized to
compelled in any to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be
Compensation for their The Senators and Representatives shall receive a
Compensation which shall not be diminished during their their Services a
compensation for the services of the Senators and No law, varying the
Compensation, The President shall, at stated Times, receive for his Services, a
compensation. taken for public use, without just
composed of Members chosen every second The House of Representatives shall be
composed of two Senators from each The Senate of the United States shall be
composed of two Senators from each The Senate of the United States shall be
compulsory accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses against him; to have
concerned as well as of without the Consent of the Legislatures of the States
concerning To declare War, grant Letters of Marque and Reprisal, and make Rules
concur with Amendments as on other Bills. but the Senate may propose or
concur; and he shall Treaties, provided two thirds of the Senators present
Concurrence of two thirds of the Members present. convicted without the
Concurrence of two-thirds, expel a Member. disorderly Behavior, and, with the
Concurrence of the Senate and Every Order, Resolution, or Vote to which the
concurrent power to enforce 2. The Congress and the several States shall have
condition of servitude. previous
Confederation. Constitution, as under the
Confederation; grant Letters No State shall enter into any Treaty, Alliance, or
Confession in open Court. same overt Act, or on
confirmation by a majority vote of both Houses of Congress.
confronted with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory accusation; to be
Congress of the All legislative Powers herein granted shall be vested in a
Congress of the United States, and within every subsequent Term of ten of the
Congress may at any time by Law make or alter such Regulations, except but the
Congress shall assemble at least once in every Year, and such Meeting shall The
Congress by their Adjournment in like Manner as if he had signed it, unless the
Congress shall have Power To lay and collect Taxes, Duties, Imposts and The
Congress prior to shall think proper to admit, shall not be prohibited by the
Congress may determine the Time of choosing the Electors, and the Day on The
Congress may by Office, the same shall devolve on the Vice President, and the
Congress otherwise provided for, and which shall be established by Law: but the
Congress Information of the State of the He shall from time to time give to the
Congress may from time to time ordain and and in such inferior Courts as the
Congress shall make. under such Regulations as the
Congress may by Law have directed. Place or Places as the
Congress shall have power to declare the Punishment of Treason, but no The
Congress may by general and judicial Proceedings of every other State. And the
Congress into this Union; but no new States New States may be admitted by the
Congress shall have Power to dispose of and make all needful Rules and The
Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or
Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2.
Congress may by a vote of two-thirds of each House, remove enemies thereof. But
Congress shall have power to enforce, by appropriate legislation, the 5. The
Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The
Congress shall have power to lay and collect taxes on incomes, from The
Congress and the several States shall have concurrent power to enforce 2. The
Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.
Congress shall assemble at least once in every year, and such meeting 2. The
Congress may by law provide for the case wherein shall have qualified; and the
Congress may by law provide for the case of the death of any of the 4. The
Congress may direct: A number of electors of appoint in such manner as the
Congress to which the District would be entitled if it were Representatives in
Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The
Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The
Congress may by law of the executive departments or of such other body as
Congress may by law provide, the executive department or of such other body as
Congress shall decide the issue, assembling within forty eight hours for that
Congress is not in session, receipt of the latter written declaration, or, if
Congress is required to assemble, determines by within twenty one days after
Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The
Congress, shall, without the Consent of Neither House, during the Session of
Congress, become the Seat of the Government of the United the acceptance of
Congress, accept of any present, Emolument, Office, or Title, of any kind the
Congress, lay any Imposts or Duties No State shall, without the Consent of the
Congress, lay any duty of Tonnage, keep No State shall, without the Consent of
Congress, whenever two thirds of both Houses shall deem it necessary, shall The
Congress, the Executive and Judicial officers of a State, or Representatives in
Congress, or elector of 3. No person shall be a Senator or Representative in
Congress, or as an officer of the United States, or as a member of member of
Congress, and shall not prevent any person who may Article was proposed by the
Congress, shall not be Vice President, or for Senator or Representative in
Congress, within twenty one days after purpose if not in session. If the
Congress. of the
Congress. the
Congress. submission hereof to the States by the
Congress. to the States by the
Congress. by the
Congress. confirmation by a majority vote of both Houses of
Congress: but no Senator or to which the State may be entitled in the
Congress; prescribed by
Congress; Provided that no Amendment which may be made prior to the Year One
Connecticut Massachusetts eight, Rhode Island and Providence Plantations one,
Connecticut - William Samuel Johnson, Roger Sherman
Consent of Neither House, during the Session of Congress, shall, without the
Consent States, and to exercise like Authority over all Places purchased by the
Consent of holding any Office of Profit or Trust under them, shall, without the
Consent of the Congress, lay any Imposts or Duties No State shall, without the
Consent of Congress, lay any duty of Tonnage, keep No State shall, without the
Consent of the Senate, to make He shall have Power, by and with the Advice and
Consent of the Senate, shall appoint nominate, and by and with the Advice and
Consent of the Legislatures of the States concerned as well as of without the
Consent of the States present the Done in Convention by the Unanimous
consent of the Owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by
Consent, shall be deprived of its equal Suffrage in the Senate. without its
Consequence of the first Election, Immediately after they shall be assembled in
Consequence of Appropriations No Money shall be drawn from the Treasury, but in
Consequence of any Law or Regulation therein, escaping into another, shall, in
Consideration such Measures as he shall judge Union, and recommend to their
considered, for addition to those appointed by the States, but they shall be
consist of a Senate and House of Representatives. United States, which shall
consist of a Member or Members from two-thirds of the for this Purpose shall
consist only in levying War against Treason against the United States, shall
consist of a member or members from two-thirds of the states, and purpose shall
consist of two-thirds of the whole number of Senators, and a purpose shall
constitute a Quorum to do its own Members, and a Majority of each shall
constitute Tribunals inferior to the supreme Court; To
constituting the seat of Government of the United States shall 1. The District
Constitution for the ourselves and our Posterity, do ordain and establish this
Constitution in the Government of the United States, or in any Department or
Constitution of the United States." protect and defend the
Constitution shall be so construed as to Prejudice States; and nothing in this
Constitution or Judges in every State shall be bound thereby, any Thing in the
Constitution between the States so ratifying the Same. Establishment of this
Constitution of the United States, shall have engaged in support the
Constitution by the legislatures of the several States, as amendment to the
Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment to the
Constitution of the United States 1. The eighteenth article of amendment to the
Constitution by conventions in the several States, as provided amendment to the
Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment to the
Constitution, shall be eligible to the Office the time of the Adoption of this
Constitution, the Laws of the United States, and Treaties made, or which this
Constitution, or, on the Application of the propose Amendments to this
Constitution, when ratified by the Legislatures of Purposes, as part of this
Constitution, shall be as valid against the United States under this
Constitution, as under the Confederation.
Constitution, and the Laws of the United States which shall be made in This
Constitution, of certain rights, shall not be construed The enumeration in the
Constitution, nor The powers not delegated to the United States by the
Constitution, within seven years from the date of the provided in the
Constitution, within seven years from the date of the submission hereof in the
Constitution. any Senator chosen before it becomes valid as part of the
Constitution; but no religious Test shall ever be Affirmation, to support this
constitutional disability of the President.
constitutionally ineligible to the office of President shall be eligible to
construed as to Prejudice States; and nothing in this Constitution shall be so
construed The enumeration in the Constitution, of certain rights, shall not be
construed to extend to any The Judicial power of the United States shall not be
construed as to affect the election or term of This amendment shall not be so
Consuls, Judges of the supreme Court, Ambassadors, other public Ministers and
Consuls, and In all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other public Ministers and
Consuls; to all Cases of admiralty and maritime public Ministers and
Continuance in Office. shall be a Member of either House during his
Continuance in Office.
continue to discharge powers and duties of his office, the Vice President shall
contracted and Engagements entered into, before the Adoption of this All Debts
Contracts, or grant any ex post facto Law, or Law impairing the Obligation of
Contrary notwithstanding. Laws of any State to the
contrary, such powers and duties transmits to them a written declaration to the
Control United States; and all such Laws shall be subject to the Revision and
Controversies to which the United States shall be a Party; to Jurisdiction; to
Controversies between two or more States; between a State and Citizens of
controversy shall exceed twenty In Suits at common law, where the value in
convene both necessary and expedient; he may, on extraordinary Occasions,
convened) against domestic Violence. cannot be
Convention for Legislatures of two thirds of the several States, shall call a
Convention by the Unanimous Consent of the States present the Done in
Conventions in three fourths three fourths of the several States, or by
Conventions of nine States, shall be sufficient for the The Ratification of the
conventions in the several States, as provided amendment to the Constitution by
convicted without the Concurrence of two thirds of the Members present.
convicted shall nevertheless be Profit under the United States: but the Party
convicted of Treason unless on the Testimony of two Witnesses to the shall be
convicted, shall exist within the United whereof the party shall have been duly
Conviction of, Treason, shall be removed from Office on Impeachment for, and
Corpus shall not be suspended, unless when The privilege of the Writ of Habeas
Corruption of Blood, or Forfeiture except Attainder of Treason shall work
Cotesworth Pinckney, Charles Pinckney, South Carolina - John Rutledge, Charles
Counsel for his defence.
counted. The Person having the greatest Number of Votes Votes shall then be
counted; Representatives, open all the certificates and the votes shall then be
counterfeiting the Securities and current Coin To provide for the Punishment of
counting the whole number of persons in each State, their respective numbers,
Court shall have original those in which a State shall be Party, the supreme
Court shall Jurisdiction. In all the other Cases before mentioned, the supreme
Court of the United States, than jury, shall be otherwise re-examined in any
Court, Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, Judges of the supreme
Court, The judicial Power of the United States, shall be vested in one supreme
Court. same overt Act, or on Confession in open
Court; To constitute Tribunals inferior to the supreme
Courts of Law, or in the Heads of proper, in the President alone, in the
Courts as the Congress may from time to time ordain and and in such inferior
Courts, shall hold establish. The Judges, both of the supreme and inferior
created, or the Emoluments whereof shall have been increased shall have been
credit of the United States; To borrow money on the
Credit shall be given in each State to the public Acts, Records, Full Faith and
Credit; make any Thing but of Marque and Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills of
crime public trial, by an impartial jury of the State and district wherein the
crime 1. Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude, except as a punishment for
Crime, who shall A Person charged in any State with Treason, Felony, or other
crime, No person shall be held to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous
crime, the basis of representation therein shall be reduced in the or other
Crime. removed to the State having Jurisdiction of the
Crimes and Misdemeanors. Bribery, or other high
Crimes shall have been such Trial shall be held in the State where the said
Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and The Trial of all
criminal case to be a witness against himself, nor be deprived of life,
criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy and In all
cruel Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor
current Coin To provide for the Punishment of counterfeiting the Securities and
Danger as will not admit of delay. invaded, or in such imminent
danger; nor shall any person be subject for the same offense of War or public
Daniel of St Thomas Jenifer, Daniel Carroll Maryland - James McHenry,
Daniel Carroll Maryland - James McHenry, Daniel of St Thomas Jenifer,
date of the provided in the Constitution, within seven years from the
date of its submission. several States within seven years from the
date of the submission hereof in the Constitution, within seven years from the
date of its submission to the States several States within seven years from the
David Brearley, William Paterson, Jonathan New Jersey - William Livingston,
day to day, and may be Business; but a smaller number may adjourn from
Day on The Congress may determine the Time of choosing the Electors, and the
Day shall be the same throughout the which they shall give their Votes; which
Day of September in the Year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred Seventeenth
day of March next following, then shall devolve upon them, before the fourth
day of January, and the terms of Senators and Representatives at noon on the 3d
day of January, of the years in which such terms would have ended if this
day of January, unless they shall by law appoint shall begin at noon on the 3d
day of October following the 5. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on the 15th
day, and may be Business; but a smaller number may adjourn from day to
Day. different
day. a different
Days (Sundays any Bill shall not be returned by the President within ten
days to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the transmit within four
days after purpose if not in session. If the Congress, within twenty one
days after Congress is required to assemble, determines by within twenty one
days, nor to any other Place than that the other, adjourn for more than three
Dayton
death or other the Vice-President shall act as President, as in the case of the
death of any of the 4. The Congress may by law provide for the case of the
death of any of the persons from whom the Senate may choose a Vice President
death or 1. In case of the removal of the President from office or of his
Death, In Case of the Removal of the President from Office, or of his
Death, Resignation or Inability, both of Law provide for the Case of Removal,
Debate in either House, they shall not be questioned in any other any Speech or
debt of the United States, authorized by law, 4. The validity of the public
debt or obligation incurred United States nor any State shall assume or pay any
Debts and provide for the common Defence and general Excises, to pay the
Debts contracted and Engagements entered into, before the Adoption of this All
debts incurred for payment of pensions and bounties for services in including
debts, obligations and the loss or emancipation of any slave; but all such
Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder, gold and silver Coin a Tender in Payment of
December, unless they shall by Law appoint a be on the first Monday in
decide the issue, assembling within forty eight hours for that Congress shall
declaration that he and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written
declaration to the contrary, such powers and duties transmits to them a written
declaration that the President is the House of Representatives their written
declaration Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written
declaration that the Speaker of the House of Representatives their written
declaration, or, if Congress is not in session, receipt of the latter written
declare War, grant Letters of Marque and Reprisal, and make Rules concerning To
declare the Punishment of Treason, but no The Congress shall have power to
declaring what Officer shall then act as the President and Vice President,
declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in which one who is to
deem it necessary, shall The Congress, whenever two thirds of both Houses shall
Defence and general Excises, to pay the Debts and provide for the common
defence, promote the general Welfare, and secure the Blessings of Liberty to
defence. Counsel for his
defend the Constitution of the United States." protect and
define and punish Piracies and Felonies committed on the high Seas, and To
Delaware one, Maryland five, New York six, New Jersey four, Pennsylvania eight,
Delaware - George Read, Gunning Bedford Jr., John Dickinson, Richard Bassett,
delay. invaded, or in such imminent Danger as will not admit of
delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor The powers not
delivered up, to be executive Authority of the State from which he fled, be
delivered up on Claim be discharged from such Service or Labour, But shall be
delivery or use therein of intoxicating liquors, in of the United States for
demand of the flee from Justice, and be found in another State, shall on
denied to any of the male the members of the Legislature thereof, is
denied or 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be
denied or The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be
denied or abridged by the United States or any State by reason of failure to
denied or abridged by the United States or by any older, to vote shall not be
deny or disparage others retained by the people. to
deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the law; nor
Department or Constitution in the Government of the United States, or in any
department or of such other body as Congress may by law provide, the executive
departments or of such other body as Congress may by law of the executive
Departments, upon any subject principal Officer in each of the executive
Departments.
deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of State
deprived of its equal Suffrage in the Senate. without its Consent, shall be
deprived of life, criminal case to be a witness against himself, nor be
deputy from Virginia George Washington - President and
derived, without apportionment among the several States, and whatever source
describing the place to be searched, and the affirmation, and particularly
Desire of one fifth of those Present, be entered on the Journal. shall, at the
determine the Rules of its Proceedings, punish its Members for Each House may
determine the Time of choosing the Electors, and the Day on The Congress may
determined by adding to the whole Number of free Persons, which shall be
determined by Yeas and Nays, and the Names of the Persons voting for and
determines by within twenty one days after Congress is required to assemble,
devolve on the Vice President, and the Congress may by Office, the same shall
devolve upon them, before the fourth day of March next following, then shall
devolved upon them, and for the case of the the right of choice shall have
devolved upon them. whenever the right of choice shall have
Dickinson, Richard Bassett, Delaware - George Read, Gunning Bedford Jr., John
died, the Vice President elect shall become President elect shall have
different Day.
different States; between Citizens of the another State; between Citizens of
different States, and between a same State claiming Lands under Grants of
different day. a
diminished during the Period for which he which shall neither be increased nor
diminished during their their Services a Compensation which shall not be
direct Taxes shall be apportioned among the several States Representatives and
direct, Tax shall be laid, unless in Proportion to the No capitation, or other
direct, Each State shall appoint, in such Manner as the Legislature thereof may
direct. The Number of Years, in such Manner as they shall by Law
direct. vacancies by election as the legislature may
direct: A number of electors of appoint in such manner as the Congress may
directed to be taken. Census or Enumeration herein before
directed to transmit sealed to the Seat of the Government of the United States,
directed to the President of the seat of the government of the United States,
directed. Place or Places as the Congress may by Law have
Disability be President, and such Officer shall act accordingly, until the
disability of the President. constitutional
disability. such
Disagreement between them, with Houses, or either of them, and in Case of
disapproved by him, shall shall take Effect, shall be approved by him, or being
discharge the Powers and Duties of the said Resignation, or Inability to
discharge the powers and duties of his office, and until he is unable to
discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Vice President unable to
discharge the powers and duties of his office. Thereupon President is unable to
discharge the two thirds vote of both Houses that the President is unable to
discharge powers and duties of his office, the Vice President shall continue to
discharged from such Service or Labour, But shall be delivered up on Claim be
discharged by the Vice President as Acting President. shall be
discipline and the Authority of training the Militia according to the
disciplining, the Militia, and for To provide for organizing, arming, and
Discoveries; and
disorderly Behavior, and, with the Concurrence of two-thirds, expel a Member.
disparage others retained by the people. to deny or
dispose of and make all needful Rules and The Congress shall have Power to
disqualification to hold and enjoy any Office of honor, Trust or Office, and
distinct ballots the person voted for as voted for as President, and in
distinct lists of all persons voted for as Vice-President, and they shall make
District To exercise exclusive Legislation in all Cases whatsoever, over such
district wherein the crime public trial, by an impartial jury of the State and
district shall have been previously shall have been committed, which
District constituting the seat of Government of the United States shall 1. The
District would be entitled if it were Representatives in Congress to which the
District and perform such appointed by a State; and they shall meet in the
divided as equally as may be into three Classes. The Seats of the they shall be
divided. shall have no Vote, unless they be equally
do ordain and establish this Constitution for the ourselves and our Posterity,
do its own Members, and a Majority of each shall constitute a Quorum to
do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office of "I
Dobbs Spaight, Hugh Williamson North Carolina - William Blount, Richard
dock-Yards, and other needful Buildings; And Forts, Magazines, Arsenals,
dollars for each Person. on such Importation, not exceeding ten
dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a
domestic Tranquility, provide for the common establish Justice, insure
domestic Violence. cannot be convened) against
Done in Convention by the Unanimous Consent of the States present the
drawn from the Treasury, but in Consequence of Appropriations No Money shall be
due process of law; nor shall private property be liberty, or property, without
due process of State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without
due. of the Party to whom such Service or Labour may be
duly convicted, shall exist within the United whereof the party shall have been
during the Recess of the Legislature of any State, the Executive thereof may
during the Session of Congress, shall, without the Consent of Neither House,
during their Attendance at the Session of Peace, be privileged from Arrest
during the Time for which he was elected, No Senator or Representative shall,
during such time; and no Person holding any Office under the United States,
during his Continuance in Office. shall be a Member of either House
during the Term of four Years, and, together America. He shall hold his Office
during the Period for which he which shall neither be increased nor diminished
during The President shall have Power to fill up all Vacancies that may happen
during good Behavior, and shall, at stated Times, receive for their Offices
during their their Services a Compensation which shall not be diminished
during the Life of the Person attainted.
during the term be holding the office of President, or acting as President,
during the remainder of such term. President or acting as President
Duties in another. one State, be obliged to enter, clear, or pay
Duties No State shall, without the Consent of the Congress, lay any Imposts or
Duties and Imposts, laid by its inspection Laws: and the net Produce of all
Duties of the said Resignation, or Inability to discharge the Powers and
Duties of their respective Offices, and he shall have Power to relating to the
duties as provided by the twelfth article of amendment.
duties of his office, and until he is unable to discharge the powers and
duties transmits to them a written declaration to the contrary, such powers and
duties of his office, the Vice President unable to discharge the powers and
duties of the office as Acting shall immediately assume the powers and
duties of his office that no inability exists, he shall resume the powers and
duties of his office. Thereupon President is unable to discharge the powers and
duties of his office, the Vice President shall continue to discharge powers and
duties of his office. and
Duties, Imposts and The Congress shall have Power To lay and collect Taxes,
Duties, Imposts and Excises shall be Welfare of the United States; but all
duty may be imposed the Year one thousand eight hundred and eight, but a tax or
Duty shall be laid on Articles exported from any State. No Tax or
duty of Tonnage, keep No State shall, without the Consent of Congress, lay any
each State shall Year by the People of the several States, and the Electors in
each State Representatives shall not exceed one for every thirty Thousand, but
each The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from
each Senator shall State, chosen by the Legislature thereof, for six Years; and
each State by the Legislature thereof; Representatives, shall be prescribed in
Each House shall be the Judge of the Elections, Returns and Qualifications of
each shall constitute a Quorum to do its own Members, and a Majority of
each House may provide. under such Penalties as
Each House may determine the Rules of its Proceedings, punish its Members for
Each House shall keep a Journal of its Proceedings, and from time to time
each House respectively. If against the Bill shall be entered on the Journal of
each Person. on such Importation, not exceeding ten dollars for
Each State shall appoint, in such Manner as the Legislature thereof may direct,
each State having one Vote; a quorum taken by States, the Representation from
each of the executive Departments, upon any subject principal Officer in
each State to the public Acts, Records, Full Faith and Credit shall be given in
each State shall be entitled to all Privileges and Immunities The Citizens of
each of them against Invasion; and on Form of Government, and shall protect
each state having one vote; a quorum for this states, the representation from
each State, their respective numbers, counting the whole number of persons in
each House, remove enemies thereof. But Congress may by a vote of two-thirds of
each The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from
each Senator shall State, elected by the people thereof, for six years; and
each State shall have the qualifications have one vote. The electors in
each, which lists they shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to votes for
each; which List they shall sign and certify, and of the Number of Votes for
Effect thereof. proved, and the
effect on the 15th day of October following the 5. Sections 1 and 2 shall take
Effect, shall be approved by him, or being disapproved by him, shall shall take
effect, until an election of Representatives shall Representatives, shall take
effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and
eight hundred and eight, but a tax or duty may be imposed the Year one thousand
eight hundred and eight shall in any Manner affect the first and thousand
eight shall in any Manner affect the first and thousand eight hundred and
eight hours for that Congress shall decide the issue, assembling within forty
eight, Rhode Island and Providence Plantations one, Connecticut Massachusetts
eight, Delaware one, Maryland five, New York six, New Jersey four, Pennsylvania
eight, but a tax or duty may be imposed the Year one thousand eight hundred and
eighteen years of age or 1. The right of citizens of the United States, who are
eighteenth article of amendment to the Constitution of the United States 1. The
Eighty seven and of the Independence of the United States of America the and
either House on any question Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays of the Members of
either House, they shall not be questioned in any other any Speech or Debate in
either House during his Continuance in Office. shall be a Member of
either of them, and in Case of Disagreement between them, with Houses, or
either Case, shall be valid to all Intents and proposing Amendments, which, in
either the principal officers 4. Whenever the Vice President and a majority of
either the principal officers of unless the Vice President and a majority of
elect shall have died, the Vice President elect shall become President
elect shall become President elect shall have died, the Vice President
elect shall have failed to the beginning of his term, or if the President
elect shall act as President until a President qualify, then the Vice President
elect nor a Vice President elect shall have qualified, neither a President
elect shall have qualified, neither a President elect nor a Vice President
elected by the people thereof, for six years; and each Senator shall State,
elected to the office of the President more than twice, 1. No person shall be
elected President more than two years of a term to which some other person was
elected to the office of the President more than once. But this shall be
elected, be an Inhabitant of that State in which he shall be shall not, when
elected, be an Inhabitant of that State for which he shall be chosen. when
elected, No Senator or Representative shall, during the Time for which he was
elected, as follows: with the Vice-President chosen for the same Term, be
elected, and he shall not receive within that Period any other shall have been
elected. removed, or a President shall be
Election to fill such Vacancies. Authority thereof shall issue Writs of
election for the excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right to vote at any
election to fill such executive authority of such State shall issue writs of
election as the legislature may direct. vacancies by
election or term of This amendment shall not be so construed as to affect the
election of President and Vice President, to be electors the purposes of the
election for President or Vice President, for electors for President or
election of Representatives shall Representatives, shall take effect, until an
Election, Immediately after they shall be assembled in Consequence of the first
Elections for Senators and The Times, Places and Manner of holding
Elections, Returns and Qualifications of Each House shall be the Judge of the
elector of 3. No person shall be a Senator or Representative in Congress, or
Elector. States, shall be appointed an
Electors in each State shall Year by the People of the several States, and the
Electors of the most numerous Branch of have the Qualifications requisite for
Electors shall meet in their respective States, and vote by Ballot for two The
Electors appointed; and if there be more than one who have such Majority, and
Electors shall be the Vice President. But if there Number of Votes of the
Electors shall meet in their respective states, and vote by ballot for The
Electors President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of
Electors Vice-President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of
electors for President and Vice-President of the United States, choice of
electors in each State shall have the qualifications have one vote. The
electors of the most numerous branch of the State legislatures. requisite for
electors of appoint in such manner as the Congress may direct: A number of
electors the purposes of the election of President and Vice President, to be
electors for President or election for President or Vice President, for
Electors, equal to the whole Number of Senators and Representatives a Number of
Electors, and the Day on The Congress may determine the Time of choosing the
eligible to the Office the time of the Adoption of this Constitution, shall be
eligible to that Office who shall not of President; neither shall any Person be
eligible to constitutionally ineligible to the office of President shall be
emancipation of any slave; but all such debts, obligations and the loss or
emit Bills of Credit; make any Thing but of Marque and Reprisal; coin Money;
Emolument from the United States, or any of them.
Emolument, Office, or Title, of any kind the Congress, accept of any present,
Emoluments whereof shall have been increased shall have been created, or the
employed in the Service of the United governing such Part of them as may be
empower the vacancies: Provided, That the legislature of any State may
End the Recess of the Senate, by granting Commissions which shall expire at the
end at noon on the 20th 1. The terms of the President and Vice President shall
ended if this day of January, of the years in which such terms would have
enemies thereof. But Congress may by a vote of two-thirds of each House, remove
Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort. No Person them, or in adhering to their
enforce this article by appropriate 2. Congress shall have power to
enforce any law which shall abridge wherein they reside. No State shall make or
enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to
enforce 2. The Congress and the several States shall have concurrent power to
enforce this article by appropriate legislation. Congress shall have power to
enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to
enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to
enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to
enforce, by appropriate legislation, the 5. The Congress shall have power to
engage in War, unless actually with another State, or with a foreign Power, or
engaged in support the Constitution of the United States, shall have
Engagements entered into, before the Adoption of this All Debts contracted and
enjoy any Office of honor, Trust or Office, and disqualification to hold and
enjoy the right to a speedy and In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall
enter the Objections to that House in which it shall have originated, who shall
enter into any Treaty, Alliance, or Confederation; grant Letters No State shall
enter into any Agreement or Compact Troops, or Ships of War in time of Peace,
enter on the Execution of his Office, he shall take the following Before he
enter, clear, or pay Duties in another. one State, be obliged to
entered on the Journal. shall, at the Desire of one fifth of those Present, be
entered on the Journal of each House respectively. If against the Bill shall be
entered into, before the Adoption of this All Debts contracted and Engagements
entitled to choose three, made, the State of New Hampshire shall be
entitled in the Congress: but no Senator or to which the State may be
entitled to all Privileges and Immunities The Citizens of each State shall be
entitled if it were Representatives in Congress to which the District would be
Enumeration shall be made within three Years after the first Meeting The actual
enumeration shall be shall have at Least one Representative; and until such
Enumeration herein before directed to be taken. Census or
enumeration in the Constitution, of certain rights, shall not be construed The
enumeration. without regard to any census or
equal to the whole Number of Senators and Representatives a Number of Electors,
equal Number of Votes, then the House of Representatives shall have an
equal Votes, the Senate shall choose from should remain two or more who have
equal Suffrage in the Senate. without its Consent, shall be deprived of its
equal protection of the law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the
equal to the whole number of Senators and President and Vice President
equally as may be into three Classes. The Seats of the they shall be divided as
equally divided. shall have no Vote, unless they be
Equity, arising under The judicial Power shall extend to all Cases, in Law and
equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of the United States suit in law or
erected within the Jurisdiction of any other State; nor any shall be formed or
Erection of of the Legislature of the State in which the Same shall be, for the
escaping into another, shall, in Consequence of any Law or Regulation therein,
establish Justice, insure domestic Tranquility, provide for the common
establish this Constitution for the ourselves and our Posterity, do ordain and
establish an uniform Rule of Naturalization, and uniform Laws on the subject To
establish Post Offices and Post Roads; To
establish. The Judges, both of the supreme and inferior Courts, shall hold
established by Law: but the Congress otherwise provided for, and which shall be
Establishment of this Constitution between the States so ratifying the Same.
establishment of religion, or Congress shall make no law respecting an
event more than the least populous State; they shall be in a State, but in no
ever be Affirmation, to support this Constitution; but no religious Test shall
every second The House of Representatives shall be composed of Members chosen
every subsequent Term of ten of the Congress of the United States, and within
every thirty Thousand, but each State Representatives shall not exceed one for
every second Year; and if Vacancies happen by Resignation, or otherwise, chosen
every Year, and such Meeting shall The Congress shall assemble at least once in
Every Bill which shall have passed the House of Representatives and the Senate,
Every Order, Resolution, or Vote to which the Concurrence of the Senate and
every Case, after the Choice of the President, the Person having the greatest
every other State. And the Congress may by general and judicial Proceedings of
every State in this Union a Republican The United States shall guarantee to
every State shall be bound thereby, any Thing in the Constitution or Judges in
every year, and such meeting 2. The Congress shall assemble at least once in
ex post facto Law shall be passed. No Bill of Attainder or
ex post facto Law, or Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts, or grant any
exceed one for every thirty Thousand, but each State Representatives shall not
exceed twenty In Suits at common law, where the value in controversy shall
exceeding ten Miles square) as may, by Cession of particular States, and (not
exceeding ten dollars for each Person. on such Importation, not
exceeding three on the list of those voted for as the highest numbers not
except but the Congress may at any time by Law make or alter such Regulations,
except Treason, Felony and Breach of the States. They shall in all Cases,
except what may be absolutely necessary for executing on Imports or Exports,
except a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States, at No person
except in Grant Reprieves and Pardons for Offenses against the United States,
except in Cases of Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and The Trial of all Crimes,
except Attainder of Treason shall work Corruption of Blood, or Forfeiture
except in cases arising unless on a presentment or indictment of a Grand Jury,
except as a punishment for crime 1. Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude,
except for participation in rebellion, United States, or in any way abridged,
excepted) after it shall have been presented to him, the Same shall be a Law,
excepting such Parts as may in their Judgment require publish the same,
Exceptions, and have appellate Jurisdiction, both as to Law and Fact, with such
Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel
excessive fines imposed, nor cruel Excessive bail shall not be required, nor
Excises shall be Welfare of the United States; but all Duties, Imposts and
Excises, to pay the Debts and provide for the common Defence and general
excluding Indians not including those bound to Service for a Term of Years, and
excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right to vote at any election for the
exclusive Right to their respective Writings Times to Authors and Inventors the
exclusive Legislation in all Cases whatsoever, over such District To exercise
execute the Laws of the Union, To provide for calling forth the Militia to
execute the Office of "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully
executed, and shall Commission all shall take Care that the Laws be faithfully
executing on Imports or Exports, except what may be absolutely necessary for
Execution the foregoing Powers, and all other Powers vested by this
Execution of his Office, he shall take the following Before he enter on the
Executive When vacancies happen in the Representation from any State, the
Executive thereof may during the Recess of the Legislature of any State, the
executive Power shall be vested in a President of the United States of The
executive Departments, upon any subject principal Officer in each of the
executive Authority of the State from which he fled, be delivered up, to be
Executive (when the Legislature Application of the Legislature, or of the
executive and judicial Officers, both of several State Legislatures, and all
Executive and Judicial officers of a State, or Representatives in Congress, the
executive or judicial officer of any State, to any State legislature, or as an
executive authority of such State shall issue writs of election to fill such
executive thereof to make temporary appointments until the people fill the
executive departments or of such other body as Congress may by law of the
executive department or of such other body as Congress may by law provide, the
exercise the Office of in the absence of the Vice President, or when he shall
exercise exclusive Legislation in all Cases whatsoever, over such District To
exercise like Authority over all Places purchased by the Consent States, and to
exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or prohibiting the free
exist within the United whereof the party shall have been duly convicted, shall
existing The Migration or Importation of such Persons as any of the States now
exists, he shall resume the powers and duties of his office that no inability
expedient; he may, on extraordinary Occasions, convene both necessary and
expel a Member. disorderly Behavior, and, with the Concurrence of two-thirds,
Expenditures of all public Money shall be published from time to time.
Expiration of the second Senators of the first Class shall be vacated at the
Expiration of the fourth Year, and of the Year, of the second Class at the
Expiration of the sixth Year, so that one third may be third Class at the
expire at the End the Recess of the Senate, by granting Commissions which shall
exportation thereof from the United States and all territory subject to or the
exported from any State. No Tax or Duty shall be laid on Articles
Exports, except what may be absolutely necessary for executing on Imports or
Exports, shall be for the Use of the Treasury of the any State on Imports or
extend further than to removal from Judgment in Cases of Impeachment shall not
extend to all Cases, in Law and Equity, arising under The judicial Power shall
extend to any The Judicial power of the United States shall not be construed to
extraordinary Occasions, convene both necessary and expedient; he may, on
fact tried by a dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no
Fact, with such Exceptions, and have appellate Jurisdiction, both as to Law and
facto Law shall be passed. No Bill of Attainder or ex post
facto Law, or Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts, or grant any ex post
failed to the beginning of his term, or if the President elect shall have
failure to denied or abridged by the United States or any State by reason of
Faith and Credit shall be given in each State to the public Acts, Records, Full
faithfully execute the Office of "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will
faithfully executed, and shall Commission all shall take Care that the Laws be
favor, and to have the Assistance of process for obtaining witnesses in his
Felonies committed on the high Seas, and To define and punish Piracies and
Felony and Breach of the States. They shall in all Cases, except Treason,
Felony, or other Crime, who shall A Person charged in any State with Treason,
Few, Abraham Baldwin Georgia - William
fifth of those Present, be entered on the Journal. shall, at the Desire of one
fifths of all other Persons. taxed, three
fill such Vacancies. Authority thereof shall issue Writs of Election to
fill such Vacancies. shall then
fill up all Vacancies that may happen during The President shall have Power to
fill such executive authority of such State shall issue writs of election to
fill the executive thereof to make temporary appointments until the people
fines imposed, nor cruel Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive
first Meeting The actual Enumeration shall be made within three Years after the
first Election, Immediately after they shall be assembled in Consequence of the
first Class shall be vacated at the Expiration of the second Senators of the
first Monday in December, unless they shall by Law appoint a be on the
first and thousand eight hundred and eight shall in any Manner affect the
first Article; and that no State, fourth Clauses in the Ninth Section of the
Fitzsimons, Jared Ingersoll, James Wilson, Gouvernour Morris Thomas
five Years, and been seven Years a Citizen of the United States, and who twenty
five and Georgia three. six, Virginia ten, North Carolina five, South Carolina
five highest on the List the said House shall in like Majority, then from the
five, New York six, New Jersey four, Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one, Maryland
five, South Carolina five and Georgia three. six, Virginia ten, North Carolina
fix the To coin Money, regulate the Value thereof, and of foreign Coin, and
fixed for the beginning of the term of the President, the 3. If, at the time
fixed for President. If a President shall not have been chosen before the time
fled, be delivered up, to be executive Authority of the State from which he
flee from Justice, and be found in another State, shall on demand of the
following Before he enter on the Execution of his Office, he shall take the
following the 5. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on the 15th day of October
following, then shall devolve upon them, before the fourth day of March next
follows: with the Vice-President chosen for the same Term, be elected, as
for the common establish Justice, insure domestic Tranquility, provide
for the ourselves and our Posterity, do ordain and establish this Constitution
for Electors of the most numerous Branch of have the Qualifications requisite
for a Term of Years, and excluding Indians not including those bound to Service
for every thirty Thousand, but each State Representatives shall not exceed one
for six Years; and each Senator shall State, chosen by the Legislature thereof,
for which he shall be chosen. when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State
for The Senate shall have the sole Power to try all Impeachments. When sitting
for Senators and The Times, Places and Manner of holding Elections
for Each House may determine the Rules of its Proceedings, punish its Members
for more than three days, nor to any other Place than that the other, adjourn
for their The Senators and Representatives shall receive a Compensation
for their respective Houses, and in going to and returning from the same; and
for which he was elected, No Senator or Representative shall, during the Time
for raising Revenue shall originate in the House of Representatives; All bills
for and determined by Yeas and Nays, and the Names of the Persons voting
for the common Defence and general Excises, to pay the Debts and provide
for the Punishment of counterfeiting the Securities and current Coin To provide
for limited To promote the Progress of Science and useful Arts, by securing
for a longer Term than two Years;
for the Government and Regulation of the land and naval Forces; To make Rules
for calling forth the Militia to execute the Laws of the Union, To provide
for organizing, arming, and disciplining, the Militia, and for To provide
for To provide for organizing, arming, and disciplining, the Militia, and
for the Erection of of the Legislature of the State in which the Same shall be,
for carrying into To make all Laws which shall be necessary and proper
for each Person. on such Importation, not exceeding ten dollars
for executing on Imports or Exports, except what may be absolutely necessary
for the Use of the Treasury of the any State on Imports or Exports, shall be
for the same Term, be elected, as follows: with the Vice-President chosen
for two The Electors shall meet in their respective States, and vote by Ballot
for each; which List they shall sign and certify, and of the Number of Votes
for President; and if no Person have a immediately choose by Ballot one of them
for this Purpose shall consist of a Member or Members from two-thirds of the
for the Case of Removal, Death, Resignation or Inability, both of Law provide
for his Services, a Compensation, The President shall, at stated Times, receive
for which he which shall neither be increased nor diminished during the Period
for Offenses against the United States, except in Grant Reprieves and Pardons
for their Offices during good Behavior, and shall, at stated Times, receive
for Legislatures of two thirds of the several States, shall call a Convention
for the The Ratification of the Conventions of nine States, shall be sufficient
for a redress of grievances. the Government
for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, No person shall be held to answer
for the same offense of War or public danger; nor shall any person be subject
for public use, without just compensation. taken
for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have the Assistance of process
for his defence. Counsel
for The Electors shall meet in their respective states, and vote by ballot
for as President, and in distinct ballots the person voted for as voted
for as voted for as President, and in distinct ballots the person voted
for as Vice-President, and they shall make distinct lists of all persons voted
for as Vice-President and of the number of President, and of all persons voted
for each, which lists they shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to votes
for President, shall be the The person having the greatest Number of votes
for as the highest numbers not exceeding three on the list of those voted
for this states, the representation from each state having one vote; a quorum
for the on the list, the Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum
for crime 1. Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude, except as a punishment
for the excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right to vote at any election
for President and Vice-President of the United States, choice of electors
for participation in rebellion, United States, or in any way abridged, except
for payment of pensions and bounties for services in including debts incurred
for services in including debts incurred for payment of pensions and bounties
for in aid of insurrection or rebellion against the United States, or any claim
for six years; and each Senator shall State, elected by the people thereof,
for electors of the most numerous branch of the State legislatures. requisite
for beverage purposes is hereby prohibited. the jurisdiction thereof
for the beginning of the term of the President, the 3. If, at the time fixed
for President. If a President shall not have been chosen before the time fixed
for the case wherein shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide
for the case of the death of any of the 4. The Congress may by law provide
for the case of the the right of choice shall have devolved upon them, and
for delivery or use therein of intoxicating liquors, in of the United States
for and no person who has held the office of President, or acted as President,
for addition to those appointed by the States, but they shall be considered,
for President or Vice President, for electors for President or election
for electors for President or election for President or Vice President,
for President or election for President or Vice President, for electors
for Senator or Representative in Congress, shall not be Vice President, or
for that Congress shall decide the issue, assembling within forty eight hours
for the services of the Senators and No law, varying the compensation
for, and with themselves. And they shall make a List of all the Persons voted
for, and which shall be established by Law: but the Congress otherwise provided
for, and Conviction of, Treason, shall be removed from Office on Impeachment
forces, or in the Militia, when in actual service in time in the land or naval
Forces; To make Rules for the Government and Regulation of the land and naval
foregoing Powers, and all other Powers vested by this Execution the
foreign Nations, and among the several States, and To regulate Commerce with
foreign Coin, and fix the To coin Money, regulate the Value thereof, and of
foreign State. whatever, from any King, Prince or
foreign Power, or engage in War, unless actually with another State, or with a
foreign States, Citizens or Subjects. State, or the Citizens thereof, and
Foreign State. by Citizens of another State, or by Citizens or Subjects of any
Forfeiture except Attainder of Treason shall work Corruption of Blood, or
form a more perfect Union, We the People of the United States, in Order to
Form of Government, and shall protect each of them against Invasion; and on
formed or erected within the Jurisdiction of any other State; nor any shall be
formed by the Junction of two or more States, or parts of States, State be
forth the Militia to execute the Laws of the Union, To provide for calling
Forts, Magazines, Arsenals, dock-Yards, and other needful Buildings; And
forty eight hours for that Congress shall decide the issue, assembling within
found in another State, shall on demand of the flee from Justice, and be
four Years, and, together America. He shall hold his Office during the Term of
four days to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the transmit within
four, Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one, Maryland five, New York six, New Jersey
fourteen Years a have attained to the Age of thirty-five Years, and been
fourth Year, and of the Year, of the second Class at the Expiration of the
fourth Clauses in the Ninth Section of the first Article; and that no State,
fourth day of March next following, then shall devolve upon them, before the
fourths of the several States, or by Conventions in three fourths three
fourths three fourths of the several States, or by Conventions in three
Franklin, Thomas Mifflin, Robert Morris, George Clymer, Pennsylvania - Benjamin
free Persons, which shall be determined by adding to the whole Number of
free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or prohibiting the
free State, the A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a
freedom of speech, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the
from any State, the Executive When vacancies happen in the Representation
from each The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators
from Judgment in Cases of Impeachment shall not extend further than to removal
from day to day, and may be Business; but a smaller number may adjourn
from time to time Each House shall keep a Journal of its Proceedings, and
from Arrest during their Attendance at the Session of Peace, be privileged
from the same; and for their respective Houses, and in going to and returning
from any State. No Tax or Duty shall be laid on Articles exported
from the Treasury, but in Consequence of Appropriations No Money shall be drawn
from time to time. Expenditures of all public Money shall be published
from any King, Prince or foreign State. whatever,
from the five highest on the List the said House shall in like Majority, then
from each State having one Vote; a quorum taken by States, the Representation
from two-thirds of the for this Purpose shall consist of a Member or Members
from should remain two or more who have equal Votes, the Senate shall choose
from Office, or of his Death, In Case of the Removal of the President
from the United States, or any of them. Emolument
from time to time give to the Congress Information of the State of the He shall
from Office on Impeachment for, and Conviction of, Treason, shall be removed
from time to time ordain and and in such inferior Courts as the Congress may
from Justice, and be found in another State, shall on demand of the flee
from which he fled, be delivered up, to be executive Authority of the State
from such Service or Labour, But shall be delivered up on Claim be discharged
from Virginia George Washington - President and deputy
from the persons having appointed; and if no person have such majority, then
from each state having one vote; a quorum for this states, the representation
from two-thirds of the states, and purpose shall consist of a member or members
from the two highest numbers appointed, and if no person have a majority, then
from The Congress shall have power to lay and collect taxes on incomes,
from each The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators
from the ratification of this article the manufacture, sale, 1. After one year
from the United States and all territory subject to or the exportation thereof
from the date of the provided in the Constitution, within seven years
from whom the House of Representatives may choose a President whenever persons
from whom the Senate may choose a Vice President death of any of the persons
from the date of its submission. several States within seven years
from the date of the submission hereof in the Constitution, within seven years
from holding the office of within which this Article becomes operative
from the date of its submission to the States several States within seven years
from office or of his death or 1. In case of the removal of the President
from, Ports of one State over those of another: nor shall Vessels bound to, or
Full Faith and Credit shall be given in each State to the public Acts, Records,
further than to removal from Judgment in Cases of Impeachment shall not extend
general Welfare, and secure the Blessings of Liberty to defence, promote the
general Excises, to pay the Debts and provide for the common Defence and
general and judicial Proceedings of every other State. And the Congress may by
George Washington - President and deputy from Virginia
George Clymer, Pennsylvania - Benjamin Franklin, Thomas Mifflin, Robert Morris,
George Read, Gunning Bedford Jr., John Dickinson, Richard Bassett, Delaware -
Georgia three. six, Virginia ten, North Carolina five, South Carolina five and
Georgia - William Few, Abraham Baldwin
Gilman New Hampshire - John Langdon, Nicholas
give their Votes; which Day shall be the same throughout the which they shall
give to the Congress Information of the State of the He shall from time to time
given by any Regulation of Commerce or Revenue to the No Preference shall be
given in each State to the public Acts, Records, Full Faith and Credit shall be
given aid or comfort to the insurrection or rebellion against the same, or
giving them Aid and Comfort. No Person them, or in adhering to their Enemies,
going to and returning from the same; and for their respective Houses, and in
gold and silver Coin a Tender in Payment of Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder,
good Behavior, and shall, at stated Times, receive for their Offices during
Gorham, Rufus King Massachusetts - Nathaniel
Gouvernour Morris Thomas Fitzsimons, Jared Ingersoll, James Wilson,
governing such Part of them as may be employed in the Service of the United
Government and Regulation of the land and naval Forces; To make Rules for the
Government of the United the acceptance of Congress, become the Seat of the
Government of the United States, or in any Department or Constitution in the
Government of the United States, directed to transmit sealed to the Seat of the
Government for a redress of grievances. the
government of the United States, directed to the President of the seat of the
Government of the United States shall 1. The District constituting the seat of
Government, and shall protect each of them against Invasion; and on Form of
Grand Jury, except in cases arising unless on a presentment or indictment of a
grant Letters of Marque and Reprisal, and make Rules concerning To declare War,
grant Letters No State shall enter into any Treaty, Alliance, or Confederation;
grant any ex post facto Law, or Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts, or
Grant Reprieves and Pardons for Offenses against the United States, except in
granted shall be vested in a Congress of the All legislative Powers herein
granted by the United States: And no Person No Title of Nobility shall be
granting Commissions which shall expire at the End the Recess of the Senate, by
Grants of different States, and between a same State claiming Lands under
greatest Number of Votes Votes shall then be counted. The Person having the
greatest every Case, after the Choice of the President, the Person having the
greatest Number of votes for President, shall be the The person having the
greatest number of votes as Vice-President, shall be the The person having the
grievances. the Government for a redress of
guarantee to every State in this Union a Republican The United States shall
Gunning Bedford Jr., John Dickinson, Richard Bassett, Delaware - George Read,
Habeas Corpus shall not be suspended, unless when The privilege of the Writ of
had signed it, unless the Congress by their Adjournment in like Manner as if he
had not been ratified; and the terms of their successors shall then article
Hamilton New York - Alexander
Hampshire shall be entitled to choose three, made, the State of New
Hampshire - John Langdon, Nicholas Gilman New
happen in the Representation from any State, the Executive When vacancies
happen by Resignation, or otherwise, chosen every second Year; and if Vacancies
happen during The President shall have Power to fill up all Vacancies that may
happen in the representation of any State in the Senate, the When vacancies
has held the office of President, or acted as President, for and no person who
have the Qualifications requisite for Electors of the most numerous Branch of
have attained to the Age of No Person shall be a Representative who shall not
have at Least one Representative; and until such enumeration shall be shall
have the sole Power of Impeachment. shall
have one Vote.
have attained to the Age of thirty No person shall be a Senator who shall not
have no Vote, unless they be equally divided. shall
have the sole Power to try all Impeachments. When sitting for The Senate shall
have been created, or the Emoluments whereof shall have been increased shall
have been increased shall have been created, or the Emoluments whereof shall
have passed the House of Representatives and the Senate, Every Bill which shall
have originated, who shall enter the Objections to that House in which it shall
have been presented to him, the Same shall be a Law, excepted) after it shall
have Power To lay and collect Taxes, Duties, Imposts and The Congress shall
have such Majority, and Electors appointed; and if there be more than one who
have an equal Number of Votes, then the House of Representatives shall
have a immediately choose by Ballot one of them for President; and if no Person
have equal Votes, the Senate shall choose from should remain two or more who
have attained to the Age of thirty-five Years, and been fourteen Years a
have been elected, and he shall not receive within that Period any other shall
have Power to relating to the Duties of their respective Offices, and he shall
have Power, by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, to make He shall
have Power to fill up all Vacancies that may happen during The President shall
have original those in which a State shall be Party, the supreme Court shall
have appellate Jurisdiction, both as to Law and Fact, with such Exceptions, and
have been such Trial shall be held in the State where the said Crimes shall
have directed. Place or Places as the Congress may by Law
have power to declare the Punishment of Treason, but no The Congress shall
have Power to dispose of and make all needful Rules and The Congress shall
have hereunto subscribed our Names. Twelfth. In Witness whereof We
have been committed, which district shall have been previously shall
have been previously shall have been committed, which district shall
have compulsory accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses against him; to
have the Assistance of process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to
have such majority, then from the persons having appointed; and if no person
have a majority, then from the two highest numbers appointed, and if no person
have been duly convicted, shall exist within the United whereof the party shall
have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. Congress shall
have engaged in support the Constitution of the United States, shall
have power to enforce, by appropriate legislation, the 5. The Congress shall
have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall
have power to lay and collect taxes on incomes, from The Congress shall
have one vote. The electors in each State shall have the qualifications
have the qualifications have one vote. The electors in each State shall
have concurrent power to enforce 2. The Congress and the several States shall
have been ratified as an 3. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall
have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation. Congress shall
have ended if this day of January, of the years in which such terms would
have died, the Vice President elect shall become President elect shall
have been chosen before the time fixed for President. If a President shall not
have failed to the beginning of his term, or if the President elect shall
have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for the case wherein shall
have qualified, neither a President elect nor a Vice President elect shall
have qualified. or Vice President shall
have devolved upon them, and for the case of the the right of choice shall
have devolved upon them. whenever the right of choice shall
have been ratified as an 6. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall
have been ratified as an 3. The article shall be inoperative unless it shall
have been ratified as an 2. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall
have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall
have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall
have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall
have intervened.
having the greatest Number of Votes Votes shall then be counted. The Person
having one Vote; a quorum taken by States, the Representation from each State
having the greatest every Case, after the Choice of the President, the Person
having Jurisdiction of the Crime. removed to the State
having the greatest Number of votes for President, shall be the The person
having appointed; and if no person have such majority, then from the persons
having one vote; a quorum for this states, the representation from each state
having the greatest number of votes as Vice-President, shall be the The person
having previously taken an oath, as a United States, or under any State, who,
he shall be shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State in which
he shall be chosen. when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State for which
he shall exercise the Office of in the absence of the Vice President, or when
he was elected, No Senator or Representative shall, during the Time for which
he approve he shall sign it, but if not he shall return it, with his States; If
he shall sign it, but if not he shall return it, with his States; If he approve
he shall return it, with his States; If he approve he shall sign it, but if not
he had signed it, unless the Congress by their Adjournment in like Manner as if
He shall hold his Office during the Term of four Years, and, together America.
he which shall neither be increased nor diminished during the Period for which
he shall not receive within that Period any other shall have been elected, and
he enter on the Execution of his Office, he shall take the following Before
he shall take the following Before he enter on the Execution of his Office,
he may require the Opinion, in writing, of the Service of the United States;
he shall have Power to relating to the Duties of their respective Offices, and
He shall have Power, by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, to make
he shall Treaties, provided two thirds of the Senators present concur; and
He shall from time to time give to the Congress Information of the State of the
he shall judge Union, and recommend to their Consideration such Measures as
he may, on extraordinary Occasions, convene both necessary and expedient;
he may adjourn them to such Time as he Respect to the Time of Adjournment,
he Respect to the Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn them to such Time as
he shall receive Ambassadors and other public Ministers; he shall think proper;
he shall think proper; he shall receive Ambassadors and other public Ministers;
he fled, be delivered up, to be executive Authority of the State from which
he and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration that
he is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, and until
he shall resume the powers and duties of his office that no inability exists,
Heads of proper, in the President alone, in the Courts of Law, or in the
held in the State where the said Crimes shall have been such Trial shall be
held to Service or Labour in one State, under the Laws thereof, No Person
held to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, No person shall be
held illegal and void. claims shall be
held the office of President, or acted as President, for and no person who has
hereby prohibited. the jurisdiction thereof for beverage purposes is
hereby repealed. is
hereby prohibited. violation of the laws thereof, is
herein granted shall be vested in a Congress of the All legislative Powers
herein before directed to be taken. Census or Enumeration
herein and all other Officers of the United States, whose Appointments are not
hereof to the States by the Congress. submission
hereof in the Constitution, within seven years from the date of the submission
hereunto subscribed our Names. Twelfth. In Witness whereof We have
high Seas, and To define and punish Piracies and Felonies committed on the
high Crimes and Misdemeanors. Bribery, or other
highest on the List the said House shall in like Majority, then from the five
highest numbers not exceeding three on the list of those voted for as the
highest numbers appointed, and if no person have a majority, then from the two
him, the Same shall be a Law, excepted) after it shall have been presented to
him, or being disapproved by him, shall shall take Effect, shall be approved by
him, shall shall take Effect, shall be approved by him, or being disapproved by
him; to have compulsory accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses against
himself, nor be deprived of life, criminal case to be a witness against
his Continuance in Office. shall be a Member of either House during
his States; If he approve he shall sign it, but if not he shall return it, with
his Office during the Term of four Years, and, together America. He shall hold
his Death, In Case of the Removal of the President from Office, or of
his Services, a Compensation, The President shall, at stated Times, receive for
his Office, he shall take the following Before he enter on the Execution of
his favor, and to have the Assistance of process for obtaining witnesses in
his defence. Counsel for
his term, or if the President elect shall have failed to the beginning of
his death or 1. In case of the removal of the President from office or of
his written declaration that he and the Speaker of the House of Representatives
his office, and until he is unable to discharge the powers and duties of
his office, the Vice President unable to discharge the powers and duties of
his written declaration Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives
his office that no inability exists, he shall resume the powers and duties of
his office. Thereupon President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of
his office, the Vice President shall continue to discharge powers and duties of
his office. and duties of
hold and enjoy any Office of honor, Trust or Office, and disqualification to
hold his Office during the Term of four Years, and, together America. He shall
hold establish. The Judges, both of the supreme and inferior Courts, shall
hold any office, civil or military, under the President and Vice-President, or
holding Elections for Senators and The Times, Places and Manner of
holding any Office under the United States, during such time; and no Person
holding any Office of Profit or Trust under them, shall, without the Consent of
holding an Office of Trust or Profit under the United Representative, or Person
holding the office of President, when this Article shall not apply to any person
holding the office of President, or acting as President, during the term be
holding the office of within which this Article becomes operative from
honor, Trust or Office, and disqualification to hold and enjoy any Office of
hours for that Congress shall decide the issue, assembling within forty eight
House of Representatives. United States, which shall consist of a Senate and
House of Representatives shall be composed of Members chosen every second The
House of Representatives shall choose their Speaker and other Officers; and The
House shall be the Judge of the Elections, Returns and Qualifications of Each
House may provide. under such Penalties as each
House may determine the Rules of its Proceedings, punish its Members for Each
House shall keep a Journal of its Proceedings, and from time to time Each
House on any question Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays of the Members of either
House during his Continuance in Office. shall be a Member of either
House of Representatives; All bills for raising Revenue shall originate in the
House of Representatives and the Senate, Every Bill which shall have passed the
House in which it shall have originated, who shall enter the Objections to that
House shall agree to pass the Bill, it such Reconsideration two thirds of that
House respectively. If against the Bill shall be entered on the Journal of each
House of Representatives may be necessary (except on a question of Adjournment)
House of Representatives, according be repassed by two thirds of the Senate and
House of Representatives, open all the Certificates, and the of the Senate and
House of Representatives shall have an equal Number of Votes, then the
House shall in like Majority, then from the five highest on the List the said
House of The President of the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and
House of Representatives shall choose immediately, by ballot, President, the
House a majority of all the states shall be necessary to a choice. And if the
House of Representatives may choose a President whenever persons from whom the
House of Representatives his written declaration that he and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives their written declaration that the President is the
House of Representatives his written declaration Senate and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives their written declaration that the Speaker of the
House, during the Session of Congress, shall, without the Consent of Neither
House, they shall not be questioned in any other any Speech or Debate in either
House, by which it shall be sent, together with the Objections, to the other
House, it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds of that
house, without the No Soldier shall, in time of peace be quartered in any
House, remove enemies thereof. But Congress may by a vote of two-thirds of each
Houses shall be sitting. in which the two
Houses shall be shall become a Law. But in all such Cases the Votes of both
Houses shall deem it necessary, shall The Congress, whenever two thirds of both
Houses of Congress. confirmation by a majority vote of both
Houses that the President is unable to discharge the two thirds vote of both
Houses, and in going to and returning from the same; and for their respective
Houses, or either of them, and in Case of Disagreement between them, with
houses, papers, and The right of the people to be secure in their persons,
Hugh Williamson North Carolina - William Blount, Richard Dobbs Spaight,
hundred and eight, but a tax or duty may be imposed the Year one thousand eight
hundred and eight shall in any Manner affect the first and thousand eight
hundred Seventeenth Day of September in the Year of our Lord one thousand seven
I will faithfully execute the Office of "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that
if Vacancies happen by Resignation, or otherwise, chosen every second Year; and
If he approve he shall sign it, but if not he shall return it, with his States;
if not he shall return it, with his States; If he approve he shall sign it, but
If after Objections at large on their Journal, and proceed to reconsider it.
if approved by two thirds of that House, it shall likewise be reconsidered, and
If against the Bill shall be entered on the Journal of each House respectively.
if he had signed it, unless the Congress by their Adjournment in like Manner as
if such Number be a Majority of the whole Number of shall be the President,
if there be more than one who have such Majority, and Electors appointed; and
if no Person have a immediately choose by Ballot one of them for President; and
if there Number of Votes of the Electors shall be the Vice President. But
if such number be a majority of the whole number of Electors President,
if no person have such majority, then from the persons having appointed; and
if the House a majority of all the states shall be necessary to a choice. And
if such number be a majority of the whole number of Electors Vice-President,
if no person have a majority, then from the two highest numbers appointed, and
if this day of January, of the years in which such terms would have ended
If a President shall not have been chosen before the time fixed for President.
if the President elect shall have failed to the beginning of his term, or
if it were Representatives in Congress to which the District would be entitled
if not in session. If the Congress, within twenty one days after purpose
If the Congress, within twenty one days after purpose if not in session.
if Congress is not in session, receipt of the latter written declaration, or,
If, at the time fixed for the beginning of the term of the President, the 3.
illegal and void. claims shall be held
Immediately after they shall be assembled in Consequence of the first Election,
immediately choose by Ballot one of them for President; and if no Person have a
immediately assume the powers and duties of the office as Acting shall
immediately, by ballot, President, the House of Representatives shall choose
imminent Danger as will not admit of delay. invaded, or in such
Immunities The Citizens of each State shall be entitled to all Privileges and
immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any the privileges or
impairing the Obligation of Contracts, or grant any ex post facto Law, or Law
impartial jury of the State and district wherein the crime public trial, by an
Impeachment shall not extend further than to removal from Judgment in Cases of
Impeachment for, and Conviction of, Treason, shall be removed from Office on
Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and The Trial of all Crimes, except in Cases of
Impeachment. shall have the sole Power of
Impeachment. Cases of
Impeachments. When sitting for The Senate shall have the sole Power to try all
Importation of such Persons as any of the States now existing The Migration or
importation thereof into, or transportation of intoxicating liquors within, the
importation into any State, Territory, or possession 2. The transportation or
Importation, not exceeding ten dollars for each Person. on such
Imports or Exports, except what may be absolutely necessary for executing on
Imports or Exports, shall be for the Use of the Treasury of the any State on
imposed the Year one thousand eight hundred and eight, but a tax or duty may be
imposed, nor cruel Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines
Imposts and The Congress shall have Power To lay and collect Taxes, Duties,
Imposts and Excises shall be Welfare of the United States; but all Duties,
Imposts or Duties No State shall, without the Consent of the Congress, lay any
Imposts, laid by its inspection Laws: and the net Produce of all Duties and
in Order to form a more perfect Union, We the People of the United States,
in a Congress of the All legislative Powers herein granted shall be vested
in each State shall Year by the People of the several States, and the Electors
in which he shall be shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State
in such Manner as they shall by Law direct. The Number of Years,
in the Representation from any State, the Executive When vacancies happen
in Consequence of the first Election, Immediately after they shall be assembled
in the absence of the Vice President, or when he shall exercise the Office of
in Cases of Impeachment shall not extend further than to removal from Judgment
in each State by the Legislature thereof; Representatives, shall be prescribed
in every Year, and such Meeting shall The Congress shall assemble at least once
in December, unless they shall by Law appoint a be on the first Monday
in such Manner, and authorized to compel the Attendance of absent Members,
in their Judgment require publish the same, excepting such Parts as may
in which the two Houses shall be sitting.
in all Cases, except Treason, Felony and Breach of the States. They shall
in going to and returning from the same; and for their respective Houses, and
in either House, they shall not be questioned in any other any Speech or Debate
in any other any Speech or Debate in either House, they shall not be questioned
in Office. shall be a Member of either House during his Continuance
in the House of Representatives; All bills for raising Revenue shall originate
in which it shall have originated, who shall enter the Objections to that House
in all such Cases the Votes of both Houses shall be shall become a Law. But
in like Manner as if he had signed it, unless the Congress by their Adjournment
in which Case it shall not be a Law. prevent its Return,
in the Case of a Bill. to the Rules and Limitations prescribed
in the Service of the United governing such Part of them as may be employed
in all Cases whatsoever, over such District To exercise exclusive Legislation
in which the Same shall be, for the Erection of of the Legislature of the State
in the Government of the United States, or in any Department or Constitution
in any Department or Constitution in the Government of the United States, or
in Cases of Rebellion or Invasion the public Safety may require it.
in Proportion to the No capitation, or other direct, Tax shall be laid, unless
in another. one State, be obliged to enter, clear, or pay Duties
in Consequence of Appropriations No Money shall be drawn from the Treasury, but
in Payment of Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder, gold and silver Coin a Tender
in time of Peace, enter into any Agreement or Compact Troops, or Ships of War
in War, unless actually with another State, or with a foreign Power, or engage
in such imminent Danger as will not admit of delay. invaded, or
in a President of the United States of The executive Power shall be vested
in such Manner as the Legislature thereof may direct, Each State shall appoint,
in the Congress: but no Senator or to which the State may be entitled
in their respective States, and vote by Ballot for two The Electors shall meet
in the Presence the President of the Senate. The President of the Senate shall,
in like Majority, then from the five highest on the List the said House shall
in choosing the President, the Votes shall be Manner choose the President. But
In States, and a Majority of all the States shall be necessary to a Choice.
In Case of the Removal of the President from Office, or of his Death,
in Chief of the Army and Navy of the United The President shall be Commander
in writing, of the Service of the United States; he may require the Opinion,
in each of the executive Departments, upon any subject principal Officer
in Grant Reprieves and Pardons for Offenses against the United States, except
in the President alone, in the Courts of Law, or in the Heads of proper,
in the Courts of Law, or in the Heads of proper, in the President alone,
in the Heads of proper, in the President alone, in the Courts of Law, or
in Case of Disagreement between them, with Houses, or either of them, and
in one supreme Court, The judicial Power of the United States, shall be vested
in such inferior Courts as the Congress may from time to time ordain and and
in Office. Continuance
in Law and Equity, arising under The judicial Power shall extend to all Cases,
In all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, and
in which a State shall be Party, the supreme Court shall have original those
In all the other Cases before mentioned, the supreme Court shall Jurisdiction.
in Cases of Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and The Trial of all Crimes, except
in the State where the said Crimes shall have been such Trial shall be held
in levying War against Treason against the United States, shall consist only
in adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort. No Person them, or
in open Court. same overt Act, or on Confession
in each State to the public Acts, Records, Full Faith and Credit shall be given
in which such Acts, Records and Proceedings shall be Laws prescribe the Manner
in the several States. of Citizens
in any State with Treason, Felony, or other Crime, who shall A Person charged
in another State, shall on demand of the flee from Justice, and be found
in one State, under the Laws thereof, No Person held to Service or Labour
in Consequence of any Law or Regulation therein, escaping into another, shall,
in this Constitution shall be so construed as to Prejudice States; and nothing
in this Union a Republican The United States shall guarantee to every State
in either Case, shall be valid to all Intents and proposing Amendments, which,
in three fourths three fourths of the several States, or by Conventions
in any Manner affect the first and thousand eight hundred and eight shall
in the Ninth Section of the first Article; and that no State, fourth Clauses
in the Senate. without its Consent, shall be deprived of its equal Suffrage
in This Constitution, and the Laws of the United States which shall be made
in every State shall be bound thereby, any Thing in the Constitution or Judges
in the Constitution or Judges in every State shall be bound thereby, any Thing
in Convention by the Unanimous Consent of the States present the Done
in the Year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred Seventeenth Day of September
In Witness whereof We have hereunto subscribed our Names. Twelfth.
in time of peace be quartered in any house, without the No Soldier shall,
in any house, without the No Soldier shall, in time of peace be quartered
in time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor
in a manner to be prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor in time of war, but
in their persons, houses, papers, and The right of the people to be secure
in cases arising unless on a presentment or indictment of a Grand Jury, except
in the land or naval forces, or in the Militia, when in actual service in time
in the Militia, when in actual service in time in the land or naval forces, or
in actual service in time in the land or naval forces, or in the Militia, when
in time in the land or naval forces, or in the Militia, when in actual service
in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any to be twice put
in any to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled
In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy and
in his favor, and to have the Assistance of process for obtaining witnesses
In Suits at common law, where the value in controversy shall exceed twenty
in controversy shall exceed twenty In Suits at common law, where the value
in any Court of the United States, than jury, shall be otherwise re-examined
in the Constitution, of certain rights, shall not be construed The enumeration
in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of the United States suit
in their respective states, and vote by ballot for The Electors shall meet
in their ballots the person of the same state with themselves; they shall name
in distinct ballots the person voted for as voted for as President, and
in the presence of the Senate and House of The President of the Senate shall,
in choosing the President, the votes shall be taken by the President. But
in the case of the death or other the Vice-President shall act as President, as
in the United States, and subject to the 1. All persons born or naturalized
in each State, their respective numbers, counting the whole number of persons
in Congress, the Executive and Judicial officers of a State, or Representatives
in any way abridged, except for participation in rebellion, United States, or
in rebellion, United States, or in any way abridged, except for participation
in the or other crime, the basis of representation therein shall be reduced
in such State. number of male citizens twenty-one years of age
in Congress, or elector of 3. No person shall be a Senator or Representative
in support the Constitution of the United States, shall have engaged
in including debts incurred for payment of pensions and bounties for services
in aid of insurrection or rebellion against the United States, or any claim for
in each State shall have the qualifications have one vote. The electors
in the representation of any State in the Senate, the When vacancies happen
in the Senate, the When vacancies happen in the representation of any State
in the Constitution, within seven years from the date of the provided
in which such terms would have ended if this day of January, of the years
in every year, and such meeting 2. The Congress shall assemble at least once
in which one who is to declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner
in of the United States for delivery or use therein of intoxicating liquors,
in the several States, as provided amendment to the Constitution by conventions
in the Constitution, within seven years from the date of the submission hereof
in such manner as the Congress may direct: A number of electors of appoint
in Congress to which the District would be entitled if it were Representatives
in no event more than the least populous State; they shall be in a State, but
in a State, but in no event more than the least populous State; they shall be
in the District and perform such appointed by a State; and they shall meet
in any primary or other 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote
in Congress, shall not be Vice President, or for Senator or Representative
In case of the removal of the President from office or of his death or 1.
in the office of the Vice President, the 2. Whenever there is a vacancy
in session. If the Congress, within twenty one days after purpose if not
in session, receipt of the latter written declaration, or, if Congress is not
Inability to discharge the Powers and Duties of the said Resignation, or
inability exists, he shall resume the powers and duties of his office that no
Inability, both of Law provide for the Case of Removal, Death, Resignation or
included within this Union, according to their respective Numbers, which may be
including those bound to Service for a Term of Years, and excluding Indians not
including debts incurred for payment of pensions and bounties for services in
incomes, from The Congress shall have power to lay and collect taxes on
increased shall have been created, or the Emoluments whereof shall have been
increased nor diminished during the Period for which he which shall neither be
incurred for payment of pensions and bounties for services in including debts
incurred United States nor any State shall assume or pay any debt or obligation
Independence of the United States of America the and Eighty seven and of the
Indian Tribes; with the
Indians not including those bound to Service for a Term of Years, and excluding
Indians not taxed. But when the right to vote at any election for the excluding
indictment of a Grand Jury, except in cases arising unless on a presentment or
Indictment, Trial, Judgment and Punishment, according to liable and subject to
ineligible to the office of President shall be eligible to constitutionally
infamous crime, No person shall be held to answer for a capital, or otherwise
inferior to the supreme Court; To constitute Tribunals
inferior Officers, as they think may by Law vest the Appointment of such
inferior Courts as the Congress may from time to time ordain and and in such
inferior Courts, shall hold establish. The Judges, both of the supreme and
inflicted. and unusual punishments
Information of the State of the He shall from time to time give to the Congress
informed of the nature and cause of the ascertained by law, and to be
infringed. right of the people to keep and bear Arms, shall not be
Ingersoll, James Wilson, Gouvernour Morris Thomas Fitzsimons, Jared
Inhabitant of that State in which he shall be shall not, when elected, be an
Inhabitant of that State for which he shall be chosen. when elected, be an
Inhabitant of the same State persons, of whom one at least shall not lie an
inhabitant President and Vice-President, one of whom, at least, shall not be an
inhabitants of such State, being twenty-one years of age, and citizens of the
inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 3. This article shall be
inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 6. This article shall be
inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 3. The article shall be
inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 2. This article shall be
inspection Laws: and the net Produce of all Duties and Imposts, laid by its
insure domestic Tranquility, provide for the common establish Justice,
insurrection or rebellion against the same, or given aid or comfort to the
insurrection or rebellion, shall not be questioned. But neither the suppressing
insurrection or rebellion against the United States, or any claim for in aid of
Insurrections and repel Invasions; suppress
Intents and proposing Amendments, which, in either Case, shall be valid to all
intervened. have
into three Classes. The Seats of the they shall be divided as equally as may be
into To make all Laws which shall be necessary and proper for carrying
into any Treaty, Alliance, or Confederation; grant Letters No State shall enter
into any Agreement or Compact Troops, or Ships of War in time of Peace, enter
into the actual States, and of the Militia of the several States, when called
into another, shall, in Consequence of any Law or Regulation therein, escaping
into this Union; but no new States New States may be admitted by the Congress
into any State, Territory, or possession 2. The transportation or importation
into, before the Adoption of this All Debts contracted and Engagements entered
into, or transportation of intoxicating liquors within, the importation thereof
intoxicating liquors within, the importation thereof into, or transportation of
intoxicating liquors, in of the United States for delivery or use therein of
invaded, or in such imminent Danger as will not admit of delay.
Invasion the public Safety may require it. in Cases of Rebellion or
Invasion; and on Form of Government, and shall protect each of them against
Invasions; suppress Insurrections and repel
Inventors the exclusive Right to their respective Writings Times to Authors and
involuntary servitude, except as a punishment for crime 1. Neither slavery nor
is tried, the Chief Justice shall preside: And no Person shall be United States
is denied to any of the male the members of the Legislature thereof,
is hereby prohibited. the jurisdiction thereof for beverage purposes
is to declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in which one who
is hereby repealed.
is hereby prohibited. violation of the laws thereof,
is a vacancy in the office of the Vice President, the 2. Whenever there
is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, and until he
is the House of Representatives their written declaration that the President
is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office. Thereupon President
is not in session, receipt of the latter written declaration, or, if Congress
is required to assemble, determines by within twenty one days after Congress
is unable to discharge the two thirds vote of both Houses that the President
Island and Providence Plantations one, Connecticut Massachusetts eight, Rhode
issue Writs of Election to fill such Vacancies. Authority thereof shall
issue writs of election to fill such executive authority of such State shall
issue, but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or no Warrants shall
issue, assembling within forty eight hours for that Congress shall decide the
it become a Law, be presented to the President of the United shall, before
it shall have originated, who shall enter the Objections to that House in which
it such Reconsideration two thirds of that House shall agree to pass the Bill,
it shall be sent, together with the Objections, to the other House, by which
it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds of that House,
it shall have been presented to him, the Same shall be a Law, excepted) after
it shall not be a Law. prevent its Return, in which Case
it necessary, shall The Congress, whenever two thirds of both Houses shall deem
it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to prohibited by
it becomes valid as part of the Constitution. any Senator chosen before
it shall have been ratified as an 3. This article shall be inoperative unless
it shall have been ratified as an 6. This article shall be inoperative unless
it shall have been ratified as an 3. The article shall be inoperative unless
it shall have been ratified as an 2. This article shall be inoperative unless
it were Representatives in Congress to which the District would be entitled if
it, but if not he shall return it, with his States; If he approve he shall sign
it, with his States; If he approve he shall sign it, but if not he shall return
it, unless the Congress by their Adjournment in like Manner as if he had signed
it. If after Objections at large on their Journal, and proceed to reconsider
it. in Cases of Rebellion or Invasion the public Safety may require
its own Members, and a Majority of each shall constitute a Quorum to do
its Proceedings, punish its Members for Each House may determine the Rules of
its Members for Each House may determine the Rules of its Proceedings, punish
its Proceedings, and from time to time Each House shall keep a Journal of
its Return, in which Case it shall not be a Law. prevent
its inspection Laws: and the net Produce of all Duties and Imposts, laid by
its Consent, shall be deprived of its equal Suffrage in the Senate. without
its equal Suffrage in the Senate. without its Consent, shall be deprived of
its jurisdiction the equal protection of the law; nor deny to any person within
its submission. several States within seven years from the date of
its submission to the States several States within seven years from the date of
Jackson, Secretary Attest: William
Jacob Broom
James Wilson, Gouvernour Morris Thomas Fitzsimons, Jared Ingersoll,
James McHenry, Daniel of St Thomas Jenifer, Daniel Carroll Maryland -
James Madison Jr. Virginia - John Blair,
January, and the terms of Senators and Representatives at noon on the 3d day of
January, of the years in which such terms would have ended if this day of
January, unless they shall by law appoint shall begin at noon on the 3d day of
Jared Ingersoll, James Wilson, Gouvernour Morris Thomas Fitzsimons,
Jenifer, Daniel Carroll Maryland - James McHenry, Daniel of St Thomas
jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any to be twice put in
Jersey four, Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one, Maryland five, New York six, New
Jersey - William Livingston, David Brearley, William Paterson, Jonathan New
John Langdon, Nicholas Gilman New Hampshire -
John Dickinson, Richard Bassett, Delaware - George Read, Gunning Bedford Jr.,
John Blair, James Madison Jr. Virginia -
John Rutledge, Charles Cotesworth Pinckney, Charles Pinckney, South Carolina -
Johnson, Roger Sherman Connecticut - William Samuel
Jonathan New Jersey - William Livingston, David Brearley, William Paterson,
Journal of its Proceedings, and from time to time Each House shall keep a
Journal of each House respectively. If against the Bill shall be entered on the
Journal, and proceed to reconsider it. If after Objections at large on their
Journal. shall, at the Desire of one fifth of those Present, be entered on the
Jr. Virginia - John Blair, James Madison
Jr., John Dickinson, Richard Bassett, Delaware - George Read, Gunning Bedford
Judge of the Elections, Returns and Qualifications of Each House shall be the
judge Union, and recommend to their Consideration such Measures as he shall
Judges of the supreme Court, Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls,
Judges in every State shall be bound thereby, any Thing in the Constitution or
Judges, both of the supreme and inferior Courts, shall hold establish. The
Judgment in Cases of Impeachment shall not extend further than to removal from
Judgment and Punishment, according to liable and subject to Indictment, Trial,
Judgment require publish the same, excepting such Parts as may in their
judicial Power of the United States, shall be vested in one supreme Court, The
judicial Power shall extend to all Cases, in Law and Equity, arising under The
judicial Proceedings of every other State. And the Congress may by general and
judicial Officers, both of several State Legislatures, and all executive and
Judicial power of the United States shall not be construed to extend to any The
Judicial officers of a State, or Representatives in Congress, the Executive and
judicial officer of any State, to any State legislature, or as an executive or
Junction of two or more States, or parts of States, State be formed by the
Jurisdiction of the Crime. removed to the State having
Jurisdiction of any other State; nor any shall be formed or erected within the
jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States and of the State
jurisdiction the equal protection of the law; nor deny to any person within its
jurisdiction thereof for beverage purposes is hereby prohibited. the
Jurisdiction, both as to Law and Fact, with such Exceptions, and have appellate
Jurisdiction. In all the other Cases before mentioned, the supreme Court shall
jurisdiction. States, or any place subject to their
Jurisdiction; to Controversies to which the United States shall be a Party; to
jury of the State and district wherein the crime public trial, by an impartial
jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a dollars, the right of trial by
Jury, except in cases arising unless on a presentment or indictment of a Grand
jury, shall be otherwise re-examined in any Court of the United States, than
Jury; and The Trial of all Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment, shall be by
just compensation. taken for public use, without
Justice shall preside: And no Person shall be United States is tried, the Chief
Justice, insure domestic Tranquility, provide for the common establish
Justice, and be found in another State, shall on demand of the flee from
keep a Journal of its Proceedings, and from time to time Each House shall
keep No State shall, without the Consent of Congress, lay any duty of Tonnage,
keep and bear Arms, shall not be infringed. right of the people to
kind the Congress, accept of any present, Emolument, Office, or Title, of any
King Massachusetts - Nathaniel Gorham, Rufus
King, Prince or foreign State. whatever, from any
Labour in one State, under the Laws thereof, No Person held to Service or
Labour may be due. of the Party to whom such Service or
Labour, But shall be delivered up on Claim be discharged from such Service or
laid on Articles exported from any State. No Tax or Duty shall be
laid by its inspection Laws: and the net Produce of all Duties and Imposts,
laid, unless in Proportion to the No capitation, or other direct, Tax shall be
Land and Water; Captures on
land and naval Forces; To make Rules for the Government and Regulation of the
land or naval forces, or in the Militia, when in actual service in time in the
Land; and the Authority of the United States, shall be the supreme Law of the
Lands under Grants of different States, and between a same State claiming
Langdon, Nicholas Gilman New Hampshire - John
large on their Journal, and proceed to reconsider it. If after Objections at
latter written declaration, or, if Congress is not in session, receipt of the
Law direct. The Number of Years, in such Manner as they shall by
Law make or alter such Regulations, except but the Congress may at any time by
Law appoint a be on the first Monday in December, unless they shall by
Law of Nations; Offenses against the
Law shall be passed. No Bill of Attainder or ex post facto
Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts, or grant any ex post facto Law, or
Law provide for the Case of Removal, Death, Resignation or Inability, both of
Law vest the Appointment of such inferior Officers, as they think may by
Law and Equity, arising under The judicial Power shall extend to all Cases, in
Law and Fact, with such Exceptions, and have appellate Jurisdiction, both as to
Law have directed. Place or Places as the Congress may by
Law or Regulation therein, escaping into another, shall, in Consequence of any
Law of the Land; and the Authority of the United States, shall be the supreme
law respecting an establishment of religion, or Congress shall make no
law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of the United States suit in
law which shall abridge wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any
law appoint shall begin at noon on the 3d day of January, unless they shall by
law provide for the case wherein shall have qualified; and the Congress may by
law provide for the case of the death of any of the 4. The Congress may by
law of the executive departments or of such other body as Congress may by
law provide, the executive department or of such other body as Congress may by
Law, and paid out of the Treasury of the United Services, to be ascertained by
Law, be presented to the President of the United shall, before it become a
Law, excepted) after it shall have been presented to him, the Same shall be a
Law, or Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts, or grant any ex post facto
Law, or in the Heads of proper, in the President alone, in the Courts of
law, and to be informed of the nature and cause of the ascertained by
law, where the value in controversy shall exceed twenty In Suits at common
law, 4. The validity of the public debt of the United States, authorized by
law, varying the compensation for the services of the Senators and No
Law.
Law. But in all such Cases the Votes of both Houses shall be shall become a
Law. prevent its Return, in which Case it shall not be a
law.
law. according to the rules of the common
Law: but the Congress otherwise provided for, and which shall be established by
Law; and a regular Statement and Account of the Receipts and made by
law; nor shall private property be liberty, or property, without due process of
law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the
Laws on the subject To establish an uniform Rule of Naturalization, and uniform
Laws of the Union, To provide for calling forth the Militia to execute the
Laws which shall be necessary and proper for carrying into To make all
Laws shall be subject to the Revision and Control United States; and all such
Laws be faithfully executed, and shall Commission all shall take Care that the
Laws of the United States, and Treaties made, or which this Constitution, the
Laws prescribe the Manner in which such Acts, Records and Proceedings shall be
Laws thereof, No Person held to Service or Labour in one State, under the
Laws of the United States which shall be made in This Constitution, and the
Laws of any State to the Contrary notwithstanding.
laws thereof, is hereby prohibited. violation of the
laws.
Laws: and the net Produce of all Duties and Imposts, laid by its inspection
lay and collect Taxes, Duties, Imposts and The Congress shall have Power To
lay any Imposts or Duties No State shall, without the Consent of the Congress,
lay any duty of Tonnage, keep No State shall, without the Consent of Congress,
lay and collect taxes on incomes, from The Congress shall have power to
Least one Representative; and until such enumeration shall be shall have at
least once in every Year, and such Meeting shall The Congress shall assemble at
least shall not lie an Inhabitant of the same State persons, of whom one at
least once in every year, and such meeting 2. The Congress shall assemble at
least populous State; they shall be in a State, but in no event more than the
least, shall not be an inhabitant President and Vice-President, one of whom, at
Legislation in all Cases whatsoever, over such District To exercise exclusive
legislation, the 5. The Congress shall have power to enforce, by appropriate
legislation.
legislation.
legislation. this article by appropriate
legislation. Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate
legislation.
legislation.
legislation.
legislative Powers herein granted shall be vested in a Congress of the All
Legislature thereof, for six Years; and each Senator shall State, chosen by the
Legislature of any State, the Executive thereof may during the Recess of the
Legislature thereof; Representatives, shall be prescribed in each State by the
Legislature of the State in which the Same shall be, for the Erection of of the
Legislature thereof may direct, Each State shall appoint, in such Manner as the
Legislature Application of the Legislature, or of the Executive (when the
Legislature thereof, is denied to any of the male the members of the
legislature of any State may empower the vacancies: Provided, That the
legislature may direct. vacancies by election as the
Legislature, which make temporary Appointments until the next Meeting of the
Legislature, or of the Executive (when the Legislature Application of the
legislature, or as an executive or judicial officer of any State, to any State
Legislature. the State
Legislatures of the States concerned as well as of without the Consent of the
Legislatures of two thirds of the several States, shall call a Convention for
Legislatures of Purposes, as part of this Constitution, when ratified by the
legislatures of the several States, as amendment to the Constitution by the
legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment to the Constitution by the
legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment to the Constitution by the
Legislatures, and all executive and judicial Officers, both of several State
legislatures. requisite for electors of the most numerous branch of the State
Letters of Marque and Reprisal, and make Rules concerning To declare War, grant
Letters No State shall enter into any Treaty, Alliance, or Confederation; grant
levying War against Treason against the United States, shall consist only in
liable and subject to Indictment, Trial, Judgment and Punishment, according to
Liberty to defence, promote the general Welfare, and secure the Blessings of
liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor shall private property be
liberty, or property, without due process of State deprive any person of life,
lie an Inhabitant of the same State persons, of whom one at least shall not
Life of the Person attainted. during the
life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any to be twice put in jeopardy of
life, criminal case to be a witness against himself, nor be deprived of
life, liberty, or property, without due process of State deprive any person of
like Manner as if he had signed it, unless the Congress by their Adjournment in
like Authority over all Places purchased by the Consent States, and to exercise
like Majority, then from the five highest on the List the said House shall in
likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds of that House, it shall
limb; nor shall be compelled in any to be twice put in jeopardy of life or
Limitations prescribed in the Case of a Bill. to the Rules and
limited To promote the Progress of Science and useful Arts, by securing for
liquors within, the importation thereof into, or transportation of intoxicating
liquors, in of the United States for delivery or use therein of intoxicating
List of all the Persons voted for, and with themselves. And they shall make a
List they shall sign and certify, and of the Number of Votes for each; which
List the said House shall in like Majority, then from the five highest on the
list of those voted for as the highest numbers not exceeding three on the
list, the Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the on the
lists of all persons voted for as Vice-President, and they shall make distinct
lists they shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to votes for each, which
Livingston, David Brearley, William Paterson, Jonathan New Jersey - William
longer Term than two Years; for a
Lord one thousand seven hundred Seventeenth Day of September in the Year of our
loss or emancipation of any slave; but all such debts, obligations and the
made within three Years after the first Meeting The actual Enumeration shall be
made by Law; and a regular Statement and Account of the Receipts and
made prior to the Year One Congress; Provided that no Amendment which may be
made in This Constitution, and the Laws of the United States which shall be
made, the State of New Hampshire shall be entitled to choose three,
made, or which this Constitution, the Laws of the United States, and Treaties
made, under their Authority; to all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other shall be
made, or which shall be made, under the Pursuance thereof; and all Treaties
made, under the Pursuance thereof; and all Treaties made, or which shall be
Madison Jr. Virginia - John Blair, James
Magazines, Arsenals, dock-Yards, and other needful Buildings; And Forts,
maintain a Navy; To provide and
Majority of each shall constitute a Quorum to do its own Members, and a
Majority of the whole Number of shall be the President, if such Number be a
Majority of all the States shall be necessary to a Choice. In States, and a
majority of the whole number of Electors President, if such number be a
majority of all the states shall be necessary to a choice. And if the House a
majority of the whole number of Electors Vice-President, if such number be a
majority of the whole number shall be necessary to a choice. But no person
majority vote of both Houses of Congress. confirmation by a
majority of either the principal officers 4. Whenever the Vice President and a
majority of either the principal officers of unless the Vice President and a
Majority, and Electors appointed; and if there be more than one who have such
Majority, then from the five highest on the List the said House shall in like
majority, then from the persons having appointed; and if no person have such
majority, then from the two highest numbers appointed, and if no person have a
make temporary Appointments until the next Meeting of the Legislature, which
make or alter such Regulations, except but the Congress may at any time by Law
make Rules concerning To declare War, grant Letters of Marque and Reprisal, and
make Rules for the Government and Regulation of the land and naval Forces; To
make all Laws which shall be necessary and proper for carrying into To
make any Thing but of Marque and Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills of Credit;
make a List of all the Persons voted for, and with themselves. And they shall
make He shall have Power, by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, to
make all needful Rules and The Congress shall have Power to dispose of and
make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or Congress shall
make distinct lists of all persons voted for as Vice-President, and they shall
make or enforce any law which shall abridge wherein they reside. No State shall
make temporary appointments until the people fill the executive thereof to
make. under such Regulations as the Congress shall
male the members of the Legislature thereof, is denied to any of the
male citizens shall bear to the whole proportion which the number of such
male citizens twenty-one years of age in such State. number of
Manner as they shall by Law direct. The Number of Years, in such
Manner of holding Elections for Senators and The Times, Places and
Manner as if he had signed it, unless the Congress by their Adjournment in like
Manner as the Legislature thereof may direct, Each State shall appoint, in such
Manner choose the President. But in choosing the President, the Votes shall be
Manner in which such Acts, Records and Proceedings shall be Laws prescribe the
Manner affect the first and thousand eight hundred and eight shall in any
manner to be prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor in time of war, but in a
manner in which one who is to declaring who shall then act as President, or the
manner as the Congress may direct: A number of electors of appoint in such
Manner, and authorized to compel the Attendance of absent Members, in such
manufacture, sale, 1. After one year from the ratification of this article the
March next following, then shall devolve upon them, before the fourth day of
maritime public Ministers and Consuls; to all Cases of admiralty and
Marque and Reprisal, and make Rules concerning To declare War, grant Letters of
Marque and Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills of Credit; make any Thing but of
Maryland five, New York six, New Jersey four, Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one,
Maryland - James McHenry, Daniel of St Thomas Jenifer, Daniel Carroll
Massachusetts eight, Rhode Island and Providence Plantations one, Connecticut
Massachusetts - Nathaniel Gorham, Rufus King
may be included within this Union, according to their respective Numbers, which
may be into three Classes. The Seats of the they shall be divided as equally as
may be third Class at the Expiration of the sixth Year, so that one third
may during the Recess of the Legislature of any State, the Executive thereof
may at any time by Law make or alter such Regulations, except but the Congress
may adjourn from day to day, and may be Business; but a smaller number
may be Business; but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day, and
may provide. under such Penalties as each House
may determine the Rules of its Proceedings, punish its Members for Each House
may in their Judgment require publish the same, excepting such Parts as
may propose or concur with Amendments as on other Bills. but the Senate
may be necessary (except on a question of Adjournment) House of Representatives
may be employed in the Service of the United governing such Part of them as
may be imposed the Year one thousand eight hundred and eight, but a tax or duty
may require it. in Cases of Rebellion or Invasion the public Safety
may be absolutely necessary for executing on Imports or Exports, except what
may direct, Each State shall appoint, in such Manner as the Legislature thereof
may be entitled in the Congress: but no Senator or to which the State
may determine the Time of choosing the Electors, and the Day on The Congress
may by Office, the same shall devolve on the Vice President, and the Congress
may require the Opinion, in writing, of the Service of the United States; he
may by Law vest the Appointment of such inferior Officers, as they think
may happen during The President shall have Power to fill up all Vacancies that
may adjourn them to such Time as he Respect to the Time of Adjournment, he
may from time to time ordain and and in such inferior Courts as the Congress
may by Law have directed. Place or Places as the Congress
may by general and judicial Proceedings of every other State. And the Congress
may be due. of the Party to whom such Service or Labour
may be admitted by the Congress into this Union; but no new States New States
may be proposed by the thereof, as the one or the other Mode of Ratification
may be made prior to the Year One Congress; Provided that no Amendment which
may by a vote of two-thirds of each House, remove enemies thereof. But Congress
may empower the vacancies: Provided, That the legislature of any State
may direct. vacancies by election as the legislature
may by law provide for the case wherein shall have qualified; and the Congress
may by law provide for the case of the death of any of the 4. The Congress
may choose a President whenever persons from whom the House of Representatives
may choose a Vice President death of any of the persons from whom the Senate
may Article was proposed by the Congress, and shall not prevent any person who
may direct: A number of electors of appoint in such manner as the Congress
may by law of the executive departments or of such other body as Congress
may by law provide, the executive department or of such other body as Congress
may, by Cession of particular States, and (not exceeding ten Miles square) as
may, on extraordinary Occasions, convene both necessary and expedient; he
McHenry, Daniel of St Thomas Jenifer, Daniel Carroll Maryland - James
Measures as he shall judge Union, and recommend to their Consideration such
Measures; Standard of Weights and
meet in their respective States, and vote by Ballot for two The Electors shall
meet in their respective states, and vote by ballot for The Electors shall
meet in the District and perform such appointed by a State; and they shall
Meeting The actual Enumeration shall be made within three Years after the first
Meeting of the Legislature, which make temporary Appointments until the next
Meeting shall The Congress shall assemble at least once in every Year, and such
meeting 2. The Congress shall assemble at least once in every year, and such
Member of either House during his Continuance in Office. shall be a
Member or Members from two-thirds of the for this Purpose shall consist of a
member or members from two-thirds of the states, and purpose shall consist of a
member of Congress, or as an officer of the United States, or as a member of
member of member of Congress, or as an officer of the United States, or as a
Member. disorderly Behavior, and, with the Concurrence of two-thirds, expel a
Members chosen every second The House of Representatives shall be composed of
Members present. convicted without the Concurrence of two thirds of the
Members for Each House may determine the Rules of its Proceedings, punish its
Members of either House on any question Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays of the
Members from two-thirds of the for this Purpose shall consist of a Member or
Members of the The Senators and Representatives before mentioned, and the
members from two-thirds of the states, and purpose shall consist of a member or
members of the Legislature thereof, is denied to any of the male the
Members, and a Majority of each shall constitute a Quorum to do its own
Members, in such Manner, and authorized to compel the Attendance of absent
mentioned, the supreme Court shall Jurisdiction. In all the other Cases before
mentioned, and the Members of the The Senators and Representatives before
Mifflin, Robert Morris, George Clymer, Pennsylvania - Benjamin Franklin, Thomas
Migration or Importation of such Persons as any of the States now existing The
Miles square) as may, by Cession of particular States, and (not exceeding ten
military, under the President and Vice-President, or hold any office, civil or
Militia to execute the Laws of the Union, To provide for calling forth the
Militia according to the discipline and the Authority of training the
Militia of the several States, when called into the actual States, and of the
Militia, and for To provide for organizing, arming, and disciplining, the
Militia, being necessary to the security of a free State, the A well regulated
Militia, when in actual service in time in the land or naval forces, or in the
Ministers and Consuls, Judges of the supreme Court, Ambassadors, other public
Ministers and Consuls; to all Cases of admiralty and maritime public
Ministers and Consuls, and In all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other public
Ministers; he shall think proper; he shall receive Ambassadors and other public
Misdemeanors. Bribery, or other high Crimes and
Mode of Ratification may be proposed by the thereof, as the one or the other
Monday in December, unless they shall by Law appoint a be on the first
money on the credit of the United States; To borrow
Money to that Use shall be To raise and support Armies, but no Appropriation of
Money shall be drawn from the Treasury, but in Consequence of Appropriations No
Money shall be published from time to time. Expenditures of all public
Money, regulate the Value thereof, and of foreign Coin, and fix the To coin
Money; emit Bills of Credit; make any Thing but of Marque and Reprisal; coin
more perfect Union, We the People of the United States, in Order to form a
more than three days, nor to any other Place than that the other, adjourn for
more than one who have such Majority, and Electors appointed; and if there be
more who have equal Votes, the Senate shall choose from should remain two or
more States; between a State and Citizens of Controversies between two or
more States, or parts of States, State be formed by the Junction of two or
more than twice, 1. No person shall be elected to the office of the President
more than two years of a term to which some other person was elected President
more than once. But this shall be elected to the office of the President
more than the least populous State; they shall be in a State, but in no event
Morris Thomas Fitzsimons, Jared Ingersoll, James Wilson, Gouvernour
Morris, George Clymer, Pennsylvania - Benjamin Franklin, Thomas Mifflin, Robert
most numerous Branch of have the Qualifications requisite for Electors of the
most numerous branch of the State legislatures. requisite for electors of the
my Ability, preserve, President of the United States, and will to the best of
name in their ballots the person of the same state with themselves; they shall
Names of the Persons voting for and determined by Yeas and Nays, and the
Names. Twelfth. In Witness whereof We have hereunto subscribed our
Nathaniel Gorham, Rufus King Massachusetts -
Nations, and among the several States, and To regulate Commerce with foreign
Nations; Offenses against the Law of
natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States, at No person except a
Naturalization, and uniform Laws on the subject To establish an uniform Rule of
naturalized in the United States, and subject to the 1. All persons born or
nature and cause of the ascertained by law, and to be informed of the
naval Forces; To make Rules for the Government and Regulation of the land and
naval forces, or in the Militia, when in actual service in time in the land or
Navy of the United The President shall be Commander in Chief of the Army and
Navy; To provide and maintain a
Nays of the Members of either House on any question Secrecy; and the Yeas and
Nays, and the Names of the Persons voting for and determined by Yeas and
necessary (except on a question of Adjournment) House of Representatives may be
necessary and proper for carrying into To make all Laws which shall be
necessary for executing on Imports or Exports, except what may be absolutely
necessary to a Choice. In States, and a Majority of all the States shall be
necessary and expedient; he may, on extraordinary Occasions, convene both
necessary to the security of a free State, the A well regulated Militia, being
necessary to a choice. And if the House a majority of all the states shall be
necessary to a choice. But no person majority of the whole number shall be
necessary, shall The Congress, whenever two thirds of both Houses shall deem it
needful Buildings; And Forts, Magazines, Arsenals, dock-Yards, and other
needful Rules and The Congress shall have Power to dispose of and make all
Neither House, during the Session of Congress, shall, without the Consent of
neither shall any Person be eligible to that Office who shall not of President;
neither be increased nor diminished during the Period for which he which shall
Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude, except as a punishment for crime 1.
neither the suppressing insurrection or rebellion, shall not be questioned. But
neither a President elect nor a Vice President elect shall have qualified,
net Produce of all Duties and Imposts, laid by its inspection Laws: and the
nevertheless be Profit under the United States: but the Party convicted shall
New Hampshire shall be entitled to choose three, made, the State of
New York six, New Jersey four, Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one, Maryland five,
New Jersey four, Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one, Maryland five, New York six,
New States may be admitted by the Congress into this Union; but no new States
new States New States may be admitted by the Congress into this Union; but no
New Hampshire - John Langdon, Nicholas Gilman
New York - Alexander Hamilton
New Jersey - William Livingston, David Brearley, William Paterson, Jonathan
next Meeting of the Legislature, which make temporary Appointments until the
next Session. of their
next following, then shall devolve upon them, before the fourth day of March
Nicholas Gilman New Hampshire - John Langdon,
nine Years a Citizen of the United States, and who shall not, Years, and been
nine States, shall be sufficient for the The Ratification of the Conventions of
Ninth Section of the first Article; and that no State, fourth Clauses in the
No Person shall be a Representative who shall not have attained to the Age of
No person shall be a Senator who shall not have attained to the Age of thirty
no Vote, unless they be equally divided. shall have
no Person shall be United States is tried, the Chief Justice shall preside: And
No Senator or Representative shall, during the Time for which he was elected,
no Person holding any Office under the United States, during such time; and
no Appropriation of Money to that Use shall be To raise and support Armies, but
No Bill of Attainder or ex post facto Law shall be passed.
No capitation, or other direct, Tax shall be laid, unless in Proportion to the
No Tax or Duty shall be laid on Articles exported from any State.
No Preference shall be given by any Regulation of Commerce or Revenue to the
No Money shall be drawn from the Treasury, but in Consequence of Appropriations
No Title of Nobility shall be granted by the United States: And no Person
no Person No Title of Nobility shall be granted by the United States: And
No State shall enter into any Treaty, Alliance, or Confederation; grant Letters
No State shall, without the Consent of the Congress, lay any Imposts or Duties
No State shall, without the Consent of Congress, lay any duty of Tonnage, keep
no Senator or to which the State may be entitled in the Congress: but
no Person have a immediately choose by Ballot one of them for President; and if
No person except a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States, at
No Person them, or in adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort.
no The Congress shall have power to declare the Punishment of Treason, but
No Person held to Service or Labour in one State, under the Laws thereof,
no new States New States may be admitted by the Congress into this Union; but
no Amendment which may be made prior to the Year One Congress; Provided that
no State, fourth Clauses in the Ninth Section of the first Article; and that
no religious Test shall ever be Affirmation, to support this Constitution; but
no law respecting an establishment of religion, or Congress shall make
No Soldier shall, in time of peace be quartered in any house, without the
no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or
No person shall be held to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime,
no fact tried by a dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and
no person have such majority, then from the persons having appointed; and if
no person have a majority, then from the two highest numbers appointed, and if
no person majority of the whole number shall be necessary to a choice. But
No State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge wherein they reside.
No person shall be a Senator or Representative in Congress, or elector of 3.
No person shall be elected to the office of the President more than twice, 1.
no person who has held the office of President, or acted as President, for and
no event more than the least populous State; they shall be in a State, but in
no inability exists, he shall resume the powers and duties of his office that
No law, varying the compensation for the services of the Senators and
Nobility shall be granted by the United States: And no Person No Title of
Nobility. Title of
nominate a Vice President who shall take office upon President shall
nominate, and by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, shall appoint
noon on the 20th 1. The terms of the President and Vice President shall end at
noon on the 3d day of January, and the terms of Senators and Representatives at
noon on the 3d day of January, unless they shall by law appoint shall begin at
nor to any other Place than that the other, adjourn for more than three days,
nor shall Vessels bound to, or from, Ports of one State over those of another:
nor diminished during the Period for which he which shall neither be increased
nor any shall be formed or erected within the Jurisdiction of any other State;
nor in time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by consent of the Owner,
nor shall any person be subject for the same offense of War or public danger;
nor shall be compelled in any to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb;
nor be deprived of life, criminal case to be a witness against himself,
nor shall private property be liberty, or property, without due process of law;
nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel Excessive bail shall not be required,
nor cruel Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed,
nor The powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution,
nor involuntary servitude, except as a punishment for crime 1. Neither slavery
nor shall any the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States;
nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the law;
nor any State shall assume or pay any debt or obligation incurred United States
nor a Vice President elect shall have qualified, neither a President elect
North Carolina five, South Carolina five and Georgia three. six, Virginia ten,
North Carolina - William Blount, Richard Dobbs Spaight, Hugh Williamson
not have attained to the Age of No Person shall be a Representative who shall
not including those bound to Service for a Term of Years, and excluding Indians
not exceed one for every thirty Thousand, but each State Representatives shall
not have attained to the Age of thirty No person shall be a Senator who shall
not extend further than to removal from Judgment in Cases of Impeachment shall
not be questioned in any other any Speech or Debate in either House, they shall
not he shall return it, with his States; If he approve he shall sign it, but if
not be returned by the President within ten Days (Sundays any Bill shall
not be a Law. prevent its Return, in which Case it shall
not be prohibited by the Congress prior to shall think proper to admit, shall
not exceeding ten dollars for each Person. on such Importation,
not be suspended, unless when The privilege of the Writ of Habeas Corpus shall
not admit of delay. invaded, or in such imminent Danger as will
not lie an Inhabitant of the same State persons, of whom one at least shall
not of President; neither shall any Person be eligible to that Office who shall
not receive within that Period any other shall have been elected, and he shall
not herein and all other Officers of the United States, whose Appointments are
not be diminished during their their Services a Compensation which shall
not committed within any State, the Trial shall be at such committed; but when
not be infringed. right of the people to keep and bear Arms, shall
not be violated, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall
not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel Excessive bail shall
not be construed The enumeration in the Constitution, of certain rights, shall
not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor The powers
not be construed to extend to any The Judicial power of the United States shall
not be an inhabitant President and Vice-President, one of whom, at least, shall
not exceeding three on the list of those voted for as the highest numbers
not choose a President whenever the right of choice of Representatives shall
not taxed. But when the right to vote at any election for the excluding Indians
not be questioned. But neither the suppressing insurrection or rebellion, shall
not be denied or 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall
not be so construed as to affect the election or term of This amendment shall
not be denied or The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall
not been ratified; and the terms of their successors shall then article had
not have been chosen before the time fixed for President. If a President shall
not apply to any person holding the office of President, when this Article shall
not prevent any person who may Article was proposed by the Congress, and shall
not be Vice President, or for Senator or Representative in Congress, shall
not in session. If the Congress, within twenty one days after purpose if
not in session, receipt of the latter written declaration, or, if Congress is
not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any older, to vote shall
not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State in which he shall be shall
not, Years, and been nine Years a Citizen of the United States, and who shall
nothing in this Constitution shall be so construed as to Prejudice States; and
notwithstanding. Laws of any State to the Contrary
now existing The Migration or Importation of such Persons as any of the States
Number of free Persons, which shall be determined by adding to the whole
Number of Years, in such Manner as they shall by Law direct. The
number may adjourn from day to day, and may be Business; but a smaller
Number of Electors, equal to the whole Number of Senators and Representatives a
Number of Senators and Representatives a Number of Electors, equal to the whole
Number of Votes for each; which List they shall sign and certify, and of the
Number of Votes Votes shall then be counted. The Person having the greatest
Number be a Majority of the whole Number of shall be the President, if such
Number of shall be the President, if such Number be a Majority of the whole
Number of Votes, then the House of Representatives shall have an equal
Number of Votes of the Electors shall be the Vice President. But if there
number of President, and of all persons voted for as Vice-President and of the
Number of votes for President, shall be the The person having the greatest
number be a majority of the whole number of Electors President, if such
number of Electors President, if such number be a majority of the whole
number of votes as Vice-President, shall be the The person having the greatest
number be a majority of the whole number of Electors Vice-President, if such
number of Electors Vice-President, if such number be a majority of the whole
number of Senators, and a purpose shall consist of two-thirds of the whole
number shall be necessary to a choice. But no person majority of the whole
number of persons in each State, their respective numbers, counting the whole
number of such male citizens shall bear to the whole proportion which the
number of male citizens twenty-one years of age in such State.
number of electors of appoint in such manner as the Congress may direct: A
number of Senators and President and Vice President equal to the whole
numbers not exceeding three on the list of those voted for as the highest
numbers appointed, and if no person have a majority, then from the two highest
Numbers, which may be included within this Union, according to their respective
numbers, counting the whole number of persons in each State, their respective
numerous Branch of have the Qualifications requisite for Electors of the most
numerous branch of the State legislatures. requisite for electors of the most
Oath or Affirmation. When the President of the that Purpose, they shall be on
Oath or Affirmation:
Oath or the United States and of the several States, shall be bound by
Oath or no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by
oath, as a United States, or under any State, who, having previously taken an
Objections to that House in which it shall have originated, who shall enter the
Objections at large on their Journal, and proceed to reconsider it. If after
Objections, to the other House, by which it shall be sent, together with the
Obligation of Contracts, or grant any ex post facto Law, or Law impairing the
obligation incurred United States nor any State shall assume or pay any debt or
obligations and the loss or emancipation of any slave; but all such debts,
obliged to enter, clear, or pay Duties in another. one State, be
obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have the Assistance of process for
Occasions, convene both necessary and expedient; he may, on extraordinary
October following the 5. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on the 15th day of
of the United States, in Order to form a more perfect Union, We the People
of Liberty to defence, promote the general Welfare, and secure the Blessings
of America. United States
of the All legislative Powers herein granted shall be vested in a Congress
of a Senate and House of Representatives. United States, which shall consist
of Representatives. United States, which shall consist of a Senate and House
of Representatives shall be composed of Members chosen every second The House
of Members chosen every second The House of Representatives shall be composed
of the several States, and the Electors in each State shall Year by the People
of the most numerous Branch of have the Qualifications requisite for Electors
of have the Qualifications requisite for Electors of the most numerous Branch
of No Person shall be a Representative who shall not have attained to the Age
of the United States, and who twenty five Years, and been seven Years a Citizen
of that State in which he shall be shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant
of free Persons, which shall be determined by adding to the whole Number
of Years, and excluding Indians not including those bound to Service for a Term
of all other Persons. taxed, three fifths
of the Congress of the United States, and within every subsequent Term of ten
of the United States, and within every subsequent Term of ten of the Congress
of ten of the Congress of the United States, and within every subsequent Term
of Years, in such Manner as they shall by Law direct. The Number
of New Hampshire shall be entitled to choose three, made, the State
of Election to fill such Vacancies. Authority thereof shall issue Writs
of Representatives shall choose their Speaker and other Officers; and The House
of Impeachment. shall have the sole Power
of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each The Senate
of two Senators from each The Senate of the United States shall be composed
of the first Election, Immediately after they shall be assembled in Consequence
of the they shall be divided as equally as may be into three Classes. The Seats
of the first Class shall be vacated at the Expiration of the second Senators
of the second Senators of the first Class shall be vacated at the Expiration
of the second Class at the Expiration of the fourth Year, and of the Year,
of the fourth Year, and of the Year, of the second Class at the Expiration
of the Year, of the second Class at the Expiration of the fourth Year, and
of the sixth Year, so that one third may be third Class at the Expiration
of the Legislature of any State, the Executive thereof may during the Recess
of any State, the Executive thereof may during the Recess of the Legislature
of the Legislature, which make temporary Appointments until the next Meeting
of thirty No person shall be a Senator who shall not have attained to the Age
of the United States, and who shall not, Years, and been nine Years a Citizen
of that State for which he shall be chosen. when elected, be an Inhabitant
of the United States shall be President of the Senate, but The Vice President
of the Senate, but The Vice President of the United States shall be President
of the Vice President, or when he shall exercise the Office of in the absence
of in the absence of the Vice President, or when he shall exercise the Office
of the United States. President
of the that Purpose, they shall be on Oath or Affirmation. When the President
of two thirds of the Members present. convicted without the Concurrence
of the Members present. convicted without the Concurrence of two thirds
of Impeachment shall not extend further than to removal from Judgment in Cases
of honor, Trust or Office, and disqualification to hold and enjoy any Office
of holding Elections for Senators and The Times, Places and Manner
of Choosing Senators. as to the Place
of the Elections, Returns and Qualifications of Each House shall be the Judge
of Each House shall be the Judge of the Elections, Returns and Qualifications
of each shall constitute a Quorum to do its own Members, and a Majority
of absent Members, in such Manner, and authorized to compel the Attendance
of its Proceedings, punish its Members for Each House may determine the Rules
of two-thirds, expel a Member. disorderly Behavior, and, with the Concurrence
of its Proceedings, and from time to time Each House shall keep a Journal
of the Members of either House on any question Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays
of either House on any question Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays of the Members
of one fifth of those Present, be entered on the Journal. shall, at the Desire
of those Present, be entered on the Journal. shall, at the Desire of one fifth
of Congress, shall, without the Consent of Neither House, during the Session
of Neither House, during the Session of Congress, shall, without the Consent
of the Treasury of the United Services, to be ascertained by Law, and paid out
of the United Services, to be ascertained by Law, and paid out of the Treasury
of the States. They shall in all Cases, except Treason, Felony and Breach
of Peace, be privileged from Arrest during their Attendance at the Session
of the United States which be appointed to any civil Office under the Authority
of either House during his Continuance in Office. shall be a Member
of Representatives; All bills for raising Revenue shall originate in the House
of Representatives and the Senate, Every Bill which shall have passed the House
of the United shall, before it become a Law, be presented to the President
of that House shall agree to pass the Bill, it such Reconsideration two thirds
of that House, it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds
of both Houses shall be shall become a Law. But in all such Cases the Votes
of the Persons voting for and determined by Yeas and Nays, and the Names
of each House respectively. If against the Bill shall be entered on the Journal
of the Senate and Every Order, Resolution, or Vote to which the Concurrence
of Representatives may be necessary (except on a question of Adjournment) House
of Adjournment) House of Representatives may be necessary (except on a question
of the United States; and before the Same shall be presented to the President
of the Senate and House of Representatives, according be repassed by two thirds
of Representatives, according be repassed by two thirds of the Senate and House
of a Bill. to the Rules and Limitations prescribed in the Case
of the United States; but all Duties, Imposts and Excises shall be Welfare
of the United States; To borrow money on the credit
of Naturalization, and uniform Laws on the subject To establish an uniform Rule
of Bankruptcies throughout the United States;
of foreign Coin, and fix the To coin Money, regulate the Value thereof, and
of Weights and Measures; Standard
of counterfeiting the Securities and current Coin To provide for the Punishment
of the United States;
of Science and useful Arts, by securing for limited To promote the Progress
of Nations; Offenses against the Law
of Marque and Reprisal, and make Rules concerning To declare War, grant Letters
of Money to that Use shall be To raise and support Armies, but no Appropriation
of the land and naval Forces; To make Rules for the Government and Regulation
of the Union, To provide for calling forth the Militia to execute the Laws
of them as may be employed in the Service of the United governing such Part
of the United governing such Part of them as may be employed in the Service
of the Officers, States, reserving to the States respectively, the Appointment
of training the Militia according to the discipline and the Authority
of particular States, and (not exceeding ten Miles square) as may, by Cession
of Congress, become the Seat of the Government of the United the acceptance
of the Government of the United the acceptance of Congress, become the Seat
of the United the acceptance of Congress, become the Seat of the Government
of the Legislature of the State in which the Same shall be, for the Erection of
of the State in which the Same shall be, for the Erection of of the Legislature
of of the Legislature of the State in which the Same shall be, for the Erection
of the United States, or in any Department or Constitution in the Government
of such Persons as any of the States now existing The Migration or Importation
of the States now existing The Migration or Importation of such Persons as any
of the Writ of Habeas Corpus shall not be suspended, unless when The privilege
of Habeas Corpus shall not be suspended, unless when The privilege of the Writ
of Rebellion or Invasion the public Safety may require it. in Cases
of Attainder or ex post facto Law shall be passed. No Bill
of Commerce or Revenue to the No Preference shall be given by any Regulation
of one State over those of another: nor shall Vessels bound to, or from, Ports
of another: nor shall Vessels bound to, or from, Ports of one State over those
of Appropriations No Money shall be drawn from the Treasury, but in Consequence
of the Receipts and made by Law; and a regular Statement and Account
of all public Money shall be published from time to time. Expenditures
of Nobility shall be granted by the United States: And no Person No Title
of Profit or Trust under them, shall, without the Consent of holding any Office
of holding any Office of Profit or Trust under them, shall, without the Consent
of any present, Emolument, Office, or Title, of any kind the Congress, accept
of any kind the Congress, accept of any present, Emolument, Office, or Title,
of Marque and Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills of Credit; make any Thing but
of Credit; make any Thing but of Marque and Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills
of Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder, gold and silver Coin a Tender in Payment
of Attainder, gold and silver Coin a Tender in Payment of Debts; pass any Bill
of Contracts, or grant any ex post facto Law, or Law impairing the Obligation
of Nobility. Title
of the Congress, lay any Imposts or Duties No State shall, without the Consent
of all Duties and Imposts, laid by its inspection Laws: and the net Produce
of the Treasury of the any State on Imports or Exports, shall be for the Use
of the any State on Imports or Exports, shall be for the Use of the Treasury
of the Congress.
of Congress, lay any duty of Tonnage, keep No State shall, without the Consent
of Tonnage, keep No State shall, without the Consent of Congress, lay any duty
of War in time of Peace, enter into any Agreement or Compact Troops, or Ships
of Peace, enter into any Agreement or Compact Troops, or Ships of War in time
of delay. invaded, or in such imminent Danger as will not admit
of the United States of The executive Power shall be vested in a President
of The executive Power shall be vested in a President of the United States
of four Years, and, together America. He shall hold his Office during the Term
of Electors, equal to the whole Number of Senators and Representatives a Number
of Senators and Representatives a Number of Electors, equal to the whole Number
of Trust or Profit under the United Representative, or Person holding an Office
of whom one at least shall not lie an Inhabitant of the same State persons,
of the same State persons, of whom one at least shall not lie an Inhabitant
of all the Persons voted for, and with themselves. And they shall make a List
of the Number of Votes for each; which List they shall sign and certify, and
of Votes for each; which List they shall sign and certify, and of the Number
of the Government of the United States, directed to transmit sealed to the Seat
of the United States, directed to transmit sealed to the Seat of the Government
of the Senate. The President of the Senate shall, in the Presence the President
of the Senate shall, in the Presence the President of the Senate. The President
of the Senate and House of Representatives, open all the Certificates, and the
of Representatives, open all the Certificates, and the of the Senate and House
of Votes Votes shall then be counted. The Person having the greatest Number
of the whole Number of shall be the President, if such Number be a Majority
of shall be the President, if such Number be a Majority of the whole Number
of Votes, then the House of Representatives shall have an equal Number
of Representatives shall have an equal Number of Votes, then the House
of them for President; and if no Person have a immediately choose by Ballot one
of a Member or Members from two-thirds of the for this Purpose shall consist
of the for this Purpose shall consist of a Member or Members from two-thirds
of all the States shall be necessary to a Choice. In States, and a Majority
of the President, the Person having the greatest every Case, after the Choice
of Votes of the Electors shall be the Vice President. But if there Number
of the Electors shall be the Vice President. But if there Number of Votes
of choosing the Electors, and the Day on The Congress may determine the Time
of the United States, at No person except a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen
of the Adoption of this Constitution, shall be eligible to the Office the time
of this Constitution, shall be eligible to the Office the time of the Adoption
of President; neither shall any Person be eligible to that Office who shall not
of thirty-five Years, and been fourteen Years a have attained to the Age
of the Removal of the President from Office, or of his Death, In Case
of the President from Office, or of his Death, In Case of the Removal
of his Death, In Case of the Removal of the President from Office, or
of the said Resignation, or Inability to discharge the Powers and Duties
of Removal, Death, Resignation or Inability, both of Law provide for the Case
of Law provide for the Case of Removal, Death, Resignation or Inability, both
of them. Emolument from the United States, or any
of his Office, he shall take the following Before he enter on the Execution
of "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office
of the United States, and will to the best of my Ability, preserve, President
of my Ability, preserve, President of the United States, and will to the best
of the United States." protect and defend the Constitution
of the Army and Navy of the United The President shall be Commander in Chief
of the United The President shall be Commander in Chief of the Army and Navy
of the Militia of the several States, when called into the actual States, and
of the several States, when called into the actual States, and of the Militia
of the United States; he may require the Opinion, in writing, of the Service
of the Service of the United States; he may require the Opinion, in writing,
of the executive Departments, upon any subject principal Officer in each
of their respective Offices, and he shall have Power to relating to the Duties
of Impeachment. Cases
of the Senate, to make He shall have Power, by and with the Advice and Consent
of the Senators present concur; and he shall Treaties, provided two thirds
of the Senate, shall appoint nominate, and by and with the Advice and Consent
of the supreme Court, Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, Judges
of the United States, whose Appointments are not herein and all other Officers
of such inferior Officers, as they think may by Law vest the Appointment
of Law, or in the Heads of proper, in the President alone, in the Courts
of proper, in the President alone, in the Courts of Law, or in the Heads
of the Senate, by granting Commissions which shall expire at the End the Recess
of their next Session.
of the State of the He shall from time to time give to the Congress Information
of the He shall from time to time give to the Congress Information of the State
of them, and in Case of Disagreement between them, with Houses, or either
of Disagreement between them, with Houses, or either of them, and in Case
of Adjournment, he may adjourn them to such Time as he Respect to the Time
of the United States. the Officers
of the United States, The President, Vice President and all civil Officers
of the United States, shall be vested in one supreme Court, The judicial Power
of the supreme and inferior Courts, shall hold establish. The Judges, both
of the United States, and Treaties made, or which this Constitution, the Laws
of admiralty and maritime public Ministers and Consuls; to all Cases
of Controversies between two or more States; between a State and Citizens
of different States; between Citizens of the another State; between Citizens
of the another State; between Citizens of different States; between Citizens
of different States, and between a same State claiming Lands under Grants
of all Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and The Trial
of Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and The Trial of all Crimes, except in Cases
of Treason unless on the Testimony of two Witnesses to the shall be convicted
of two Witnesses to the shall be convicted of Treason unless on the Testimony
of Treason, but no The Congress shall have power to declare the Punishment
of Treason shall work Corruption of Blood, or Forfeiture except Attainder
of Blood, or Forfeiture except Attainder of Treason shall work Corruption
of the Person attainted. during the Life
of every other State. And the Congress may by general and judicial Proceedings
of each State shall be entitled to all Privileges and Immunities The Citizens
of Citizens in the several States.
of the flee from Justice, and be found in another State, shall on demand
of the State from which he fled, be delivered up, to be executive Authority
of the Crime. removed to the State having Jurisdiction
of any Law or Regulation therein, escaping into another, shall, in Consequence
of the Party to whom such Service or Labour may be due.
of any other State; nor any shall be formed or erected within the Jurisdiction
of two or more States, or parts of States, State be formed by the Junction
of States, State be formed by the Junction of two or more States, or parts
of the Legislatures of the States concerned as well as of without the Consent
of the States concerned as well as of without the Consent of the Legislatures
of without the Consent of the Legislatures of the States concerned as well as
of and make all needful Rules and The Congress shall have Power to dispose
of the United States, or of any particular State. any Claims
of any particular State. any Claims of the United States, or
of Government, and shall protect each of them against Invasion; and on Form
of them against Invasion; and on Form of Government, and shall protect each
of the Legislature, or of the Executive (when the Legislature Application
of the Executive (when the Legislature Application of the Legislature, or
of both Houses shall deem it necessary, shall The Congress, whenever two thirds
of the propose Amendments to this Constitution, or, on the Application
of two thirds of the several States, shall call a Convention for Legislatures
of the several States, shall call a Convention for Legislatures of two thirds
of this Constitution, when ratified by the Legislatures of Purposes, as part
of Purposes, as part of this Constitution, when ratified by the Legislatures
of the several States, or by Conventions in three fourths three fourths
of Ratification may be proposed by the thereof, as the one or the other Mode
of the first Article; and that no State, fourth Clauses in the Ninth Section
of its equal Suffrage in the Senate. without its Consent, shall be deprived
of this All Debts contracted and Engagements entered into, before the Adoption
of the United States which shall be made in This Constitution, and the Laws
of the United States, shall be the supreme Law of the Land; and the Authority
of the Land; and the Authority of the United States, shall be the supreme Law
of any State to the Contrary notwithstanding. Laws
of the The Senators and Representatives before mentioned, and the Members
of several State Legislatures, and all executive and judicial Officers, both
of the several States, shall be bound by Oath or the United States and
of the Conventions of nine States, shall be sufficient for the The Ratification
of nine States, shall be sufficient for the The Ratification of the Conventions
of this Constitution between the States so ratifying the Same. Establishment
of the States present the Done in Convention by the Unanimous Consent
of September in the Year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred Seventeenth Day
of our Lord one thousand seven hundred Seventeenth Day of September in the Year
of the Independence of the United States of America the and Eighty seven and
of the United States of America the and Eighty seven and of the Independence
of America the and Eighty seven and of the Independence of the United States
of St Thomas Jenifer, Daniel Carroll Maryland - James McHenry, Daniel
of religion, or Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment
of speech, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom
of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition
of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition of the press; or the right
of grievances. the Government for a redress
of a free State, the A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security
of the people to keep and bear Arms, shall not be infringed. right
of peace be quartered in any house, without the No Soldier shall, in time
of the Owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by consent
of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor in time
of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and The right
of a Grand Jury, except in cases arising unless on a presentment or indictment
of War or public danger; nor shall any person be subject for the same offense
of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any to be twice put in jeopardy
of life, criminal case to be a witness against himself, nor be deprived
of law; nor shall private property be liberty, or property, without due process
of the State and district wherein the crime public trial, by an impartial jury
of the nature and cause of the ascertained by law, and to be informed
of the ascertained by law, and to be informed of the nature and cause
of process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have the Assistance
of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a dollars, the right
of the United States, than jury, shall be otherwise re-examined in any Court
of the common law. according to the rules
of certain rights, shall not be construed The enumeration in the Constitution,
of the United States shall not be construed to extend to any The Judicial power
of the United States suit in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one
of another State, or by Citizens or Subjects of any Foreign State. by Citizens
of any Foreign State. by Citizens of another State, or by Citizens or Subjects
of whom, at least, shall not be an inhabitant President and Vice-President, one
of the same state with themselves; they shall name in their ballots the person
of all persons voted for as Vice-President, and they shall make distinct lists
of all persons voted for as Vice-President and of the number of President, and
of the number of President, and of all persons voted for as Vice-President and
of President, and of all persons voted for as Vice-President and of the number
of the government of the United States, directed to the President of the seat
of the United States, directed to the President of the seat of the government
of the seat of the government of the United States, directed to the President
of the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and House of The President
of the Senate and House of The President of the Senate shall, in the presence
of The President of the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and House
of votes for President, shall be the The person having the greatest Number
of the whole number of Electors President, if such number be a majority
of Electors President, if such number be a majority of the whole number
of those voted for as the highest numbers not exceeding three on the list
of Representatives shall choose immediately, by ballot, President, the House
of a member or members from two-thirds of the states, and purpose shall consist
of the states, and purpose shall consist of a member or members from two-thirds
of all the states shall be necessary to a choice. And if the House a majority
of Representatives shall not choose a President whenever the right of choice
of choice of Representatives shall not choose a President whenever the right
of March next following, then shall devolve upon them, before the fourth day
of the death or other the Vice-President shall act as President, as in the case
of the President. constitutional disability
of votes as Vice-President, shall be the The person having the greatest number
of the whole number of Electors Vice-President, if such number be a majority
of Electors Vice-President, if such number be a majority of the whole number
of two-thirds of the whole number of Senators, and a purpose shall consist
of the whole number of Senators, and a purpose shall consist of two-thirds
of Senators, and a purpose shall consist of two-thirds of the whole number
of the whole number shall be necessary to a choice. But no person majority
of President shall be eligible to constitutionally ineligible to the office
of Vice-President of the United States. that
of the United States. that of Vice-President
of the United States and of the State jurisdiction thereof, are citizens
of the State jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States and
of citizens of the United States; nor shall any the privileges or immunities
of the United States; nor shall any the privileges or immunities of citizens
of life, liberty, or property, without due process of State deprive any person
of State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process
of the law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection
of persons in each State, their respective numbers, counting the whole number
of electors for President and Vice-President of the United States, choice
of the United States, choice of electors for President and Vice-President
of a State, or Representatives in Congress, the Executive and Judicial officers
of the Legislature thereof, is denied to any of the male the members
of the male the members of the Legislature thereof, is denied to any
of such State, being twenty-one years of age, and citizens of the inhabitants
of age, and citizens of the inhabitants of such State, being twenty-one years
of the inhabitants of such State, being twenty-one years of age, and citizens
of representation therein shall be reduced in the or other crime, the basis
of such male citizens shall bear to the whole proportion which the number
of male citizens twenty-one years of age in such State. number
of age in such State. number of male citizens twenty-one years
of 3. No person shall be a Senator or Representative in Congress, or elector
of Congress, or as an officer of the United States, or as a member of member
of the United States, or as a member of member of Congress, or as an officer
of member of Congress, or as an officer of the United States, or as a member
of any State, to any State legislature, or as an executive or judicial officer
of the United States, shall have engaged in support the Constitution
of two-thirds of each House, remove enemies thereof. But Congress may by a vote
of each House, remove enemies thereof. But Congress may by a vote of two-thirds
of the public debt of the United States, authorized by law, 4. The validity
of the United States, authorized by law, 4. The validity of the public debt
of pensions and bounties for services in including debts incurred for payment
of insurrection or rebellion against the United States, or any claim for in aid
of any slave; but all such debts, obligations and the loss or emancipation
of this article. provisions
of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or 1. The right
of the United States to vote shall not be denied or 1. The right of citizens
of race, color, or abridged by the United States or by any State on account
of servitude. previous condition
of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each The Senate
of two Senators from each The Senate of the United States shall be composed
of the most numerous branch of the State legislatures. requisite for electors
of the State legislatures. requisite for electors of the most numerous branch
of any State in the Senate, the When vacancies happen in the representation
of such State shall issue writs of election to fill such executive authority
of election to fill such executive authority of such State shall issue writs
of any State may empower the vacancies: Provided, That the legislature
of This amendment shall not be so construed as to affect the election or term
of the Constitution. any Senator chosen before it becomes valid as part
of this article the manufacture, sale, 1. After one year from the ratification
of intoxicating liquors within, the importation thereof into, or transportation
of the several States, as amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures
of the provided in the Constitution, within seven years from the date
of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or The right
of the United States to vote shall not be denied or The right of citizens
of sex. abridged by the United States or by any State on account
of the President and Vice President shall end at noon on the 20th 1. The terms
of January, and the terms of Senators and Representatives at noon on the 3d day
of Senators and Representatives at noon on the 3d day of January, and the terms
of January, of the years in which such terms would have ended if this day
of the years in which such terms would have ended if this day of January,
of their successors shall then article had not been ratified; and the terms
of January, unless they shall by law appoint shall begin at noon on the 3d day
of the term of the President, the 3. If, at the time fixed for the beginning
of the President, the 3. If, at the time fixed for the beginning of the term
of his term, or if the President elect shall have failed to the beginning
of the death of any of the 4. The Congress may by law provide for the case
of any of the 4. The Congress may by law provide for the case of the death
of the 4. The Congress may by law provide for the case of the death of any
of Representatives may choose a President whenever persons from whom the House
of choice shall have devolved upon them, and for the case of the the right
of the the right of choice shall have devolved upon them, and for the case
of any of the persons from whom the Senate may choose a Vice President death
of the persons from whom the Senate may choose a Vice President death of any
of choice shall have devolved upon them. whenever the right
of October following the 5. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on the 15th day
of this article. ratification
of three-fourths of the amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures
of the amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths
of its submission. several States within seven years from the date
of amendment to the Constitution of the United States 1. The eighteenth article
of the United States 1. The eighteenth article of amendment to the Constitution
of the United States for delivery or use therein of intoxicating liquors, in
of intoxicating liquors, in of the United States for delivery or use therein
of the laws thereof, is hereby prohibited. violation
of the submission hereof in the Constitution, within seven years from the date
of the President more than twice, 1. No person shall be elected to the office
of President, or acted as President, for and no person who has held the office
of a term to which some other person was elected President more than two years
of the President more than once. But this shall be elected to the office
of President, when this Article shall not apply to any person holding the office
of President, or acting as President, during the term be holding the office
of within which this Article becomes operative from holding the office
of such term. President or acting as President during the remainder
of three-fourths of the amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures
of the amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths
of its submission to the States several States within seven years from the date
of Government of the United States shall 1. The District constituting the seat
of the United States shall 1. The District constituting the seat of Government
of electors of appoint in such manner as the Congress may direct: A number
of appoint in such manner as the Congress may direct: A number of electors
of Senators and President and Vice President equal to the whole number
of the election of President and Vice President, to be electors the purposes
of President and Vice President, to be electors the purposes of the election
of amendment. duties as provided by the twelfth article
of citizens of the United States to vote in any primary or other 1. The right
of the United States to vote in any primary or other 1. The right of citizens
of failure to denied or abridged by the United States or any State by reason
of the removal of the President from office or of his death or 1. In case
of the President from office or of his death or 1. In case of the removal
of his death or 1. In case of the removal of the President from office or
of the Vice President, the 2. Whenever there is a vacancy in the office
of both Houses of Congress. confirmation by a majority vote
of Congress. confirmation by a majority vote of both Houses
of the Senate 3. Whenever the President transmits to the President pro tempore
of the House of Representatives his written declaration that he and the Speaker
of Representatives his written declaration that he and the Speaker of the House
of his office, and until he is unable to discharge the powers and duties
of either the principal officers 4. Whenever the Vice President and a majority
of the executive departments or of such other body as Congress may by law
of such other body as Congress may by law of the executive departments or
of the Senate and the Speaker of provide, transmit to the President pro tempore
of provide, transmit to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker
of Representatives their written declaration that the President is the House
of his office, the Vice President unable to discharge the powers and duties
of the office as Acting shall immediately assume the powers and duties
of the Thereafter, when the President transmits to the President pro tempore
of the House of Representatives his written declaration Senate and the Speaker
of Representatives his written declaration Senate and the Speaker of the House
of his office that no inability exists, he shall resume the powers and duties
of either the principal officers of unless the Vice President and a majority
of unless the Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers
of such other body as Congress may by law provide, the executive department or
of the Senate and the transmit within four days to the President pro tempore
of the House of Representatives their written declaration that the Speaker
of Representatives their written declaration that the Speaker of the House
of his office. Thereupon President is unable to discharge the powers and duties
of the latter written declaration, or, if Congress is not in session, receipt
of both Houses that the President is unable to discharge the two thirds vote
of his office, the Vice President shall continue to discharge powers and duties
of his office. and duties
of citizens of the United States, who are eighteen years of age or 1. The right
of the United States, who are eighteen years of age or 1. The right of citizens
of age or 1. The right of citizens of the United States, who are eighteen years
of age. State on account
of the Senators and No law, varying the compensation for the services
of Representatives shall Representatives, shall take effect, until an election
of, Treason, shall be removed from Office on Impeachment for, and Conviction
offense of War or public danger; nor shall any person be subject for the same
Offenses against the Law of Nations;
Offenses against the United States, except in Grant Reprieves and Pardons for
Office of in the absence of the Vice President, or when he shall exercise the
Office of honor, Trust or Office, and disqualification to hold and enjoy any
Office under the Authority of the United States which be appointed to any civil
Office under the United States, during such time; and no Person holding any
Office of Profit or Trust under them, shall, without the Consent of holding any
Office during the Term of four Years, and, together America. He shall hold his
Office of Trust or Profit under the United Representative, or Person holding an
Office the time of the Adoption of this Constitution, shall be eligible to the
Office who shall not of President; neither shall any Person be eligible to that
Office of "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the
Office on Impeachment for, and Conviction of, Treason, shall be removed from
Office or public Trust under the United required as a Qualification to any
office of President shall be eligible to constitutionally ineligible to the
office of the President more than twice, 1. No person shall be elected to the
office of President, or acted as President, for and no person who has held the
office of the President more than once. But this shall be elected to the
office of President, when this Article shall not apply to any person holding the
office of President, or acting as President, during the term be holding the
office of within which this Article becomes operative from holding the
office or of his death or 1. In case of the removal of the President from
office of the Vice President, the 2. Whenever there is a vacancy in the
office upon President shall nominate a Vice President who shall take
office as Acting shall immediately assume the powers and duties of the
office that no inability exists, he shall resume the powers and duties of his
Office, and disqualification to hold and enjoy any Office of honor, Trust or
Office, or Title, of any kind the Congress, accept of any present, Emolument,
Office, or of his Death, In Case of the Removal of the President from
Office, the same shall devolve on the Vice President, and the Congress may by
Office, he shall take the following Before he enter on the Execution of his
office, civil or military, under the President and Vice-President, or hold any
office, and until he is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his
office, the Vice President unable to discharge the powers and duties of his
office, the Vice President shall continue to discharge powers and duties of his
Office. shall be a Member of either House during his Continuance in
Office. Continuance in
office. Thereupon President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his
office. and duties of his
Officer thereof.
Officer shall then act as the President and Vice President, declaring what
Officer shall act accordingly, until the Disability be President, and such
Officer in each of the executive Departments, upon any subject principal
officer of the United States, or as a member of member of Congress, or as an
officer of any State, to any State legislature, or as an executive or judicial
Officers of the United States, whose Appointments are not herein and all other
Officers of the United States. the
Officers of the United States, The President, Vice President and all civil
officers of a State, or Representatives in Congress, the Executive and Judicial
officers 4. Whenever the Vice President and a majority of either the principal
officers of unless the Vice President and a majority of either the principal
Officers, and also a President pro tempore, The Senate shall choose their other
Officers, States, reserving to the States respectively, the Appointment of the
Officers, as they think may by Law vest the Appointment of such inferior
Officers, both of several State Legislatures, and all executive and judicial
Officers; and The House of Representatives shall choose their Speaker and other
Offices and Post Roads; To establish Post
Offices during good Behavior, and shall, at stated Times, receive for their
Offices, and he shall have Power to relating to the Duties of their respective
older, to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any
on Oath or Affirmation. When the President of the that Purpose, they shall be
on the first Monday in December, unless they shall by Law appoint a be
on any question Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays of the Members of either House
on the Journal. shall, at the Desire of one fifth of those Present, be entered
on other Bills. but the Senate may propose or concur with Amendments as
on their Journal, and proceed to reconsider it. If after Objections at large
on the Journal of each House respectively. If against the Bill shall be entered
on a question of Adjournment) House of Representatives may be necessary (except
on the credit of the United States; To borrow money
on the subject To establish an uniform Rule of Naturalization, and uniform Laws
on the high Seas, and To define and punish Piracies and Felonies committed
on Land and Water; Captures
on such Importation, not exceeding ten dollars for each Person.
on Articles exported from any State. No Tax or Duty shall be laid
on Imports or Exports, except what may be absolutely necessary for executing
on Imports or Exports, shall be for the Use of the Treasury of the any State
on the List the said House shall in like Majority, then from the five highest
on The Congress may determine the Time of choosing the Electors, and the Day
on the Vice President, and the Congress may by Office, the same shall devolve
on the Execution of his Office, he shall take the following Before he enter
on extraordinary Occasions, convene both necessary and expedient; he may,
on Impeachment for, and Conviction of, Treason, shall be removed from Office
on the Testimony of two Witnesses to the shall be convicted of Treason unless
on Confession in open Court. same overt Act, or
on demand of the flee from Justice, and be found in another State, shall
on Claim be discharged from such Service or Labour, But shall be delivered up
on Form of Government, and shall protect each of them against Invasion; and
on the Application of the propose Amendments to this Constitution, or,
on a presentment or indictment of a Grand Jury, except in cases arising unless
on the list of those voted for as the highest numbers not exceeding three
on the list, the Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the
on account of race, color, or abridged by the United States or by any State
on incomes, from The Congress shall have power to lay and collect taxes
on account of sex. abridged by the United States or by any State
on the 20th 1. The terms of the President and Vice President shall end at noon
on the 3d day of January, and the terms of Senators and Representatives at noon
on the 3d day of January, unless they shall by law appoint shall begin at noon
on the 15th day of October following the 5. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect
on account of age. State
once in every Year, and such Meeting shall The Congress shall assemble at least
once in every year, and such meeting 2. The Congress shall assemble at least
once. But this shall be elected to the office of the President more than
one for every thirty Thousand, but each State Representatives shall not exceed
one Representative; and until such enumeration shall be shall have at Least
one Vote. have
one third may be third Class at the Expiration of the sixth Year, so that
one fifth of those Present, be entered on the Journal. shall, at the Desire of
one thousand eight hundred and eight, but a tax or duty may be imposed the Year
one State over those of another: nor shall Vessels bound to, or from, Ports of
one State, be obliged to enter, clear, or pay Duties in another.
one at least shall not lie an Inhabitant of the same State persons, of whom
one who have such Majority, and Electors appointed; and if there be more than
one of them for President; and if no Person have a immediately choose by Ballot
one Vote; a quorum taken by States, the Representation from each State having
one supreme Court, The judicial Power of the United States, shall be vested in
one State, under the Laws thereof, No Person held to Service or Labour in
one or the other Mode of Ratification may be proposed by the thereof, as the
One Congress; Provided that no Amendment which may be made prior to the Year
one thousand seven hundred Seventeenth Day of September in the Year of our Lord
one of the United States suit in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against
one of whom, at least, shall not be an inhabitant President and Vice-President,
one vote; a quorum for this states, the representation from each state having
one vote. The electors in each State shall have the qualifications have
one year from the ratification of this article the manufacture, sale, 1. After
one who is to declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in which
one days after purpose if not in session. If the Congress, within twenty
one days after Congress is required to assemble, determines by within twenty
one, Connecticut Massachusetts eight, Rhode Island and Providence Plantations
one, Maryland five, New York six, New Jersey four, Pennsylvania eight, Delaware
only in levying War against Treason against the United States, shall consist
open all the Certificates, and the of the Senate and House of Representatives,
open Court. same overt Act, or on Confession in
open all the certificates and the votes shall then be counted; Representatives,
operative from holding the office of within which this Article becomes
Opinion, in writing, of the Service of the United States; he may require the
or otherwise, chosen every second Year; and if Vacancies happen by Resignation,
or when he shall exercise the Office of in the absence of the Vice President,
or Affirmation. When the President of the that Purpose, they shall be on Oath
or Office, and disqualification to hold and enjoy any Office of honor, Trust
or alter such Regulations, except but the Congress may at any time by Law make
or Debate in either House, they shall not be questioned in any other any Speech
or Representative shall, during the Time for which he was elected, No Senator
or the Emoluments whereof shall have been increased shall have been created,
or concur with Amendments as on other Bills. but the Senate may propose
or Vote to which the Concurrence of the Senate and Every Order, Resolution,
or being disapproved by him, shall shall take Effect, shall be approved by him,
or in any Department or Constitution in the Government of the United States,
or Constitution in the Government of the United States, or in any Department
or Importation of such Persons as any of the States now existing The Migration
or duty may be imposed the Year one thousand eight hundred and eight, but a tax
or Invasion the public Safety may require it. in Cases of Rebellion
or ex post facto Law shall be passed. No Bill of Attainder
or other direct, Tax shall be laid, unless in Proportion to the No capitation,
or Enumeration herein before directed to be taken. Census
or Duty shall be laid on Articles exported from any State. No Tax
or Revenue to the No Preference shall be given by any Regulation of Commerce
or from, Ports of one State over those of another: nor shall Vessels bound to,
or pay Duties in another. one State, be obliged to enter, clear,
or Trust under them, shall, without the Consent of holding any Office of Profit
or Title, of any kind the Congress, accept of any present, Emolument, Office,
or foreign State. whatever, from any King, Prince
or Confederation; grant Letters No State shall enter into any Treaty, Alliance,
or Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts, or grant any ex post facto Law,
or grant any ex post facto Law, or Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts,
or Duties No State shall, without the Consent of the Congress, lay any Imposts
or Exports, except what may be absolutely necessary for executing on Imports
or Exports, shall be for the Use of the Treasury of the any State on Imports
or Ships of War in time of Peace, enter into any Agreement or Compact Troops,
or Compact Troops, or Ships of War in time of Peace, enter into any Agreement
or with a foreign Power, or engage in War, unless actually with another State,
or engage in War, unless actually with another State, or with a foreign Power,
or in such imminent Danger as will not admit of delay. invaded,
or to which the State may be entitled in the Congress: but no Senator
or Person holding an Office of Trust or Profit under the United Representative,
or Profit under the United Representative, or Person holding an Office of Trust
or Members from two-thirds of the for this Purpose shall consist of a Member
or more who have equal Votes, the Senate shall choose from should remain two
or a Citizen of the United States, at No person except a natural born Citizen,
or of his Death, In Case of the Removal of the President from Office,
or Inability to discharge the Powers and Duties of the said Resignation,
or Inability, both of Law provide for the Case of Removal, Death, Resignation
or a President shall be elected. removed,
or any of them. Emolument from the United States,
or Affirmation: Oath
or in the Heads of proper, in the President alone, in the Courts of Law,
or either of them, and in Case of Disagreement between them, with Houses,
or other high Crimes and Misdemeanors. Bribery,
or which this Constitution, the Laws of the United States, and Treaties made,
or more States; between a State and Citizens of Controversies between two
or the Citizens thereof, and foreign States, Citizens or Subjects. State,
or Subjects. State, or the Citizens thereof, and foreign States, Citizens
or Places as the Congress may by Law have directed. Place
or in adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort. No Person them,
or on Confession in open Court. same overt Act,
or Forfeiture except Attainder of Treason shall work Corruption of Blood,
or other Crime, who shall A Person charged in any State with Treason, Felony,
or Labour in one State, under the Laws thereof, No Person held to Service
or Regulation therein, escaping into another, shall, in Consequence of any Law
or Labour, But shall be delivered up on Claim be discharged from such Service
or Labour may be due. of the Party to whom such Service
or erected within the Jurisdiction of any other State; nor any shall be formed
or more States, or parts of States, State be formed by the Junction of two
or parts of States, State be formed by the Junction of two or more States,
or other Property belonging to the United Regulations respecting the Territory
or of any particular State. any Claims of the United States,
or of the Executive (when the Legislature Application of the Legislature,
or by Conventions in three fourths three fourths of the several States,
or the other Mode of Ratification may be proposed by the thereof, as the one
or which shall be made, under the Pursuance thereof; and all Treaties made,
or Judges in every State shall be bound thereby, any Thing in the Constitution
or the United States and of the several States, shall be bound by Oath
or public Trust under the United required as a Qualification to any Office
or Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion,
or abridging the freedom of speech, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof;
or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech,
or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition of the press;
or no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by Oath
or things to be seized. persons
or otherwise infamous crime, No person shall be held to answer for a capital,
or indictment of a Grand Jury, except in cases arising unless on a presentment
or naval forces, or in the Militia, when in actual service in time in the land
or in the Militia, when in actual service in time in the land or naval forces,
or public danger; nor shall any person be subject for the same offense of War
or limb; nor shall be compelled in any to be twice put in jeopardy of life
or property, without due process of law; nor shall private property be liberty,
or disparage others retained by the people. to deny
or to prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively,
or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of the United States suit in law
or prosecuted against one of the United States suit in law or equity, commenced
or by Citizens or Subjects of any Foreign State. by Citizens of another State,
or Subjects of any Foreign State. by Citizens of another State, or by Citizens
or members from two-thirds of the states, and purpose shall consist of a member
or other the Vice-President shall act as President, as in the case of the death
or any place subject to their jurisdiction. States,
or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the 1. All persons born
or enforce any law which shall abridge wherein they reside. No State shall make
or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any the privileges
or property, without due process of State deprive any person of life, liberty,
or Representatives in Congress, the Executive and Judicial officers of a State,
or in any way abridged, except for participation in rebellion, United States,
or other crime, the basis of representation therein shall be reduced in the
or Representative in Congress, or elector of 3. No person shall be a Senator
or elector of 3. No person shall be a Senator or Representative in Congress,
or hold any office, civil or military, under the President and Vice-President,
or military, under the President and Vice-President, or hold any office, civil
or under any State, who, having previously taken an oath, as a United States,
or as an officer of the United States, or as a member of member of Congress,
or as a member of member of Congress, or as an officer of the United States,
or as an executive or judicial officer of any State, to any State legislature,
or judicial officer of any State, to any State legislature, or as an executive
or rebellion against the same, or given aid or comfort to the insurrection
or given aid or comfort to the insurrection or rebellion against the same,
or comfort to the insurrection or rebellion against the same, or given aid
or rebellion, shall not be questioned. But neither the suppressing insurrection
or pay any debt or obligation incurred United States nor any State shall assume
or obligation incurred United States nor any State shall assume or pay any debt
or rebellion against the United States, or any claim for in aid of insurrection
or any claim for in aid of insurrection or rebellion against the United States,
or emancipation of any slave; but all such debts, obligations and the loss
or 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied
or by any State on account of race, color, or abridged by the United States
or abridged by the United States or by any State on account of race, color,
or enumeration. without regard to any census
or term of This amendment shall not be so construed as to affect the election
or transportation of intoxicating liquors within, the importation thereof into,
or the exportation thereof from the United States and all territory subject to
or The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied
or by any State on account of sex. abridged by the United States
or if the President elect shall have failed to the beginning of his term,
or the manner in which one who is to declaring who shall then act as President,
or Vice President shall have qualified.
or importation into any State, Territory, or possession 2. The transportation
or possession 2. The transportation or importation into any State, Territory,
or use therein of intoxicating liquors, in of the United States for delivery
or acted as President, for and no person who has held the office of President,
or acting as President, during the term be holding the office of President,
or acting as President during the remainder of such term. President
or other 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote in any primary
or Vice President, for electors for President or election for President
or election for President or Vice President, for electors for President
or for Senator or Representative in Congress, shall not be Vice President,
or Representative in Congress, shall not be Vice President, or for Senator
or abridged by the United States or any State by reason of failure to denied
or any State by reason of failure to denied or abridged by the United States
or other tax. pay any poll tax
or of his death or 1. In case of the removal of the President from office
or 1. In case of the removal of the President from office or of his death
or of such other body as Congress may by law of the executive departments
or of such other body as Congress may by law provide, the executive department
or 1. The right of citizens of the United States, who are eighteen years of age
or abridged by the United States or by any older, to vote shall not be denied
or by any older, to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States
or, on the Application of the propose Amendments to this Constitution,
or, if Congress is not in session, receipt of the latter written declaration,
ordain and establish this Constitution for the ourselves and our Posterity, do
ordain and and in such inferior Courts as the Congress may from time to time
Order to form a more perfect Union, We the People of the United States, in
Order, Resolution, or Vote to which the Concurrence of the Senate and Every
organizing, arming, and disciplining, the Militia, and for To provide for
original those in which a State shall be Party, the supreme Court shall have
originate in the House of Representatives; All bills for raising Revenue shall
originated, who shall enter the Objections to that House in which it shall have
other Persons. taxed, three fifths of all
other Officers; and The House of Representatives shall choose their Speaker and
other Officers, and also a President pro tempore, The Senate shall choose their
other Place than that the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to any
other any Speech or Debate in either House, they shall not be questioned in any
other Bills. but the Senate may propose or concur with Amendments as on
other House, by which it shall be sent, together with the Objections, to the
other needful Buildings; And Forts, Magazines, Arsenals, dock-Yards, and
other Powers vested by this Execution the foregoing Powers, and all
other direct, Tax shall be laid, unless in Proportion to the No capitation, or
other shall have been elected, and he shall not receive within that Period any
other public Ministers and Consuls, Judges of the supreme Court, Ambassadors,
other Officers of the United States, whose Appointments are not herein and all
other public Ministers; he shall think proper; he shall receive Ambassadors and
other high Crimes and Misdemeanors. Bribery, or
other shall be made, under their Authority; to all Cases affecting Ambassadors,
other public Ministers and Consuls, and In all Cases affecting Ambassadors,
other Cases before mentioned, the supreme Court shall Jurisdiction. In all the
other State. And the Congress may by general and judicial Proceedings of every
other Crime, who shall A Person charged in any State with Treason, Felony, or
other State; nor any shall be formed or erected within the Jurisdiction of any
other Property belonging to the United Regulations respecting the Territory or
other Mode of Ratification may be proposed by the thereof, as the one or the
other the Vice-President shall act as President, as in the case of the death or
other crime, the basis of representation therein shall be reduced in the or
other person was elected President more than two years of a term to which some
other 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote in any primary or
other tax. pay any poll tax or
other body as Congress may by law of the executive departments or of such
other body as Congress may by law provide, the executive department or of such
other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to any other Place than that the
others retained by the people. to deny or disparage
otherwise provided for, and which shall be established by Law: but the Congress
otherwise infamous crime, No person shall be held to answer for a capital, or
otherwise re-examined in any Court of the United States, than jury, shall be
otherwise, chosen every second Year; and if Vacancies happen by Resignation, or
otherwise, the President shall resume the powers the same as Acting President;
our Posterity, do ordain and establish this Constitution for the ourselves and
our Lord one thousand seven hundred Seventeenth Day of September in the Year of
our Names. Twelfth. In Witness whereof We have hereunto subscribed
ourselves and our Posterity, do ordain and establish this Constitution for the
out of the Treasury of the United Services, to be ascertained by Law, and paid
over such District To exercise exclusive Legislation in all Cases whatsoever,
over all Places purchased by the Consent States, and to exercise like Authority
over those of another: nor shall Vessels bound to, or from, Ports of one State
overt Act, or on Confession in open Court. same
own Members, and a Majority of each shall constitute a Quorum to do its
Owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by consent of the
paid out of the Treasury of the United Services, to be ascertained by Law, and
papers, and The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses,
Pardons for Offenses against the United States, except in Grant Reprieves and
Part of them as may be employed in the Service of the United governing such
part of this Constitution, when ratified by the Legislatures of Purposes, as
part of the Constitution. any Senator chosen before it becomes valid as
participation in rebellion, United States, or in any way abridged, except for
particular States, and (not exceeding ten Miles square) as may, by Cession of
particular State. any Claims of the United States, or of any
particularly describing the place to be searched, and the affirmation, and
Parts as may in their Judgment require publish the same, excepting such
parts of States, State be formed by the Junction of two or more States, or
Party convicted shall nevertheless be Profit under the United States: but the
Party to whom such Service or Labour may be due. of the
party shall have been duly convicted, shall exist within the United whereof the
Party, the supreme Court shall have original those in which a State shall be
Party; to Jurisdiction; to Controversies to which the United States shall be a
pass the Bill, it such Reconsideration two thirds of that House shall agree to
pass any Bill of Attainder, gold and silver Coin a Tender in Payment of Debts;
passed the House of Representatives and the Senate, Every Bill which shall have
passed. No Bill of Attainder or ex post facto Law shall be
Paterson, Jonathan New Jersey - William Livingston, David Brearley, William
pay the Debts and provide for the common Defence and general Excises, to
pay Duties in another. one State, be obliged to enter, clear, or
pay any debt or obligation incurred United States nor any State shall assume or
pay any poll tax or other tax.
Payment of Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder, gold and silver Coin a Tender in
payment of pensions and bounties for services in including debts incurred for
peace be quartered in any house, without the No Soldier shall, in time of
Peace, be privileged from Arrest during their Attendance at the Session of
Peace, enter into any Agreement or Compact Troops, or Ships of War in time of
peaceably to assemble, and to petition of the press; or the right of the people
Penalties as each House may provide. under such
Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one, Maryland five, New York six, New Jersey four,
Pennsylvania - Benjamin Franklin, Thomas Mifflin, Robert Morris, George Clymer,
pensions and bounties for services in including debts incurred for payment of
People of the United States, in Order to form a more perfect Union, We the
People of the several States, and the Electors in each State shall Year by the
people peaceably to assemble, and to petition of the press; or the right of the
people to keep and bear Arms, shall not be infringed. right of the
people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and The right of the
people thereof, for six years; and each Senator shall State, elected by the
people fill the executive thereof to make temporary appointments until the
people. to deny or disparage others retained by the
people. the
perfect Union, We the People of the United States, in Order to form a more
perform such appointed by a State; and they shall meet in the District and
Period for which he which shall neither be increased nor diminished during the
Period any other shall have been elected, and he shall not receive within that
Person shall be a Representative who shall not have attained to the Age of No
person shall be a Senator who shall not have attained to the Age of thirty No
Person shall be United States is tried, the Chief Justice shall preside: And no
Person holding any Office under the United States, during such time; and no
Person No Title of Nobility shall be granted by the United States: And no
Person holding an Office of Trust or Profit under the United Representative, or
Person having the greatest Number of Votes Votes shall then be counted. The
Person have a immediately choose by Ballot one of them for President; and if no
Person having the greatest every Case, after the Choice of the President, the
person except a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United States, at No
Person be eligible to that Office who shall not of President; neither shall any
Person them, or in adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort. No
Person attainted. during the Life of the
Person charged in any State with Treason, Felony, or other Crime, who shall A
Person held to Service or Labour in one State, under the Laws thereof, No
person shall be held to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, No
person be subject for the same offense of War or public danger; nor shall any
person of the same state with themselves; they shall name in their ballots the
person voted for as voted for as President, and in distinct ballots the
person having the greatest Number of votes for President, shall be the The
person have such majority, then from the persons having appointed; and if no
person having the greatest number of votes as Vice-President, shall be the The
person have a majority, then from the two highest numbers appointed, and if no
person majority of the whole number shall be necessary to a choice. But no
person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of State deprive any
person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the law; nor deny to any
person shall be a Senator or Representative in Congress, or elector of 3. No
person shall act accordingly until a President act shall be selected, and such
person shall be elected to the office of the President more than twice, 1. No
person who has held the office of President, or acted as President, for and no
person was elected President more than two years of a term to which some other
person holding the office of President, when this Article shall not apply to any
person who may Article was proposed by the Congress, and shall not prevent any
Person. on such Importation, not exceeding ten dollars for each
Persons voting for and determined by Yeas and Nays, and the Names of the
Persons as any of the States now existing The Migration or Importation of such
Persons voted for, and with themselves. And they shall make a List of all the
persons or things to be seized.
persons voted for as Vice-President, and they shall make distinct lists of all
persons voted for as Vice-President and of the number of President, and of all
persons having appointed; and if no person have such majority, then from the
persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to the 1. All
persons in each State, their respective numbers, counting the whole number of
persons from whom the House of Representatives may choose a President whenever
persons from whom the Senate may choose a Vice President death of any of the
Persons, which shall be determined by adding to the whole Number of free
persons, of whom one at least shall not lie an Inhabitant of the same State
persons, houses, papers, and The right of the people to be secure in their
Persons. taxed, three fifths of all other
petition of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to
Pierce Butler
Pinckney, Charles Pinckney, South Carolina - John Rutledge, Charles Cotesworth
Pinckney, South Carolina - John Rutledge, Charles Cotesworth Pinckney, Charles
Piracies and Felonies committed on the high Seas, and To define and punish
Place of Choosing Senators. as to the
Place than that the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to any other
Place or Places as the Congress may by Law have directed.
place to be searched, and the affirmation, and particularly describing the
place subject to their jurisdiction. States, or any
Place.
Places and Manner of holding Elections for Senators and The Times,
Places purchased by the Consent States, and to exercise like Authority over all
Places as the Congress may by Law have directed. Place or
Plantations one, Connecticut Massachusetts eight, Rhode Island and Providence
poll tax or other tax. pay any
populous State; they shall be in a State, but in no event more than the least
Ports of one State over those of another: nor shall Vessels bound to, or from,
possession 2. The transportation or importation into any State, Territory, or
Post Offices and Post Roads; To establish
Post Roads; To establish Post Offices and
post facto Law shall be passed. No Bill of Attainder or ex
post facto Law, or Law impairing the Obligation of Contracts, or grant any ex
Posterity, do ordain and establish this Constitution for the ourselves and our
Power of Impeachment. shall have the sole
Power to try all Impeachments. When sitting for The Senate shall have the sole
Power To lay and collect Taxes, Duties, Imposts and The Congress shall have
Power shall be vested in a President of the United States of The executive
Power to relating to the Duties of their respective Offices, and he shall have
Power to fill up all Vacancies that may happen during The President shall have
Power of the United States, shall be vested in one supreme Court, The judicial
Power shall extend to all Cases, in Law and Equity, arising under The judicial
power to declare the Punishment of Treason, but no The Congress shall have
Power to dispose of and make all needful Rules and The Congress shall have
power of the United States shall not be construed to extend to any The Judicial
power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. Congress shall have
power to enforce, by appropriate legislation, the 5. The Congress shall have
power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have
power to lay and collect taxes on incomes, from The Congress shall have
power to enforce 2. The Congress and the several States shall have concurrent
power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation. Congress shall have
power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have
power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have
power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have
Power, or engage in War, unless actually with another State, or with a foreign
Power, by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, to make He shall have
Powers herein granted shall be vested in a Congress of the All legislative
Powers vested by this Execution the foregoing Powers, and all other
Powers and Duties of the said Resignation, or Inability to discharge the
powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor The
powers and duties of his office, and until he is unable to discharge the
powers and duties transmits to them a written declaration to the contrary, such
powers and duties of his office, the Vice President unable to discharge the
powers and duties of the office as Acting shall immediately assume the
powers and duties of his office that no inability exists, he shall resume the
powers and duties of his office. Thereupon President is unable to discharge the
powers and duties of his office, the Vice President shall continue to discharge
powers the same as Acting President; otherwise, the President shall resume the
Powers, and all other Powers vested by this Execution the foregoing
Preference shall be given by any Regulation of Commerce or Revenue to the No
Prejudice States; and nothing in this Constitution shall be so construed as to
prescribe the Manner in which such Acts, Records and Proceedings shall be Laws
prescribed in each State by the Legislature thereof; Representatives, shall be
prescribed in the Case of a Bill. to the Rules and Limitations
prescribed by Congress;
prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to be
Presence the President of the Senate. The President of the Senate shall, in the
presence of the Senate and House of The President of the Senate shall, in the
present concur; and he shall Treaties, provided two thirds of the Senators
present the Done in Convention by the Unanimous Consent of the States
Present, be entered on the Journal. shall, at the Desire of one fifth of those
present, Emolument, Office, or Title, of any kind the Congress, accept of any
present. convicted without the Concurrence of two thirds of the Members
presented to the President of the United shall, before it become a Law, be
presented to him, the Same shall be a Law, excepted) after it shall have been
presented to the President of the United States; and before the Same shall be
presentment or indictment of a Grand Jury, except in cases arising unless on a
preserve, President of the United States, and will to the best of my Ability,
preserved, and no fact tried by a dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be
preside: And no Person shall be United States is tried, the Chief Justice shall
President of the United States shall be President of the Senate, but The Vice
President of the Senate, but The Vice President of the United States shall be
President pro tempore, The Senate shall choose their other Officers, and also a
President of the United States.
President of the that Purpose, they shall be on Oath or Affirmation. When the
President of the United shall, before it become a Law, be presented to the
President within ten Days (Sundays any Bill shall not be returned by the
President of the United States; and before the Same shall be presented to the
President of the United States of The executive Power shall be vested in a
President of the Senate. The President of the Senate shall, in the Presence the
President of the Senate shall, in the Presence the President of the Senate. The
President from Office, or of his Death, In Case of the Removal of the
President and Vice President, declaring what Officer shall then act as the
President shall be elected. removed, or a
President shall, at stated Times, receive for his Services, a Compensation, The
President of the United States, and will to the best of my Ability, preserve,
President shall be Commander in Chief of the Army and Navy of the United The
President alone, in the Courts of Law, or in the Heads of proper, in the
President shall have Power to fill up all Vacancies that may happen during The
President and all civil Officers of the United States, The President, Vice
President and deputy from Virginia George Washington -
President and Vice-President, one of whom, at least, shall not be an inhabitant
President of the seat of the government of the United States, directed to the
President of the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and House of The
President whenever the right of choice of Representatives shall not choose a
President shall be eligible to constitutionally ineligible to the office of
President and Vice-President of the United States, choice of electors for
President and Vice-President, or hold any office, civil or military, under the
President and Vice President shall end at noon on the 20th 1. The terms of the
President shall end at noon on the 20th 1. The terms of the President and Vice
President elect shall have died, the Vice President elect shall become
President elect shall become President elect shall have died, the Vice
President shall not have been chosen before the time fixed for President. If a
President elect shall have failed to the beginning of his term, or if the
President elect shall act as President until a President qualify, then the Vice
President until a President qualify, then the Vice President elect shall act as
President qualify, then the Vice President elect shall act as President until a
President elect nor a Vice President elect shall have qualified, neither a
President elect shall have qualified, neither a President elect nor a Vice
President act shall be selected, and such person shall act accordingly until a
President shall have qualified. or Vice
President whenever persons from whom the House of Representatives may choose a
President death of any of the persons from whom the Senate may choose a Vice
President more than twice, 1. No person shall be elected to the office of the
President more than two years of a term to which some other person was elected
President more than once. But this shall be elected to the office of the
President or acting as President during the remainder of such term.
President during the remainder of such term. President or acting as
President and Vice President equal to the whole number of Senators and
President equal to the whole number of Senators and President and Vice
President and Vice President, to be electors the purposes of the election of
President or Vice President, for electors for President or election for
President or election for President or Vice President, for electors for
President from office or of his death or 1. In case of the removal of the
President shall become President. resignation, the Vice
President shall nominate a Vice President who shall take office upon
President who shall take office upon President shall nominate a Vice
President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Senate 3. Whenever the
President pro tempore of the Senate 3. Whenever the President transmits to the
President as Acting President. shall be discharged by the Vice
President and a majority of either the principal officers 4. Whenever the Vice
President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of provide, transmit to the
President is the House of Representatives their written declaration that the
President unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Vice
President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Thereafter, when the
President pro tempore of the Thereafter, when the President transmits to the
President and a majority of either the principal officers of unless the Vice
President pro tempore of the Senate and the transmit within four days to the
President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office. Thereupon
President is unable to discharge the two thirds vote of both Houses that the
President shall continue to discharge powers and duties of his office, the Vice
President shall resume the powers the same as Acting President; otherwise, the
President, or when he shall exercise the Office of in the absence of the Vice
President, if such Number be a Majority of the whole Number of shall be the
President, the Votes shall be Manner choose the President. But in choosing the
President, the Person having the greatest every Case, after the Choice of the
President, and the Congress may by Office, the same shall devolve on the Vice
President, declaring what Officer shall then act as the President and Vice
President, and such Officer shall act accordingly, until the Disability be
President, Vice President and all civil Officers of the United States, The
President, and in distinct ballots the person voted for as voted for as
President, and of all persons voted for as Vice-President and of the number of
President, shall be the The person having the greatest Number of votes for
President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of Electors
President, the House of Representatives shall choose immediately, by ballot,
President, the votes shall be taken by the President. But in choosing the
President, as in the case of the death or other the Vice-President shall act as
President, the 3. If, at the time fixed for the beginning of the term of the
President, or the manner in which one who is to declaring who shall then act as
President, or acted as President, for and no person who has held the office of
President, for and no person who has held the office of President, or acted as
President, when this Article shall not apply to any person holding the office of
President, or acting as President, during the term be holding the office of
President, during the term be holding the office of President, or acting as
President, to be electors the purposes of the election of President and Vice
President, for electors for President or election for President or Vice
President, or for Senator or Representative in Congress, shall not be Vice
President, the 2. Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of the Vice
President. But in choosing the President, the Votes shall be Manner choose the
President. But if there Number of Votes of the Electors shall be the Vice
President. But in choosing the President, the votes shall be taken by the
President. constitutional disability of the
President. If a President shall not have been chosen before the time fixed for
President. resignation, the Vice President shall become
President. shall be discharged by the Vice President as Acting
President.
President; and if no Person have a immediately choose by Ballot one of them for
President; neither shall any Person be eligible to that Office who shall not of
President; otherwise, the President shall resume the powers the same as Acting
press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition of the
prevent its Return, in which Case it shall not be a Law.
prevent any person who may Article was proposed by the Congress, and shall not
previous condition of servitude.
previously shall have been committed, which district shall have been
previously taken an oath, as a United States, or under any State, who, having
primary or other 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote in any
Prince or foreign State. whatever, from any King,
principal Officer in each of the executive Departments, upon any subject
principal officers 4. Whenever the Vice President and a majority of either the
principal officers of unless the Vice President and a majority of either the
prior to shall think proper to admit, shall not be prohibited by the Congress
prior to the Year One Congress; Provided that no Amendment which may be made
private property be liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor shall
privilege of the Writ of Habeas Corpus shall not be suspended, unless when The
privileged from Arrest during their Attendance at the Session of Peace, be
Privileges and Immunities The Citizens of each State shall be entitled to all
privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any the
pro tempore, The Senate shall choose their other Officers, and also a President
pro tempore of the Senate 3. Whenever the President transmits to the President
pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of provide, transmit to the President
pro tempore of the Thereafter, when the President transmits to the President
pro tempore of the Senate and the transmit within four days to the President
probable cause, supported by Oath or no Warrants shall issue, but upon
proceed to reconsider it. If after Objections at large on their Journal, and
Proceedings of every other State. And the Congress may by general and judicial
Proceedings shall be Laws prescribe the Manner in which such Acts, Records and
Proceedings, punish its Members for Each House may determine the Rules of its
Proceedings, and from time to time Each House shall keep a Journal of its
process of law; nor shall private property be liberty, or property, without due
process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have the Assistance of
process of State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due
Produce of all Duties and Imposts, laid by its inspection Laws: and the net
Profit under the United States: but the Party convicted shall nevertheless be
Profit or Trust under them, shall, without the Consent of holding any Office of
Profit under the United Representative, or Person holding an Office of Trust or
Progress of Science and useful Arts, by securing for limited To promote the
prohibited by the Congress prior to shall think proper to admit, shall not be
prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to
prohibited. the jurisdiction thereof for beverage purposes is hereby
prohibited. violation of the laws thereof, is hereby
prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or
promote the general Welfare, and secure the Blessings of Liberty to defence,
promote the Progress of Science and useful Arts, by securing for limited To
proper for carrying into To make all Laws which shall be necessary and
proper to admit, shall not be prohibited by the Congress prior to shall think
proper, in the President alone, in the Courts of Law, or in the Heads of
proper; he shall receive Ambassadors and other public Ministers; he shall think
Property belonging to the United Regulations respecting the Territory or other
property be liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor shall private
property, without due process of law; nor shall private property be liberty, or
property, without due process of State deprive any person of life, liberty, or
Proportion to the No capitation, or other direct, Tax shall be laid, unless in
proportion which the number of such male citizens shall bear to the whole
propose or concur with Amendments as on other Bills. but the Senate may
propose Amendments to this Constitution, or, on the Application of the
proposed by the thereof, as the one or the other Mode of Ratification may be
proposed by the Congress, and shall not prevent any person who may Article was
proposing Amendments, which, in either Case, shall be valid to all Intents and
prosecuted against one of the United States suit in law or equity, commenced or
prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy and In all criminal
protect and defend the Constitution of the United States."
protect each of them against Invasion; and on Form of Government, and shall
protection of the law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal
proved, and the Effect thereof.
provide for the common establish Justice, insure domestic Tranquility,
provide for the common Defence and general Excises, to pay the Debts and
provide for the Punishment of counterfeiting the Securities and current Coin To
provide and maintain a Navy; To
provide for calling forth the Militia to execute the Laws of the Union, To
provide for organizing, arming, and disciplining, the Militia, and for To
provide for the Case of Removal, Death, Resignation or Inability, both of Law
provide for the case wherein shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law
provide for the case of the death of any of the 4. The Congress may by law
provide, transmit to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of
provide, the executive department or of such other body as Congress may by law
provide. under such Penalties as each House may
provided two thirds of the Senators present concur; and he shall Treaties,
provided for, and which shall be established by Law: but the Congress otherwise
Provided that no Amendment which may be made prior to the Year One Congress;
provided in the Constitution, within seven years from the date of the
provided amendment to the Constitution by conventions in the several States, as
provided by the twelfth article of amendment. duties as
Provided, That the legislature of any State may empower the vacancies:
Providence Plantations one, Connecticut Massachusetts eight, Rhode Island and
provisions of this article.
public Safety may require it. in Cases of Rebellion or Invasion the
public Money shall be published from time to time. Expenditures of all
public Ministers and Consuls, Judges of the supreme Court, Ambassadors, other
public Ministers; he shall think proper; he shall receive Ambassadors and other
public Ministers and Consuls; to all Cases of admiralty and maritime
public Ministers and Consuls, and In all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other
public Acts, Records, Full Faith and Credit shall be given in each State to the
public Trust under the United required as a Qualification to any Office or
public danger; nor shall any person be subject for the same offense of War or
public use, without just compensation. taken for
public trial, by an impartial jury of the State and district wherein the crime
public debt of the United States, authorized by law, 4. The validity of the
publish the same, excepting such Parts as may in their Judgment require
published from time to time. Expenditures of all public Money shall be
punish its Members for Each House may determine the Rules of its Proceedings,
punish Piracies and Felonies committed on the high Seas, and To define and
Punishment of counterfeiting the Securities and current Coin To provide for the
Punishment of Treason, but no The Congress shall have power to declare the
punishment for crime 1. Neither slavery nor involuntary servitude, except as a
Punishment, according to liable and subject to Indictment, Trial, Judgment and
punishments inflicted. and unusual
purchased by the Consent States, and to exercise like Authority over all Places
Purpose shall consist of a Member or Members from two-thirds of the for this
purpose shall consist of a member or members from two-thirds of the states, and
purpose shall consist of two-thirds of the whole number of Senators, and a
purpose if not in session. If the Congress, within twenty one days after
Purpose, they shall be on Oath or Affirmation. When the President of the that
purposes is hereby prohibited. the jurisdiction thereof for beverage
purposes of the election of President and Vice President, to be electors the
Purposes, as part of this Constitution, when ratified by the Legislatures of
Pursuance thereof; and all Treaties made, or which shall be made, under the
put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any to be twice
Qualification to any Office or public Trust under the United required as a
Qualifications requisite for Electors of the most numerous Branch of have the
Qualifications of Each House shall be the Judge of the Elections, Returns and
qualifications have one vote. The electors in each State shall have the
qualified, neither a President elect nor a Vice President elect shall have
qualified. or Vice President shall have
qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for the case wherein shall have
qualify, then the Vice President elect shall act as President until a President
quartered in any house, without the No Soldier shall, in time of peace be
question Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays of the Members of either House on any
question of Adjournment) House of Representatives may be necessary (except on a
questioned in any other any Speech or Debate in either House, they shall not be
questioned. But neither the suppressing insurrection or rebellion, shall not be
Quorum to do its own Members, and a Majority of each shall constitute a
quorum taken by States, the Representation from each State having one Vote; a
quorum for this states, the representation from each state having one vote; a
quorum for the on the list, the Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a
race, color, or abridged by the United States or by any State on account of
raise and support Armies, but no Appropriation of Money to that Use shall be To
raising Revenue shall originate in the House of Representatives; All bills for
Ratification may be proposed by the thereof, as the one or the other Mode of
Ratification of the Conventions of nine States, shall be sufficient for the The
ratification of this article the manufacture, sale, 1. After one year from the
ratification of this article.
ratified by the Legislatures of Purposes, as part of this Constitution, when
ratified as an 3. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been
ratified as an 6. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been
ratified as an 3. The article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been
ratified as an 2. This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been
ratified; and the terms of their successors shall then article had not been
ratifying the Same. Establishment of this Constitution between the States so
re-examined in any Court of the United States, than jury, shall be otherwise
Read, Gunning Bedford Jr., John Dickinson, Richard Bassett, Delaware - George
reason of failure to denied or abridged by the United States or any State by
Rebellion or Invasion the public Safety may require it. in Cases of
rebellion against the same, or given aid or comfort to the insurrection or
rebellion against the United States, or any claim for in aid of insurrection or
rebellion, United States, or in any way abridged, except for participation in
rebellion, shall not be questioned. But neither the suppressing insurrection or
receipt of the latter written declaration, or, if Congress is not in session,
Receipts and made by Law; and a regular Statement and Account of the
receive a Compensation for their The Senators and Representatives shall
receive for his Services, a Compensation, The President shall, at stated Times,
receive within that Period any other shall have been elected, and he shall not
receive Ambassadors and other public Ministers; he shall think proper; he shall
receive for their Offices during good Behavior, and shall, at stated Times,
Recess of the Legislature of any State, the Executive thereof may during the
Recess of the Senate, by granting Commissions which shall expire at the End the
recommend to their Consideration such Measures as he shall judge Union, and
reconsider it. If after Objections at large on their Journal, and proceed to
Reconsideration two thirds of that House shall agree to pass the Bill, it such
reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds of that House, it shall likewise be
Records and Proceedings shall be Laws prescribe the Manner in which such Acts,
Records, Full Faith and Credit shall be given in each State to the public Acts,
redress of grievances. the Government for a
reduced in the or other crime, the basis of representation therein shall be
regard to any census or enumeration. without
regular Statement and Account of the Receipts and made by Law; and a
regulate Commerce with foreign Nations, and among the several States, and To
regulate the Value thereof, and of foreign Coin, and fix the To coin Money,
regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a free State, the A well
Regulation of the land and naval Forces; To make Rules for the Government and
Regulation of Commerce or Revenue to the No Preference shall be given by any
Regulation therein, escaping into another, shall, in Consequence of any Law or
Regulations as the Congress shall make. under such
Regulations respecting the Territory or other Property belonging to the United
Regulations, except but the Congress may at any time by Law make or alter such
relating to the Duties of their respective Offices, and he shall have Power to
religion, or Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of
religious Test shall ever be Affirmation, to support this Constitution; but no
remain two or more who have equal Votes, the Senate shall choose from should
remainder of such term. President or acting as President during the
removal from Judgment in Cases of Impeachment shall not extend further than to
Removal of the President from Office, or of his Death, In Case of the
removal of the President from office or of his death or 1. In case of the
Removal, Death, Resignation or Inability, both of Law provide for the Case of
remove enemies thereof. But Congress may by a vote of two-thirds of each House,
removed from Office on Impeachment for, and Conviction of, Treason, shall be
removed to the State having Jurisdiction of the Crime.
removed, or a President shall be elected.
repassed by two thirds of the Senate and House of Representatives, according be
repealed. is hereby
repel Invasions; suppress Insurrections and
Representation from any State, the Executive When vacancies happen in the
Representation from each State having one Vote; a quorum taken by States, the
representation from each state having one vote; a quorum for this states, the
representation therein shall be reduced in the or other crime, the basis of
representation of any State in the Senate, the When vacancies happen in the
Representative who shall not have attained to the Age of No Person shall be a
Representative shall, during the Time for which he was elected, No Senator or
Representative in Congress, or elector of 3. No person shall be a Senator or
Representative in Congress, shall not be Vice President, or for Senator or
Representative, or Person holding an Office of Trust or Profit under the United
Representative; and until such enumeration shall be shall have at Least one
Representatives shall be composed of Members chosen every second The House of
Representatives and direct Taxes shall be apportioned among the several States
Representatives shall not exceed one for every thirty Thousand, but each State
Representatives shall choose their Speaker and other Officers; and The House of
Representatives shall receive a Compensation for their The Senators and
Representatives and the Senate, Every Bill which shall have passed the House of
Representatives may be necessary (except on a question of Adjournment) House of
Representatives a Number of Electors, equal to the whole Number of Senators and
Representatives shall have an equal Number of Votes, then the House of
Representatives before mentioned, and the Members of the The Senators and
Representatives shall choose immediately, by ballot, President, the House of
Representatives shall not choose a President whenever the right of choice of
Representatives shall be apportioned among the several States according to 2.
Representatives in Congress, the Executive and Judicial officers of a State, or
Representatives at noon on the 3d day of January, and the terms of Senators and
Representatives may choose a President whenever persons from whom the House of
Representatives in Congress to which the District would be entitled if it were
Representatives his written declaration that he and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives their written declaration that the President is the House of
Representatives his written declaration Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives their written declaration that the Speaker of the House of
Representatives shall Representatives, shall take effect, until an election of
Representatives, shall be prescribed in each State by the Legislature thereof;
Representatives, according be repassed by two thirds of the Senate and House of
Representatives, open all the Certificates, and the of the Senate and House of
Representatives, open all the certificates and the votes shall then be counted;
Representatives, shall take effect, until an election of Representatives shall
Representatives. United States, which shall consist of a Senate and House of
Representatives; All bills for raising Revenue shall originate in the House of
Reprieves and Pardons for Offenses against the United States, except in Grant
Reprisal, and make Rules concerning To declare War, grant Letters of Marque and
Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills of Credit; make any Thing but of Marque and
Republican The United States shall guarantee to every State in this Union a
require publish the same, excepting such Parts as may in their Judgment
require it. in Cases of Rebellion or Invasion the public Safety may
require the Opinion, in writing, of the Service of the United States; he may
required as a Qualification to any Office or public Trust under the United
required to assemble, determines by within twenty one days after Congress is
required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel Excessive bail shall not be
requisite for Electors of the most numerous Branch of have the Qualifications
requisite for electors of the most numerous branch of the State legislatures.
reserved to the States respectively, or to prohibited by it to the States, are
reserving to the States respectively, the Appointment of the Officers, States,
reside. No State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge wherein they
Resident within the United States.
Resignation or Inability, both of Law provide for the Case of Removal, Death,
Resignation, or otherwise, chosen every second Year; and if Vacancies happen by
Resignation, or Inability to discharge the Powers and Duties of the said
resignation, the Vice President shall become President.
Resolution, or Vote to which the Concurrence of the Senate and Every Order,
Respect to the Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn them to such Time as he
respecting the Territory or other Property belonging to the United Regulations
respecting an establishment of religion, or Congress shall make no law
respective Numbers, which may be included within this Union, according to their
respective Houses, and in going to and returning from the same; and for their
respective Writings Times to Authors and Inventors the exclusive Right to their
respective States, and vote by Ballot for two The Electors shall meet in their
respective Offices, and he shall have Power to relating to the Duties of their
respective states, and vote by ballot for The Electors shall meet in their
respective numbers, counting the whole number of persons in each State, their
respectively, the Appointment of the Officers, States, reserving to the States
respectively, or to prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the States
respectively. If against the Bill shall be entered on the Journal of each House
resume the powers and duties of his office that no inability exists, he shall
resume the powers the same as Acting President; otherwise, the President shall
retained by the people. to deny or disparage others
return it, with his States; If he approve he shall sign it, but if not he shall
Return, in which Case it shall not be a Law. prevent its
returned by the President within ten Days (Sundays any Bill shall not be
returning from the same; and for their respective Houses, and in going to and
Returns and Qualifications of Each House shall be the Judge of the Elections,
Revenue shall originate in the House of Representatives; All bills for raising
Revenue to the No Preference shall be given by any Regulation of Commerce or
Revision and Control United States; and all such Laws shall be subject to the
Rhode Island and Providence Plantations one, Connecticut Massachusetts eight,
Richard Bassett, Delaware - George Read, Gunning Bedford Jr., John Dickinson,
Richard Dobbs Spaight, Hugh Williamson North Carolina - William Blount,
Right to their respective Writings Times to Authors and Inventors the exclusive
right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition of the press; or the
right of the people to keep and bear Arms, shall not be infringed.
right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and The
right to a speedy and In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the
right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a dollars, the
right of choice of Representatives shall not choose a President whenever the
right to vote at any election for the excluding Indians not taxed. But when the
right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or 1. The
right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or The
right of choice shall have devolved upon them, and for the case of the the
right of choice shall have devolved upon them. whenever the
right of citizens of the United States to vote in any primary or other 1. The
right of citizens of the United States, who are eighteen years of age or 1. The
rights, shall not be construed The enumeration in the Constitution, of certain
Roads; To establish Post Offices and Post
Robert Morris, George Clymer, Pennsylvania - Benjamin Franklin, Thomas Mifflin,
Roger Sherman Connecticut - William Samuel Johnson,
Rufus King Massachusetts - Nathaniel Gorham,
Rule of Naturalization, and uniform Laws on the subject To establish an uniform
Rules of its Proceedings, punish its Members for Each House may determine the
Rules and Limitations prescribed in the Case of a Bill. to the
Rules concerning To declare War, grant Letters of Marque and Reprisal, and make
Rules for the Government and Regulation of the land and naval Forces; To make
Rules and The Congress shall have Power to dispose of and make all needful
rules of the common law. according to the
Rutledge, Charles Cotesworth Pinckney, Charles Pinckney, South Carolina - John
Safety may require it. in Cases of Rebellion or Invasion the public
said House shall in like Majority, then from the five highest on the List the
said Resignation, or Inability to discharge the Powers and Duties of the
said Crimes shall have been such Trial shall be held in the State where the
sale, 1. After one year from the ratification of this article the manufacture,
Same shall be a Law, excepted) after it shall have been presented to him, the
Same shall be presented to the President of the United States; and before the
Same shall be, for the Erection of of the Legislature of the State in which the
same Term, be elected, as follows: with the Vice-President chosen for the
same State persons, of whom one at least shall not lie an Inhabitant of the
same throughout the which they shall give their Votes; which Day shall be the
same shall devolve on the Vice President, and the Congress may by Office, the
same State claiming Lands under Grants of different States, and between a
same overt Act, or on Confession in open Court.
same offense of War or public danger; nor shall any person be subject for the
same state with themselves; they shall name in their ballots the person of the
same as Acting President; otherwise, the President shall resume the powers the
same, excepting such Parts as may in their Judgment require publish the
same, or given aid or comfort to the insurrection or rebellion against the
Same. Establishment of this Constitution between the States so ratifying the
same; and for their respective Houses, and in going to and returning from the
Samuel Johnson, Roger Sherman Connecticut - William
Science and useful Arts, by securing for limited To promote the Progress of
sealed to the Seat of the Government of the United States, directed to transmit
sealed to votes for each, which lists they shall sign and certify, and transmit
searched, and the affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be
searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and effects, against unreasonable
Seas, and To define and punish Piracies and Felonies committed on the high
Seat of the Government of the United the acceptance of Congress, become the
Seat of the Government of the United States, directed to transmit sealed to the
seat of the government of the United States, directed to the President of the
seat of Government of the United States shall 1. The District constituting the
Seats of the they shall be divided as equally as may be into three Classes. The
second The House of Representatives shall be composed of Members chosen every
second Senators of the first Class shall be vacated at the Expiration of the
second Class at the Expiration of the fourth Year, and of the Year, of the
second Year; and if Vacancies happen by Resignation, or otherwise, chosen every
Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays of the Members of either House on any question
Secretary Attest: William Jackson,
Section 1
Section 2
Section 3
Section 4
Section 5
Section 6
Section 7
Section 8
Section 9
Section 10
Section 1
Section 2
Section 3
Section 4
Section 1
Section 2
Section 3
Section 1
Section 2
Section 3
Section 4
Section of the first Article; and that no State, fourth Clauses in the Ninth
Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on the 15th day of October following the 5.
secure the Blessings of Liberty to defence, promote the general Welfare, and
secure in their persons, houses, papers, and The right of the people to be
securing for limited To promote the Progress of Science and useful Arts, by
Securities and current Coin To provide for the Punishment of counterfeiting the
security of a free State, the A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the
seized. persons or things to be
seizures, shall not be violated, and effects, against unreasonable searches and
selected, and such person shall act accordingly until a President act shall be
Senate and House of Representatives. United States, which shall consist of a
Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each The
Senate shall choose their other Officers, and also a President pro tempore, The
Senate shall have the sole Power to try all Impeachments. When sitting for The
Senate may propose or concur with Amendments as on other Bills. but the
Senate and Every Order, Resolution, or Vote to which the Concurrence of the
Senate and House of Representatives, according be repassed by two thirds of the
Senate shall, in the Presence the President of the Senate. The President of the
Senate and House of Representatives, open all the Certificates, and the of the
Senate shall choose from should remain two or more who have equal Votes, the
Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and House of The President of the
Senate and House of The President of the Senate shall, in the presence of the
Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the on the list, the
Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each The
Senate may choose a Vice President death of any of the persons from whom the
Senate 3. Whenever the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the
Senate and the Speaker of provide, transmit to the President pro tempore of the
Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration
Senate and the transmit within four days to the President pro tempore of the
Senate, but The Vice President of the United States shall be President of the
Senate, Every Bill which shall have passed the House of Representatives and the
Senate, to make He shall have Power, by and with the Advice and Consent of the
Senate, shall appoint nominate, and by and with the Advice and Consent of the
Senate, by granting Commissions which shall expire at the End the Recess of the
Senate, the When vacancies happen in the representation of any State in the
Senate. The President of the Senate shall, in the Presence the President of the
Senate. without its Consent, shall be deprived of its equal Suffrage in the
Senate; the
Senator shall State, chosen by the Legislature thereof, for six Years; and each
Senator who shall not have attained to the Age of thirty No person shall be a
Senator or Representative shall, during the Time for which he was elected, No
Senator or to which the State may be entitled in the Congress: but no
Senator or Representative in Congress, or elector of 3. No person shall be a
Senator shall State, elected by the people thereof, for six years; and each
Senator chosen before it becomes valid as part of the Constitution. any
Senator or Representative in Congress, shall not be Vice President, or for
Senators from each The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two
Senators of the first Class shall be vacated at the Expiration of the second
Senators and The Times, Places and Manner of holding Elections for
Senators and Representatives shall receive a Compensation for their The
Senators and Representatives a Number of Electors, equal to the whole Number of
Senators present concur; and he shall Treaties, provided two thirds of the
Senators and Representatives before mentioned, and the Members of the The
Senators from each The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two
Senators and Representatives at noon on the 3d day of January, and the terms of
Senators and President and Vice President equal to the whole number of
Senators and No law, varying the compensation for the services of the
Senators, and a purpose shall consist of two-thirds of the whole number of
Senators. as to the Place of Choosing
sent, together with the Objections, to the other House, by which it shall be
September in the Year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred Seventeenth Day of
Service for a Term of Years, and excluding Indians not including those bound to
Service of the United governing such Part of them as may be employed in the
Service of the United States; he may require the Opinion, in writing, of the
Service or Labour in one State, under the Laws thereof, No Person held to
Service or Labour, But shall be delivered up on Claim be discharged from such
Service or Labour may be due. of the Party to whom such
service in time in the land or naval forces, or in the Militia, when in actual
Services a Compensation which shall not be diminished during their their
services in including debts incurred for payment of pensions and bounties for
services of the Senators and No law, varying the compensation for the
Services, to be ascertained by Law, and paid out of the Treasury of the United
Services, a Compensation, The President shall, at stated Times, receive for his
servitude, except as a punishment for crime 1. Neither slavery nor involuntary
servitude. previous condition of
Session of Congress, shall, without the Consent of Neither House, during the
Session of Peace, be privileged from Arrest during their Attendance at the
session, receipt of the latter written declaration, or, if Congress is not in
Session. of their next
session. If the Congress, within twenty one days after purpose if not in
seven Years a Citizen of the United States, and who twenty five Years, and been
seven hundred Seventeenth Day of September in the Year of our Lord one thousand
seven and of the Independence of the United States of America the and Eighty
seven years from the date of the provided in the Constitution, within
seven years from the date of its submission. several States within
seven years from the date of the submission hereof in the Constitution, within
seven years from the date of its submission to the States several States within
Seventeenth Day of September in the Year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred
several States, and the Electors in each State shall Year by the People of the
several States Representatives and direct Taxes shall be apportioned among the
several States, and To regulate Commerce with foreign Nations, and among the
several States, when called into the actual States, and of the Militia of the
several States. of Citizens in the
several States, shall call a Convention for Legislatures of two thirds of the
several States, or by Conventions in three fourths three fourths of the
several State Legislatures, and all executive and judicial Officers, both of
several States, shall be bound by Oath or the United States and of the
several States according to 2. Representatives shall be apportioned among the
several States, and whatever source derived, without apportionment among the
several States shall have concurrent power to enforce 2. The Congress and the
several States, as amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of the
several States within seven years from the date of its submission.
several States, as provided amendment to the Constitution by conventions in the
several States within seven years from the date of its submission to the States
sex. abridged by the United States or by any State on account of
shall be vested in a Congress of the All legislative Powers herein granted
shall consist of a Senate and House of Representatives. United States, which
shall be composed of Members chosen every second The House of Representatives
shall Year by the People of the several States, and the Electors in each State
shall be a Representative who shall not have attained to the Age of No Person
shall not have attained to the Age of No Person shall be a Representative who
shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State in which he shall be
shall be shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State in which he
shall be apportioned among the several States Representatives and direct Taxes
shall be determined by adding to the whole Number of free Persons, which
shall be made within three Years after the first Meeting The actual Enumeration
shall by Law direct. The Number of Years, in such Manner as they
shall not exceed one for every thirty Thousand, but each State Representatives
shall have at Least one Representative; and until such enumeration shall be
shall be shall have at Least one Representative; and until such enumeration
shall be entitled to choose three, made, the State of New Hampshire
shall issue Writs of Election to fill such Vacancies. Authority thereof
shall choose their Speaker and other Officers; and The House of Representatives
shall have the sole Power of Impeachment.
shall be composed of two Senators from each The Senate of the United States
shall State, chosen by the Legislature thereof, for six Years; and each Senator
shall be assembled in Consequence of the first Election, Immediately after they
shall be divided as equally as may be into three Classes. The Seats of the they
shall be vacated at the Expiration of the second Senators of the first Class
shall then fill such Vacancies.
shall be a Senator who shall not have attained to the Age of thirty No person
shall not have attained to the Age of thirty No person shall be a Senator who
shall not, Years, and been nine Years a Citizen of the United States, and who
shall be chosen. when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State for which he
shall be President of the Senate, but The Vice President of the United States
shall have no Vote, unless they be equally divided.
shall choose their other Officers, and also a President pro tempore, The Senate
shall exercise the Office of in the absence of the Vice President, or when he
shall have the sole Power to try all Impeachments. When sitting for The Senate
shall be on Oath or Affirmation. When the President of the that Purpose, they
shall preside: And no Person shall be United States is tried, the Chief Justice
shall be United States is tried, the Chief Justice shall preside: And no Person
shall not extend further than to removal from Judgment in Cases of Impeachment
shall nevertheless be Profit under the United States: but the Party convicted
shall be prescribed in each State by the Legislature thereof; Representatives,
shall assemble at least once in every Year, and such Meeting shall The Congress
shall The Congress shall assemble at least once in every Year, and such Meeting
shall by Law appoint a be on the first Monday in December, unless they
shall be the Judge of the Elections, Returns and Qualifications of Each House
shall constitute a Quorum to do its own Members, and a Majority of each
shall keep a Journal of its Proceedings, and from time to time Each House
shall be sitting. in which the two Houses
shall receive a Compensation for their The Senators and Representatives
shall in all Cases, except Treason, Felony and Breach of the States. They
shall not be questioned in any other any Speech or Debate in either House, they
shall have been created, or the Emoluments whereof shall have been increased
shall have been increased shall have been created, or the Emoluments whereof
shall be a Member of either House during his Continuance in Office.
shall originate in the House of Representatives; All bills for raising Revenue
shall have passed the House of Representatives and the Senate, Every Bill which
shall sign it, but if not he shall return it, with his States; If he approve he
shall return it, with his States; If he approve he shall sign it, but if not he
shall have originated, who shall enter the Objections to that House in which it
shall enter the Objections to that House in which it shall have originated, who
shall agree to pass the Bill, it such Reconsideration two thirds of that House
shall be sent, together with the Objections, to the other House, by which it
shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds of that House, it
shall become a Law. But in all such Cases the Votes of both Houses shall be
shall be shall become a Law. But in all such Cases the Votes of both Houses
shall be entered on the Journal of each House respectively. If against the Bill
shall not be returned by the President within ten Days (Sundays any Bill
shall have been presented to him, the Same shall be a Law, excepted) after it
shall be a Law, excepted) after it shall have been presented to him, the Same
shall not be a Law. prevent its Return, in which Case it
shall be presented to the President of the United States; and before the Same
shall take Effect, shall be approved by him, or being disapproved by him, shall
shall be approved by him, or being disapproved by him, shall shall take Effect,
shall shall take Effect, shall be approved by him, or being disapproved by him,
shall have Power To lay and collect Taxes, Duties, Imposts and The Congress
shall be Welfare of the United States; but all Duties, Imposts and Excises
shall be To raise and support Armies, but no Appropriation of Money to that Use
shall be, for the Erection of of the Legislature of the State in which the Same
shall be necessary and proper for carrying into To make all Laws which
shall think proper to admit, shall not be prohibited by the Congress prior to
shall not be prohibited by the Congress prior to shall think proper to admit,
shall not be suspended, unless when The privilege of the Writ of Habeas Corpus
shall be passed. No Bill of Attainder or ex post facto Law
shall be laid, unless in Proportion to the No capitation, or other direct, Tax
shall be laid on Articles exported from any State. No Tax or Duty
shall be given by any Regulation of Commerce or Revenue to the No Preference
shall Vessels bound to, or from, Ports of one State over those of another: nor
shall be drawn from the Treasury, but in Consequence of Appropriations No Money
shall be published from time to time. Expenditures of all public Money
shall be granted by the United States: And no Person No Title of Nobility
shall enter into any Treaty, Alliance, or Confederation; grant Letters No State
shall be for the Use of the Treasury of the any State on Imports or Exports,
shall be subject to the Revision and Control United States; and all such Laws
shall be vested in a President of the United States of The executive Power
shall hold his Office during the Term of four Years, and, together America. He
shall appoint, in such Manner as the Legislature thereof may direct, Each State
shall be appointed an Elector. States,
shall meet in their respective States, and vote by Ballot for two The Electors
shall not lie an Inhabitant of the same State persons, of whom one at least
shall make a List of all the Persons voted for, and with themselves. And they
shall sign and certify, and of the Number of Votes for each; which List they
shall then be counted. The Person having the greatest Number of Votes Votes
shall be the President, if such Number be a Majority of the whole Number of
shall have an equal Number of Votes, then the House of Representatives
shall in like Majority, then from the five highest on the List the said House
shall be Manner choose the President. But in choosing the President, the Votes
shall consist of a Member or Members from two-thirds of the for this Purpose
shall be necessary to a Choice. In States, and a Majority of all the States
shall be the Vice President. But if there Number of Votes of the Electors
shall choose from should remain two or more who have equal Votes, the Senate
shall give their Votes; which Day shall be the same throughout the which they
shall be the same throughout the which they shall give their Votes; which Day
shall be eligible to the Office the time of the Adoption of this Constitution,
shall any Person be eligible to that Office who shall not of President; neither
shall not of President; neither shall any Person be eligible to that Office who
shall devolve on the Vice President, and the Congress may by Office, the same
shall then act as the President and Vice President, declaring what Officer
shall act accordingly, until the Disability be President, and such Officer
shall be elected. removed, or a President
shall neither be increased nor diminished during the Period for which he which
shall have been elected, and he shall not receive within that Period any other
shall not receive within that Period any other shall have been elected, and he
shall take the following Before he enter on the Execution of his Office, he
shall be Commander in Chief of the Army and Navy of the United The President
shall have Power to relating to the Duties of their respective Offices, and he
shall have Power, by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, to make He
shall Treaties, provided two thirds of the Senators present concur; and he
shall appoint nominate, and by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate,
shall be established by Law: but the Congress otherwise provided for, and which
shall have Power to fill up all Vacancies that may happen during The President
shall expire at the End the Recess of the Senate, by granting Commissions which
shall from time to time give to the Congress Information of the State of the He
shall judge Union, and recommend to their Consideration such Measures as he
shall think proper; he shall receive Ambassadors and other public Ministers; he
shall receive Ambassadors and other public Ministers; he shall think proper; he
shall take Care that the Laws be faithfully executed, and shall Commission all
shall Commission all shall take Care that the Laws be faithfully executed, and
shall be removed from Office on Impeachment for, and Conviction of, Treason,
shall be vested in one supreme Court, The judicial Power of the United States,
shall hold establish. The Judges, both of the supreme and inferior Courts,
shall not be diminished during their their Services a Compensation which
shall extend to all Cases, in Law and Equity, arising under The judicial Power
shall be made, under their Authority; to all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other
shall be a Party; to Jurisdiction; to Controversies to which the United States
shall be Party, the supreme Court shall have original those in which a State
shall have original those in which a State shall be Party, the supreme Court
shall Jurisdiction. In all the other Cases before mentioned, the supreme Court
shall make. under such Regulations as the Congress
shall be by Jury; and The Trial of all Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment,
shall be held in the State where the said Crimes shall have been such Trial
shall have been such Trial shall be held in the State where the said Crimes
shall be at such committed; but when not committed within any State, the Trial
shall consist only in levying War against Treason against the United States,
shall be convicted of Treason unless on the Testimony of two Witnesses to the
shall have power to declare the Punishment of Treason, but no The Congress
shall work Corruption of Blood, or Forfeiture except Attainder of Treason
shall be given in each State to the public Acts, Records, Full Faith and Credit
shall be Laws prescribe the Manner in which such Acts, Records and Proceedings
shall be entitled to all Privileges and Immunities The Citizens of each State
shall A Person charged in any State with Treason, Felony, or other Crime, who
shall on demand of the flee from Justice, and be found in another State,
shall be delivered up on Claim be discharged from such Service or Labour, But
shall be formed or erected within the Jurisdiction of any other State; nor any
shall have Power to dispose of and make all needful Rules and The Congress
shall be so construed as to Prejudice States; and nothing in this Constitution
shall guarantee to every State in this Union a Republican The United States
shall protect each of them against Invasion; and on Form of Government, and
shall deem it necessary, shall The Congress, whenever two thirds of both Houses
shall The Congress, whenever two thirds of both Houses shall deem it necessary,
shall call a Convention for Legislatures of two thirds of the several States,
shall be valid to all Intents and proposing Amendments, which, in either Case,
shall in any Manner affect the first and thousand eight hundred and eight
shall be deprived of its equal Suffrage in the Senate. without its Consent,
shall be as valid against the United States under this Constitution,
shall be made in This Constitution, and the Laws of the United States which
shall be made, under the Pursuance thereof; and all Treaties made, or which
shall be the supreme Law of the Land; and the Authority of the United States,
shall be bound thereby, any Thing in the Constitution or Judges in every State
shall be bound by Oath or the United States and of the several States,
shall ever be Affirmation, to support this Constitution; but no religious Test
shall be sufficient for the The Ratification of the Conventions of nine States,
shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or Congress
shall not be infringed. right of the people to keep and bear Arms,
shall not be violated, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures,
shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or no Warrants
shall be held to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, No person
shall any person be subject for the same offense of War or public danger; nor
shall be compelled in any to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor
shall private property be liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor
shall enjoy the right to a speedy and In all criminal prosecutions, the accused
shall have been committed, which district shall have been previously
shall have been previously shall have been committed, which district
shall exceed twenty In Suits at common law, where the value in controversy
shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a dollars, the right of trial by jury
shall be otherwise re-examined in any Court of the United States, than jury,
shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel Excessive bail
shall not be construed The enumeration in the Constitution, of certain rights,
shall not be construed to extend to any The Judicial power of the United States
shall meet in their respective states, and vote by ballot for The Electors
shall not be an inhabitant President and Vice-President, one of whom, at least,
shall name in their ballots the person of the same state with themselves; they
shall make distinct lists of all persons voted for as Vice-President, and they
shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to votes for each, which lists they
shall then be counted; Representatives, open all the certificates and the votes
shall be the The person having the greatest Number of votes for President,
shall choose immediately, by ballot, President, the House of Representatives
shall be taken by the President. But in choosing the President, the votes
shall consist of a member or members from two-thirds of the states, and purpose
shall be necessary to a choice. And if the House a majority of all the states
shall not choose a President whenever the right of choice of Representatives
shall devolve upon them, before the fourth day of March next following, then
shall act as President, as in the case of the death or other the Vice-President
shall be the The person having the greatest number of votes as Vice-President,
shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the on the list, the Senate
shall consist of two-thirds of the whole number of Senators, and a purpose
shall be necessary to a choice. But no person majority of the whole number
shall be eligible to constitutionally ineligible to the office of President
shall have been duly convicted, shall exist within the United whereof the party
shall exist within the United whereof the party shall have been duly convicted,
shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. Congress
shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge wherein they reside. No State
shall abridge wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any law which
shall any the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor
shall be apportioned among the several States according to 2. Representatives
shall be reduced in the or other crime, the basis of representation therein
shall bear to the whole proportion which the number of such male citizens
shall be a Senator or Representative in Congress, or elector of 3. No person
shall have engaged in support the Constitution of the United States,
shall not be questioned. But neither the suppressing insurrection or rebellion,
shall assume or pay any debt or obligation incurred United States nor any State
shall be held illegal and void. claims
shall have power to enforce, by appropriate legislation, the 5. The Congress
shall not be denied or 1. The right of citizens of the United States to vote
shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress
shall have power to lay and collect taxes on incomes, from The Congress
shall be composed of two Senators from each The Senate of the United States
shall State, elected by the people thereof, for six years; and each Senator
shall have the qualifications have one vote. The electors in each State
shall issue writs of election to fill such executive authority of such State
shall not be so construed as to affect the election or term of This amendment
shall have concurrent power to enforce 2. The Congress and the several States
shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 3. This article
shall have been ratified as an 3. This article shall be inoperative unless it
shall not be denied or The right of citizens of the United States to vote
shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation. Congress
shall end at noon on the 20th 1. The terms of the President and Vice President
shall then article had not been ratified; and the terms of their successors
shall assemble at least once in every year, and such meeting 2. The Congress
shall begin at noon on the 3d day of January, unless they shall by law appoint
shall by law appoint shall begin at noon on the 3d day of January, unless they
shall have died, the Vice President elect shall become President elect
shall become President elect shall have died, the Vice President elect
shall not have been chosen before the time fixed for President. If a President
shall have failed to the beginning of his term, or if the President elect
shall act as President until a President qualify, then the Vice President elect
shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for the case wherein
shall have qualified, neither a President elect nor a Vice President elect
shall then act as President, or the manner in which one who is to declaring who
shall be selected, and such person shall act accordingly until a President act
shall act accordingly until a President act shall be selected, and such person
shall have qualified. or Vice President
shall have devolved upon them, and for the case of the the right of choice
shall have devolved upon them. whenever the right of choice
shall take effect on the 15th day of October following the 5. Sections 1 and 2
shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 6. This article
shall have been ratified as an 6. This article shall be inoperative unless it
shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 3. The article
shall have been ratified as an 3. The article shall be inoperative unless it
shall be elected to the office of the President more than twice, 1. No person
shall be elected to the office of the President more than once. But this
shall not apply to any person holding the office of President, when this Article
shall not prevent any person who may Article was proposed by the Congress, and
shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 2. This article
shall have been ratified as an 2. This article shall be inoperative unless it
shall 1. The District constituting the seat of Government of the United States
shall be in a State, but in no event more than the least populous State; they
shall be considered, for addition to those appointed by the States, but they
shall meet in the District and perform such appointed by a State; and they
shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress
shall not be Vice President, or for Senator or Representative in Congress,
shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress
shall become President. resignation, the Vice President
shall nominate a Vice President who shall take office upon President
shall take office upon President shall nominate a Vice President who
shall be discharged by the Vice President as Acting President.
shall immediately assume the powers and duties of the office as Acting
shall resume the powers and duties of his office that no inability exists, he
shall decide the issue, assembling within forty eight hours for that Congress
shall continue to discharge powers and duties of his office, the Vice President
shall resume the powers the same as Acting President; otherwise, the President
shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any older, to vote
shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress
shall take effect, until an election of Representatives shall Representatives,
shall Representatives, shall take effect, until an election of Representatives
shall, at the Desire of one fifth of those Present, be entered on the Journal.
shall, without the Consent of Neither House, during the Session of Congress,
shall, during the Time for which he was elected, No Senator or Representative
shall, before it become a Law, be presented to the President of the United
shall, without the Consent of holding any Office of Profit or Trust under them,
shall, without the Consent of the Congress, lay any Imposts or Duties No State
shall, without the Consent of Congress, lay any duty of Tonnage, keep No State
shall, in the Presence the President of the Senate. The President of the Senate
shall, at stated Times, receive for his Services, a Compensation, The President
shall, at stated Times, receive for their Offices during good Behavior, and
shall, in Consequence of any Law or Regulation therein, escaping into another,
shall, in time of peace be quartered in any house, without the No Soldier
shall, in the presence of the Senate and House of The President of the Senate
Sherman Connecticut - William Samuel Johnson, Roger
Ships of War in time of Peace, enter into any Agreement or Compact Troops, or
should remain two or more who have equal Votes, the Senate shall choose from
sign it, but if not he shall return it, with his States; If he approve he shall
sign and certify, and of the Number of Votes for each; which List they shall
sign and certify, and transmit sealed to votes for each, which lists they shall
signed it, unless the Congress by their Adjournment in like Manner as if he had
silver Coin a Tender in Payment of Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder, gold and
sitting for The Senate shall have the sole Power to try all Impeachments. When
sitting. in which the two Houses shall be
six Years; and each Senator shall State, chosen by the Legislature thereof, for
six years; and each Senator shall State, elected by the people thereof, for
six, New Jersey four, Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one, Maryland five, New York
six, Virginia ten, North Carolina five, South Carolina five and Georgia three.
sixth Year, so that one third may be third Class at the Expiration of the
slave; but all such debts, obligations and the loss or emancipation of any
slavery nor involuntary servitude, except as a punishment for crime 1. Neither
smaller number may adjourn from day to day, and may be Business; but a
so that one third may be third Class at the Expiration of the sixth Year,
so construed as to Prejudice States; and nothing in this Constitution shall be
so ratifying the Same. Establishment of this Constitution between the States
so construed as to affect the election or term of This amendment shall not be
Soldier shall, in time of peace be quartered in any house, without the No
sole Power of Impeachment. shall have the
sole Power to try all Impeachments. When sitting for The Senate shall have the
solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office of "I do
some other person was elected President more than two years of a term to which
source derived, without apportionment among the several States, and whatever
South Carolina five and Georgia three. six, Virginia ten, North Carolina five,
South Carolina - John Rutledge, Charles Cotesworth Pinckney, Charles Pinckney,
Spaight, Hugh Williamson North Carolina - William Blount, Richard Dobbs
Speaker and other Officers; and The House of Representatives shall choose their
Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration that he and the
Speaker of provide, transmit to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration Senate and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives their written declaration that the
Speech or Debate in either House, they shall not be questioned in any other any
speech, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of
speedy and In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right to a
square) as may, by Cession of particular States, and (not exceeding ten Miles
St Thomas Jenifer, Daniel Carroll Maryland - James McHenry, Daniel of
Standard of Weights and Measures;
State shall Year by the People of the several States, and the Electors in each
State Legislature. the
State in which he shall be shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of that
State Representatives shall not exceed one for every thirty Thousand, but each
State of New Hampshire shall be entitled to choose three, made, the
State for which he shall be chosen. when elected, be an Inhabitant of that
State by the Legislature thereof; Representatives, shall be prescribed in each
State in which the Same shall be, for the Erection of of the Legislature of the
State over those of another: nor shall Vessels bound to, or from, Ports of one
State shall enter into any Treaty, Alliance, or Confederation; grant Letters No
State shall, without the Consent of the Congress, lay any Imposts or Duties No
State on Imports or Exports, shall be for the Use of the Treasury of the any
State shall, without the Consent of Congress, lay any duty of Tonnage, keep No
State shall appoint, in such Manner as the Legislature thereof may direct, Each
State may be entitled in the Congress: but no Senator or to which the
State persons, of whom one at least shall not lie an Inhabitant of the same
State having one Vote; a quorum taken by States, the Representation from each
State of the He shall from time to time give to the Congress Information of the
State and Citizens of Controversies between two or more States; between a
State claiming Lands under Grants of different States, and between a same
State shall be Party, the supreme Court shall have original those in which a
State where the said Crimes shall have been such Trial shall be held in the
State to the public Acts, Records, Full Faith and Credit shall be given in each
State shall be entitled to all Privileges and Immunities The Citizens of each
State with Treason, Felony, or other Crime, who shall A Person charged in any
State from which he fled, be delivered up, to be executive Authority of the
State having Jurisdiction of the Crime. removed to the
State be formed by the Junction of two or more States, or parts of States,
State in this Union a Republican The United States shall guarantee to every
State shall be bound thereby, any Thing in the Constitution or Judges in every
State to the Contrary notwithstanding. Laws of any
State Legislatures, and all executive and judicial Officers, both of several
State and district wherein the crime public trial, by an impartial jury of the
state with themselves; they shall name in their ballots the person of the same
state having one vote; a quorum for this states, the representation from each
State jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States and of the
State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge wherein they reside. No
State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property, without due process of
State legislature, or as an executive or judicial officer of any State, to any
State shall assume or pay any debt or obligation incurred United States nor any
State on account of race, color, or abridged by the United States or by any
State shall have the qualifications have one vote. The electors in each
State legislatures. requisite for electors of the most numerous branch of the
State in the Senate, the When vacancies happen in the representation of any
State shall issue writs of election to fill such executive authority of such
State may empower the vacancies: Provided, That the legislature of any
State on account of sex. abridged by the United States or by any
State by reason of failure to denied or abridged by the United States or any
State on account of age.
State, the Executive When vacancies happen in the Representation from any
State, chosen by the Legislature thereof, for six Years; and each Senator shall
State, the Executive thereof may during the Recess of the Legislature of any
State, be obliged to enter, clear, or pay Duties in another. one
State, or with a foreign Power, or engage in War, unless actually with another
State, or the Citizens thereof, and foreign States, Citizens or Subjects.
State, the Trial shall be at such committed; but when not committed within any
State, shall on demand of the flee from Justice, and be found in another
State, under the Laws thereof, No Person held to Service or Labour in one
State, fourth Clauses in the Ninth Section of the first Article; and that no
State, the A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a free
State, or by Citizens or Subjects of any Foreign State. by Citizens of another
State, their respective numbers, counting the whole number of persons in each
State, or Representatives in Congress, the Executive and Judicial officers of a
State, being twenty-one years of age, and citizens of the inhabitants of such
State, who, having previously taken an oath, as a United States, or under any
State, to any State legislature, or as an executive or judicial officer of any
State, elected by the people thereof, for six years; and each Senator shall
State, Territory, or possession 2. The transportation or importation into any
State, but in no event more than the least populous State; they shall be in a
State. No Tax or Duty shall be laid on Articles exported from any
State. whatever, from any King, Prince or foreign
State. And the Congress may by general and judicial Proceedings of every other
State. any Claims of the United States, or of any particular
State. by Citizens of another State, or by Citizens or Subjects of any Foreign
State. number of male citizens twenty-one years of age in such
State; between Citizens of different States; between Citizens of the another
State; nor any shall be formed or erected within the Jurisdiction of any other
State; they shall be in a State, but in no event more than the least populous
State; and they shall meet in the District and perform such appointed by a
stated Times, receive for his Services, a Compensation, The President shall, at
stated Times, receive for their Offices during good Behavior, and shall, at
Statement and Account of the Receipts and made by Law; and a regular
States of America. United
States Representatives and direct Taxes shall be apportioned among the several
States shall be composed of two Senators from each The Senate of the United
States shall be President of the Senate, but The Vice President of the United
States is tried, the Chief Justice shall preside: And no Person shall be United
States which be appointed to any civil Office under the Authority of the United
States respectively, the Appointment of the Officers, States, reserving to the
States now existing The Migration or Importation of such Persons as any of the
States of The executive Power shall be vested in a President of the United
States shall be necessary to a Choice. In States, and a Majority of all the
States shall be a Party; to Jurisdiction; to Controversies to which the United
States may be admitted by the Congress into this Union; but no new States New
States New States may be admitted by the Congress into this Union; but no new
States concerned as well as of without the Consent of the Legislatures of the
States shall guarantee to every State in this Union a Republican The United
States under this Constitution, shall be as valid against the United
States which shall be made in This Constitution, and the Laws of the United
States and of the several States, shall be bound by Oath or the United
States so ratifying the Same. Establishment of this Constitution between the
States present the Done in Convention by the Unanimous Consent of the
States of America the and Eighty seven and of the Independence of the United
States by the Constitution, nor The powers not delegated to the United
States respectively, or to prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the
States shall not be construed to extend to any The Judicial power of the United
States suit in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of the United
states shall be necessary to a choice. And if the House a majority of all the
States and of the State jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United
States according to 2. Representatives shall be apportioned among the several
States nor any State shall assume or pay any debt or obligation incurred United
States to vote shall not be denied or 1. The right of citizens of the United
States or by any State on account of race, color, or abridged by the United
States shall be composed of two Senators from each The Senate of the United
States and all territory subject to or the exportation thereof from the United
States shall have concurrent power to enforce 2. The Congress and the several
States by the Congress. submission hereof to the
States to vote shall not be denied or The right of citizens of the United
States or by any State on account of sex. abridged by the United
States within seven years from the date of its submission. several
States 1. The eighteenth article of amendment to the Constitution of the United
States for delivery or use therein of intoxicating liquors, in of the United
States by the Congress. to the
States within seven years from the date of its submission to the States several
States several States within seven years from the date of its submission to the
States shall 1. The District constituting the seat of Government of the United
States to vote in any primary or other 1. The right of citizens of the United
States or any State by reason of failure to denied or abridged by the United
States or by any older, to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United
States, in Order to form a more perfect Union, We the People of the United
States, which shall consist of a Senate and House of Representatives. United
States, and the Electors in each State shall Year by the People of the several
States, and who twenty five Years, and been seven Years a Citizen of the United
States, and within every subsequent Term of ten of the Congress of the United
States, and who shall not, Years, and been nine Years a Citizen of the United
States, during such time; and no Person holding any Office under the United
States, and To regulate Commerce with foreign Nations, and among the several
States, reserving to the States respectively, the Appointment of the Officers,
States, and (not exceeding ten Miles square) as may, by Cession of particular
States, and to exercise like Authority over all Places purchased by the Consent
States, or in any Department or Constitution in the Government of the United
States, shall be appointed an Elector.
States, and vote by Ballot for two The Electors shall meet in their respective
States, directed to transmit sealed to the Seat of the Government of the United
States, the Representation from each State having one Vote; a quorum taken by
States, and a Majority of all the States shall be necessary to a Choice. In
States, at No person except a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of the United
States, or any of them. Emolument from the United
States, and will to the best of my Ability, preserve, President of the United
States, and of the Militia of the several States, when called into the actual
States, when called into the actual States, and of the Militia of the several
States, except in Grant Reprieves and Pardons for Offenses against the United
States, whose Appointments are not herein and all other Officers of the United
States, The President, Vice President and all civil Officers of the United
States, shall be vested in one supreme Court, The judicial Power of the United
States, and Treaties made, or which this Constitution, the Laws of the United
States, and between a same State claiming Lands under Grants of different
States, Citizens or Subjects. State, or the Citizens thereof, and foreign
States, shall consist only in levying War against Treason against the United
States, or parts of States, State be formed by the Junction of two or more
States, State be formed by the Junction of two or more States, or parts of
States, or of any particular State. any Claims of the United
States, shall call a Convention for Legislatures of two thirds of the several
States, or by Conventions in three fourths three fourths of the several
States, shall be the supreme Law of the Land; and the Authority of the United
States, shall be bound by Oath or the United States and of the several
States, shall be sufficient for the The Ratification of the Conventions of nine
States, than jury, shall be otherwise re-examined in any Court of the United
States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to prohibited by it to the
states, and vote by ballot for The Electors shall meet in their respective
States, directed to the President of the seat of the government of the United
states, the representation from each state having one vote; a quorum for this
states, and purpose shall consist of a member or members from two-thirds of the
States, or any place subject to their jurisdiction.
States, and subject to the 1. All persons born or naturalized in the United
States, choice of electors for President and Vice-President of the United
States, or in any way abridged, except for participation in rebellion, United
States, or under any State, who, having previously taken an oath, as a United
States, or as a member of member of Congress, or as an officer of the United
States, shall have engaged in support the Constitution of the United
States, authorized by law, 4. The validity of the public debt of the United
States, or any claim for in aid of insurrection or rebellion against the United
States, and whatever source derived, without apportionment among the several
States, as amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of the several
States, as provided amendment to the Constitution by conventions in the several
States, but they shall be considered, for addition to those appointed by the
States, who are eighteen years of age or 1. The right of citizens of the United
States. President of the United
States. They shall in all Cases, except Treason, Felony and Breach of the
States. United
States. Resident within the United
States. the Officers of the United
States. of Citizens in the several
States.
States. that of Vice-President of the United
States." protect and defend the Constitution of the United
States: but the Party convicted shall nevertheless be Profit under the United
States: And no Person No Title of Nobility shall be granted by the United
States; If he approve he shall sign it, but if not he shall return it, with his
States; and before the Same shall be presented to the President of the United
States; but all Duties, Imposts and Excises shall be Welfare of the United
States; uniform throughout the United
States; To borrow money on the credit of the United
States; of Bankruptcies throughout the United
States; of the United
States; and all such Laws shall be subject to the Revision and Control United
States; he may require the Opinion, in writing, of the Service of the United
States; between a State and Citizens of Controversies between two or more
States; between Citizens of the another State; between Citizens of different
States; and nothing in this Constitution shall be so construed as to Prejudice
States; nor shall any the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United
subject to Indictment, Trial, Judgment and Punishment, according to liable and
subject To establish an uniform Rule of Naturalization, and uniform Laws on the
subject to the Revision and Control United States; and all such Laws shall be
subject principal Officer in each of the executive Departments, upon any
subject for the same offense of War or public danger; nor shall any person be
subject to their jurisdiction. States, or any place
subject to the 1. All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and
subject to or the exportation thereof from the United States and all territory
Subjects of any Foreign State. by Citizens of another State, or by Citizens or
Subjects. State, or the Citizens thereof, and foreign States, Citizens or
submission hereof to the States by the Congress.
submission hereof in the Constitution, within seven years from the date of the
submission to the States several States within seven years from the date of its
submission. several States within seven years from the date of its
subscribed our Names. Twelfth. In Witness whereof We have hereunto
subsequent Term of ten of the Congress of the United States, and within every
successors shall then article had not been ratified; and the terms of their
such Manner as they shall by Law direct. The Number of Years, in
such enumeration shall be shall have at Least one Representative; and until
such Vacancies. Authority thereof shall issue Writs of Election to fill
such Vacancies. shall then fill
such Regulations, except but the Congress may at any time by Law make or alter
such Meeting shall The Congress shall assemble at least once in every Year, and
such Manner, and authorized to compel the Attendance of absent Members, in
such Penalties as each House may provide. under
such Parts as may in their Judgment require publish the same, excepting
such time; and no Person holding any Office under the United States, during
such Reconsideration two thirds of that House shall agree to pass the Bill, it
such Cases the Votes of both Houses shall be shall become a Law. But in all
such Part of them as may be employed in the Service of the United governing
such District To exercise exclusive Legislation in all Cases whatsoever, over
such Persons as any of the States now existing The Migration or Importation of
such Importation, not exceeding ten dollars for each Person. on
such Laws shall be subject to the Revision and Control United States; and all
such imminent Danger as will not admit of delay. invaded, or in
such Manner as the Legislature thereof may direct, Each State shall appoint, in
such Number be a Majority of the whole Number of shall be the President, if
such Majority, and Electors appointed; and if there be more than one who have
such Officer shall act accordingly, until the Disability be President, and
such inferior Officers, as they think may by Law vest the Appointment of
such Measures as he shall judge Union, and recommend to their Consideration
such Time as he Respect to the Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn them to
such inferior Courts as the Congress may from time to time ordain and and in
such Exceptions, and have appellate Jurisdiction, both as to Law and Fact, with
such Regulations as the Congress shall make. under
such Trial shall be held in the State where the said Crimes shall have been
such committed; but when not committed within any State, the Trial shall be at
such Acts, Records and Proceedings shall be Laws prescribe the Manner in which
such Service or Labour, But shall be delivered up on Claim be discharged from
such Service or Labour may be due. of the Party to whom
such number be a majority of the whole number of Electors President, if
such majority, then from the persons having appointed; and if no person have
such number be a majority of the whole number of Electors Vice-President, if
such State, being twenty-one years of age, and citizens of the inhabitants of
such male citizens shall bear to the whole proportion which the number of
such State. number of male citizens twenty-one years of age in
such disability.
such debts, obligations and the loss or emancipation of any slave; but all
such State shall issue writs of election to fill such executive authority of
such executive authority of such State shall issue writs of election to fill
such terms would have ended if this day of January, of the years in which
such meeting 2. The Congress shall assemble at least once in every year, and
such person shall act accordingly until a President act shall be selected, and
such term. President or acting as President during the remainder of
such manner as the Congress may direct: A number of electors of appoint in
such appointed by a State; and they shall meet in the District and perform
such powers and duties transmits to them a written declaration to the contrary,
such other body as Congress may by law of the executive departments or of
such other body as Congress may by law provide, the executive department or of
sufficient for the The Ratification of the Conventions of nine States, shall be
Suffrage in the Senate. without its Consent, shall be deprived of its equal
suit in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of the United States
Suits at common law, where the value in controversy shall exceed twenty In
support Armies, but no Appropriation of Money to that Use shall be To raise and
support this Constitution; but no religious Test shall ever be Affirmation, to
support the Constitution of the United States, shall have engaged in
supported by Oath or no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause,
suppress Insurrections and repel Invasions;
suppressing insurrection or rebellion, shall not be questioned. But neither the
supreme Court; To constitute Tribunals inferior to the
supreme Court, Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, Judges of the
supreme Court, The judicial Power of the United States, shall be vested in one
supreme and inferior Courts, shall hold establish. The Judges, both of the
supreme Court shall have original those in which a State shall be Party, the
supreme Court shall Jurisdiction. In all the other Cases before mentioned, the
supreme Law of the Land; and the Authority of the United States, shall be the
suspended, unless when The privilege of the Writ of Habeas Corpus shall not be
swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute the Office of "I do solemnly
take Effect, shall be approved by him, or being disapproved by him, shall shall
take the following Before he enter on the Execution of his Office, he shall
take Care that the Laws be faithfully executed, and shall Commission all shall
take effect on the 15th day of October following the 5. Sections 1 and 2 shall
take office upon President shall nominate a Vice President who shall
take effect, until an election of Representatives shall Representatives, shall
taken by States, the Representation from each State having one Vote; a quorum
taken for public use, without just compensation.
taken by the President. But in choosing the President, the votes shall be
taken an oath, as a United States, or under any State, who, having previously
taken. Census or Enumeration herein before directed to be
tax or duty may be imposed the Year one thousand eight hundred and eight, but a
Tax shall be laid, unless in Proportion to the No capitation, or other direct,
Tax or Duty shall be laid on Articles exported from any State. No
tax or other tax. pay any poll
tax. pay any poll tax or other
taxed, three fifths of all other Persons.
taxed. But when the right to vote at any election for the excluding Indians not
Taxes shall be apportioned among the several States Representatives and direct
taxes on incomes, from The Congress shall have power to lay and collect
Taxes, Duties, Imposts and The Congress shall have Power To lay and collect
temporary Appointments until the next Meeting of the Legislature, which make
temporary appointments until the people fill the executive thereof to make
tempore of the Senate 3. Whenever the President transmits to the President pro
tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of provide, transmit to the President pro
tempore of the Thereafter, when the President transmits to the President pro
tempore of the Senate and the transmit within four days to the President pro
tempore, The Senate shall choose their other Officers, and also a President pro
ten of the Congress of the United States, and within every subsequent Term of
ten Days (Sundays any Bill shall not be returned by the President within
ten Miles square) as may, by Cession of particular States, and (not exceeding
ten dollars for each Person. on such Importation, not exceeding
ten, North Carolina five, South Carolina five and Georgia three. six, Virginia
Tender in Payment of Debts; pass any Bill of Attainder, gold and silver Coin a
Term of Years, and excluding Indians not including those bound to Service for a
Term of ten of the Congress of the United States, and within every subsequent
Term than two Years; for a longer
Term of four Years, and, together America. He shall hold his Office during the
term of This amendment shall not be so construed as to affect the election or
term of the President, the 3. If, at the time fixed for the beginning of the
term to which some other person was elected President more than two years of a
term be holding the office of President, or acting as President, during the
Term, be elected, as follows: with the Vice-President chosen for the same
term, or if the President elect shall have failed to the beginning of his
term. President or acting as President during the remainder of such
terms of the President and Vice President shall end at noon on the 20th 1. The
terms of Senators and Representatives at noon on the 3d day of January, and the
terms would have ended if this day of January, of the years in which such
terms of their successors shall then article had not been ratified; and the
Territory or other Property belonging to the United Regulations respecting the
territory subject to or the exportation thereof from the United States and all
Territory, or possession 2. The transportation or importation into any State,
Test shall ever be Affirmation, to support this Constitution; but no religious
Testimony of two Witnesses to the shall be convicted of Treason unless on the
than to removal from Judgment in Cases of Impeachment shall not extend further
than three days, nor to any other Place than that the other, adjourn for more
than that the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to any other Place
than two Years; for a longer Term
than one who have such Majority, and Electors appointed; and if there be more
than jury, shall be otherwise re-examined in any Court of the United States,
than twice, 1. No person shall be elected to the office of the President more
than two years of a term to which some other person was elected President more
than once. But this shall be elected to the office of the President more
than the least populous State; they shall be in a State, but in no event more
that State in which he shall be shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of
that one third may be third Class at the Expiration of the sixth Year, so
that State for which he shall be chosen. when elected, be an Inhabitant of
that Purpose, they shall be on Oath or Affirmation. When the President of the
that the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to any other Place than
that House in which it shall have originated, who shall enter the Objections to
that House shall agree to pass the Bill, it such Reconsideration two thirds of
that House, it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by two thirds of
that Use shall be To raise and support Armies, but no Appropriation of Money to
that Office who shall not of President; neither shall any Person be eligible to
that Period any other shall have been elected, and he shall not receive within
that I will faithfully execute the Office of "I do solemnly swear (or affirm)
that may happen during The President shall have Power to fill up all Vacancies
that the Laws be faithfully executed, and shall Commission all shall take Care
that no Amendment which may be made prior to the Year One Congress; Provided
that no State, fourth Clauses in the Ninth Section of the first Article; and
that of Vice-President of the United States.
That the legislature of any State may empower the vacancies: Provided,
that he and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration
that the President is the House of Representatives their written declaration
that no inability exists, he shall resume the powers and duties of his office
that the Speaker of the House of Representatives their written declaration
that Congress shall decide the issue, assembling within forty eight hours for
that the President is unable to discharge the two thirds vote of both Houses
the People of the United States, in Order to form a more perfect Union, We
the United States, in Order to form a more perfect Union, We the People of
the common establish Justice, insure domestic Tranquility, provide for
the general Welfare, and secure the Blessings of Liberty to defence, promote
the Blessings of Liberty to defence, promote the general Welfare, and secure
the ourselves and our Posterity, do ordain and establish this Constitution for
the All legislative Powers herein granted shall be vested in a Congress of
The House of Representatives shall be composed of Members chosen every second
the People of the several States, and the Electors in each State shall Year by
the several States, and the Electors in each State shall Year by the People of
the Electors in each State shall Year by the People of the several States, and
the Qualifications requisite for Electors of the most numerous Branch of have
the most numerous Branch of have the Qualifications requisite for Electors of
the State Legislature.
the Age of No Person shall be a Representative who shall not have attained to
the United States, and who twenty five Years, and been seven Years a Citizen of
the several States Representatives and direct Taxes shall be apportioned among
the whole Number of free Persons, which shall be determined by adding to
The actual Enumeration shall be made within three Years after the first Meeting
the first Meeting The actual Enumeration shall be made within three Years after
the Congress of the United States, and within every subsequent Term of ten of
the United States, and within every subsequent Term of ten of the Congress of
The Number of Years, in such Manner as they shall by Law direct.
the State of New Hampshire shall be entitled to choose three, made,
the Representation from any State, the Executive When vacancies happen in
the Executive When vacancies happen in the Representation from any State,
The House of Representatives shall choose their Speaker and other Officers; and
the sole Power of Impeachment. shall have
The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each
the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each The Senate of
the Legislature thereof, for six Years; and each Senator shall State, chosen by
the first Election, Immediately after they shall be assembled in Consequence of
The Seats of the they shall be divided as equally as may be into three Classes.
the they shall be divided as equally as may be into three Classes. The Seats of
the first Class shall be vacated at the Expiration of the second Senators of
the Expiration of the second Senators of the first Class shall be vacated at
the second Senators of the first Class shall be vacated at the Expiration of
the second Class at the Expiration of the fourth Year, and of the Year, of
the Expiration of the fourth Year, and of the Year, of the second Class at
the fourth Year, and of the Year, of the second Class at the Expiration of
the Year, of the second Class at the Expiration of the fourth Year, and of
the Expiration of the sixth Year, so that one third may be third Class at
the sixth Year, so that one third may be third Class at the Expiration of
the Recess of the Legislature of any State, the Executive thereof may during
the Legislature of any State, the Executive thereof may during the Recess of
the Executive thereof may during the Recess of the Legislature of any State,
the next Meeting of the Legislature, which make temporary Appointments until
the Legislature, which make temporary Appointments until the next Meeting of
the Age of thirty No person shall be a Senator who shall not have attained to
the United States, and who shall not, Years, and been nine Years a Citizen of
The Vice President of the United States shall be President of the Senate, but
the United States shall be President of the Senate, but The Vice President of
the Senate, but The Vice President of the United States shall be President of
The Senate shall choose their other Officers, and also a President pro tempore,
the absence of the Vice President, or when he shall exercise the Office of in
the Vice President, or when he shall exercise the Office of in the absence of
the Office of in the absence of the Vice President, or when he shall exercise
the United States. President of
The Senate shall have the sole Power to try all Impeachments. When sitting for
the sole Power to try all Impeachments. When sitting for The Senate shall have
the President of the that Purpose, they shall be on Oath or Affirmation. When
the that Purpose, they shall be on Oath or Affirmation. When the President of
the Chief Justice shall preside: And no Person shall be United States is tried,
the Concurrence of two thirds of the Members present. convicted without
the Members present. convicted without the Concurrence of two thirds of
the United States: but the Party convicted shall nevertheless be Profit under
the Party convicted shall nevertheless be Profit under the United States: but
The Times, Places and Manner of holding Elections for Senators and
the Legislature thereof; Representatives, shall be prescribed in each State by
the Congress may at any time by Law make or alter such Regulations, except but
the Place of Choosing Senators. as to
The Congress shall assemble at least once in every Year, and such Meeting shall
the first Monday in December, unless they shall by Law appoint a be on
the Judge of the Elections, Returns and Qualifications of Each House shall be
the Elections, Returns and Qualifications of Each House shall be the Judge of
the Attendance of absent Members, in such Manner, and authorized to compel
the Rules of its Proceedings, punish its Members for Each House may determine
the Concurrence of two-thirds, expel a Member. disorderly Behavior, and, with
the same, excepting such Parts as may in their Judgment require publish
the Yeas and Nays of the Members of either House on any question Secrecy; and
the Members of either House on any question Secrecy; and the Yeas and Nays of
the Desire of one fifth of those Present, be entered on the Journal. shall, at
the Journal. shall, at the Desire of one fifth of those Present, be entered on
the Session of Congress, shall, without the Consent of Neither House, during
the Consent of Neither House, during the Session of Congress, shall, without
the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor to any other Place than that
the two Houses shall be sitting. in which
The Senators and Representatives shall receive a Compensation for their
the Treasury of the United Services, to be ascertained by Law, and paid out of
the United Services, to be ascertained by Law, and paid out of the Treasury of
the States. They shall in all Cases, except Treason, Felony and Breach of
the Session of Peace, be privileged from Arrest during their Attendance at
the same; and for their respective Houses, and in going to and returning from
the Time for which he was elected, No Senator or Representative shall, during
the Authority of the United States which be appointed to any civil Office under
the United States which be appointed to any civil Office under the Authority of
the Emoluments whereof shall have been increased shall have been created, or
the United States, during such time; and no Person holding any Office under
the House of Representatives; All bills for raising Revenue shall originate in
the Senate may propose or concur with Amendments as on other Bills. but
the House of Representatives and the Senate, Every Bill which shall have passed
the Senate, Every Bill which shall have passed the House of Representatives and
the President of the United shall, before it become a Law, be presented to
the United shall, before it become a Law, be presented to the President of
the Objections to that House in which it shall have originated, who shall enter
the Bill, it such Reconsideration two thirds of that House shall agree to pass
the Objections, to the other House, by which it shall be sent, together with
the other House, by which it shall be sent, together with the Objections, to
the Votes of both Houses shall be shall become a Law. But in all such Cases
the Names of the Persons voting for and determined by Yeas and Nays, and
the Persons voting for and determined by Yeas and Nays, and the Names of
the Bill shall be entered on the Journal of each House respectively. If against
the Journal of each House respectively. If against the Bill shall be entered on
the President within ten Days (Sundays any Bill shall not be returned by
the Same shall be a Law, excepted) after it shall have been presented to him,
the Congress by their Adjournment in like Manner as if he had signed it, unless
the Concurrence of the Senate and Every Order, Resolution, or Vote to which
the Senate and Every Order, Resolution, or Vote to which the Concurrence of
the President of the United States; and before the Same shall be presented to
the United States; and before the Same shall be presented to the President of
the Same shall be presented to the President of the United States; and before
the Senate and House of Representatives, according be repassed by two thirds of
the Rules and Limitations prescribed in the Case of a Bill. to
the Case of a Bill. to the Rules and Limitations prescribed in
The Congress shall have Power To lay and collect Taxes, Duties, Imposts and
the Debts and provide for the common Defence and general Excises, to pay
the common Defence and general Excises, to pay the Debts and provide for
the United States; but all Duties, Imposts and Excises shall be Welfare of
the United States; uniform throughout
the credit of the United States; To borrow money on
the United States; To borrow money on the credit of
the several States, and To regulate Commerce with foreign Nations, and among
the Indian Tribes; with
the subject To establish an uniform Rule of Naturalization, and uniform Laws on
the United States; of Bankruptcies throughout
the Value thereof, and of foreign Coin, and fix the To coin Money, regulate
the To coin Money, regulate the Value thereof, and of foreign Coin, and fix
the Punishment of counterfeiting the Securities and current Coin To provide for
the Securities and current Coin To provide for the Punishment of counterfeiting
the United States; of
the Progress of Science and useful Arts, by securing for limited To promote
the exclusive Right to their respective Writings Times to Authors and Inventors
the supreme Court; To constitute Tribunals inferior to
the high Seas, and To define and punish Piracies and Felonies committed on
the Law of Nations; Offenses against
the Government and Regulation of the land and naval Forces; To make Rules for
the land and naval Forces; To make Rules for the Government and Regulation of
the Militia to execute the Laws of the Union, To provide for calling forth
the Laws of the Union, To provide for calling forth the Militia to execute
the Union, To provide for calling forth the Militia to execute the Laws of
the Militia, and for To provide for organizing, arming, and disciplining,
the Service of the United governing such Part of them as may be employed in
the United governing such Part of them as may be employed in the Service of
the States respectively, the Appointment of the Officers, States, reserving to
the Appointment of the Officers, States, reserving to the States respectively,
the Officers, States, reserving to the States respectively, the Appointment of
the Authority of training the Militia according to the discipline and
the Militia according to the discipline and the Authority of training
the discipline and the Authority of training the Militia according to
the acceptance of Congress, become the Seat of the Government of the United
the Seat of the Government of the United the acceptance of Congress, become
the Government of the United the acceptance of Congress, become the Seat of
the United the acceptance of Congress, become the Seat of the Government of
the Consent States, and to exercise like Authority over all Places purchased by
the Legislature of the State in which the Same shall be, for the Erection of of
the State in which the Same shall be, for the Erection of of the Legislature of
the Same shall be, for the Erection of of the Legislature of the State in which
the Erection of of the Legislature of the State in which the Same shall be, for
the foregoing Powers, and all other Powers vested by this Execution
the Government of the United States, or in any Department or Constitution in
the United States, or in any Department or Constitution in the Government of
The Migration or Importation of such Persons as any of the States now existing
the States now existing The Migration or Importation of such Persons as any of
the Congress prior to shall think proper to admit, shall not be prohibited by
the Year one thousand eight hundred and eight, but a tax or duty may be imposed
The privilege of the Writ of Habeas Corpus shall not be suspended, unless when
the Writ of Habeas Corpus shall not be suspended, unless when The privilege of
the public Safety may require it. in Cases of Rebellion or Invasion
the No capitation, or other direct, Tax shall be laid, unless in Proportion to
the No Preference shall be given by any Regulation of Commerce or Revenue to
the Treasury, but in Consequence of Appropriations No Money shall be drawn from
the Receipts and made by Law; and a regular Statement and Account of
the United States: And no Person No Title of Nobility shall be granted by
the Consent of holding any Office of Profit or Trust under them, shall, without
the Congress, accept of any present, Emolument, Office, or Title, of any kind
the Obligation of Contracts, or grant any ex post facto Law, or Law impairing
the Consent of the Congress, lay any Imposts or Duties No State shall, without
the Congress, lay any Imposts or Duties No State shall, without the Consent of
the net Produce of all Duties and Imposts, laid by its inspection Laws: and
the Use of the Treasury of the any State on Imports or Exports, shall be for
the Treasury of the any State on Imports or Exports, shall be for the Use of
the any State on Imports or Exports, shall be for the Use of the Treasury of
the Revision and Control United States; and all such Laws shall be subject to
the Congress. of
the Consent of Congress, lay any duty of Tonnage, keep No State shall, without
The executive Power shall be vested in a President of the United States of
the United States of The executive Power shall be vested in a President of
the Term of four Years, and, together America. He shall hold his Office during
the Vice-President chosen for the same Term, be elected, as follows: with
the same Term, be elected, as follows: with the Vice-President chosen for
the Legislature thereof may direct, Each State shall appoint, in such Manner as
the whole Number of Senators and Representatives a Number of Electors, equal to
the State may be entitled in the Congress: but no Senator or to which
the Congress: but no Senator or to which the State may be entitled in
the United Representative, or Person holding an Office of Trust or Profit under
The Electors shall meet in their respective States, and vote by Ballot for two
the same State persons, of whom one at least shall not lie an Inhabitant of
the Persons voted for, and with themselves. And they shall make a List of all
the Number of Votes for each; which List they shall sign and certify, and of
the Seat of the Government of the United States, directed to transmit sealed to
the Government of the United States, directed to transmit sealed to the Seat of
the United States, directed to transmit sealed to the Seat of the Government of
the President of the Senate. The President of the Senate shall, in the Presence
the Senate. The President of the Senate shall, in the Presence the President of
The President of the Senate shall, in the Presence the President of the Senate.
the Senate shall, in the Presence the President of the Senate. The President of
the Presence the President of the Senate. The President of the Senate shall, in
the Senate and House of Representatives, open all the Certificates, and the of
the Certificates, and the of the Senate and House of Representatives, open all
the of the Senate and House of Representatives, open all the Certificates, and
The Person having the greatest Number of Votes Votes shall then be counted.
the greatest Number of Votes Votes shall then be counted. The Person having
the President, if such Number be a Majority of the whole Number of shall be
the whole Number of shall be the President, if such Number be a Majority of
the House of Representatives shall have an equal Number of Votes, then
the five highest on the List the said House shall in like Majority, then from
the List the said House shall in like Majority, then from the five highest on
the said House shall in like Majority, then from the five highest on the List
the President. But in choosing the President, the Votes shall be Manner choose
the President, the Votes shall be Manner choose the President. But in choosing
the Votes shall be Manner choose the President. But in choosing the President,
the Representation from each State having one Vote; a quorum taken by States,
the for this Purpose shall consist of a Member or Members from two-thirds of
the States shall be necessary to a Choice. In States, and a Majority of all
the Choice of the President, the Person having the greatest every Case, after
the President, the Person having the greatest every Case, after the Choice of
the Person having the greatest every Case, after the Choice of the President,
the greatest every Case, after the Choice of the President, the Person having
the Electors shall be the Vice President. But if there Number of Votes of
the Vice President. But if there Number of Votes of the Electors shall be
the Senate shall choose from should remain two or more who have equal Votes,
the Vice-President. them by Ballot
The Congress may determine the Time of choosing the Electors, and the Day on
the Time of choosing the Electors, and the Day on The Congress may determine
the Electors, and the Day on The Congress may determine the Time of choosing
the Day on The Congress may determine the Time of choosing the Electors, and
the same throughout the which they shall give their Votes; which Day shall be
the which they shall give their Votes; which Day shall be the same throughout
the United States, at No person except a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of
the time of the Adoption of this Constitution, shall be eligible to the Office
the Adoption of this Constitution, shall be eligible to the Office the time of
the Office the time of the Adoption of this Constitution, shall be eligible to
the Age of thirty-five Years, and been fourteen Years a have attained to
the United States. Resident within
the Removal of the President from Office, or of his Death, In Case of
the President from Office, or of his Death, In Case of the Removal of
the Powers and Duties of the said Resignation, or Inability to discharge
the said Resignation, or Inability to discharge the Powers and Duties of
the same shall devolve on the Vice President, and the Congress may by Office,
the Vice President, and the Congress may by Office, the same shall devolve on
the Congress may by Office, the same shall devolve on the Vice President, and
the Case of Removal, Death, Resignation or Inability, both of Law provide for
the President and Vice President, declaring what Officer shall then act as
the Disability be President, and such Officer shall act accordingly, until
The President shall, at stated Times, receive for his Services, a Compensation,
the Period for which he which shall neither be increased nor diminished during
the United States, or any of them. Emolument from
the Execution of his Office, he shall take the following Before he enter on
the following Before he enter on the Execution of his Office, he shall take
the Office of "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully execute
the United States, and will to the best of my Ability, preserve, President of
the best of my Ability, preserve, President of the United States, and will to
the Constitution of the United States." protect and defend
the United States." protect and defend the Constitution of
The President shall be Commander in Chief of the Army and Navy of the United
the Army and Navy of the United The President shall be Commander in Chief of
the United The President shall be Commander in Chief of the Army and Navy of
the Militia of the several States, when called into the actual States, and of
the several States, when called into the actual States, and of the Militia of
the actual States, and of the Militia of the several States, when called into
the United States; he may require the Opinion, in writing, of the Service of
the Opinion, in writing, of the Service of the United States; he may require
the Service of the United States; he may require the Opinion, in writing, of
the executive Departments, upon any subject principal Officer in each of
the Duties of their respective Offices, and he shall have Power to relating to
the United States, except in Grant Reprieves and Pardons for Offenses against
the Advice and Consent of the Senate, to make He shall have Power, by and with
the Senate, to make He shall have Power, by and with the Advice and Consent of
the Senators present concur; and he shall Treaties, provided two thirds of
the Advice and Consent of the Senate, shall appoint nominate, and by and with
the Senate, shall appoint nominate, and by and with the Advice and Consent of
the supreme Court, Ambassadors, other public Ministers and Consuls, Judges of
the United States, whose Appointments are not herein and all other Officers of
the Congress otherwise provided for, and which shall be established by Law: but
the Appointment of such inferior Officers, as they think may by Law vest
the President alone, in the Courts of Law, or in the Heads of proper, in
the Courts of Law, or in the Heads of proper, in the President alone, in
the Heads of proper, in the President alone, in the Courts of Law, or in
The President shall have Power to fill up all Vacancies that may happen during
the Recess of the Senate, by granting Commissions which shall expire at the End
the Senate, by granting Commissions which shall expire at the End the Recess of
the End the Recess of the Senate, by granting Commissions which shall expire at
the Congress Information of the State of the He shall from time to time give to
the State of the He shall from time to time give to the Congress Information of
the He shall from time to time give to the Congress Information of the State of
the Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn them to such Time as he Respect to
the Laws be faithfully executed, and shall Commission all shall take Care that
the Officers of the United States.
the United States. the Officers of
The President, Vice President and all civil Officers of the United States,
the United States, The President, Vice President and all civil Officers of
The judicial Power of the United States, shall be vested in one supreme Court,
the United States, shall be vested in one supreme Court, The judicial Power of
the Congress may from time to time ordain and and in such inferior Courts as
The Judges, both of the supreme and inferior Courts, shall hold establish.
the supreme and inferior Courts, shall hold establish. The Judges, both of
The judicial Power shall extend to all Cases, in Law and Equity, arising under
the Laws of the United States, and Treaties made, or which this Constitution,
the United States, and Treaties made, or which this Constitution, the Laws of
the United States shall be a Party; to Jurisdiction; to Controversies to which
the another State; between Citizens of different States; between Citizens of
the Citizens thereof, and foreign States, Citizens or Subjects. State, or
the supreme Court shall have original those in which a State shall be Party,
the other Cases before mentioned, the supreme Court shall Jurisdiction. In all
the supreme Court shall Jurisdiction. In all the other Cases before mentioned,
the Congress shall make. under such Regulations as
The Trial of all Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and
the State where the said Crimes shall have been such Trial shall be held in
the said Crimes shall have been such Trial shall be held in the State where
the Trial shall be at such committed; but when not committed within any State,
the Congress may by Law have directed. Place or Places as
the United States, shall consist only in levying War against Treason against
the Testimony of two Witnesses to the shall be convicted of Treason unless on
the shall be convicted of Treason unless on the Testimony of two Witnesses to
The Congress shall have power to declare the Punishment of Treason, but no
the Punishment of Treason, but no The Congress shall have power to declare
the Life of the Person attainted. during
the Person attainted. during the Life of
the public Acts, Records, Full Faith and Credit shall be given in each State to
the Congress may by general and judicial Proceedings of every other State. And
the Manner in which such Acts, Records and Proceedings shall be Laws prescribe
the Effect thereof. proved, and
The Citizens of each State shall be entitled to all Privileges and Immunities
the several States. of Citizens in
the flee from Justice, and be found in another State, shall on demand of
the State from which he fled, be delivered up, to be executive Authority of
the State having Jurisdiction of the Crime. removed to
the Crime. removed to the State having Jurisdiction of
the Laws thereof, No Person held to Service or Labour in one State, under
the Party to whom such Service or Labour may be due. of
the Congress into this Union; but no new States New States may be admitted by
the Jurisdiction of any other State; nor any shall be formed or erected within
the Junction of two or more States, or parts of States, State be formed by
the Consent of the Legislatures of the States concerned as well as of without
the Legislatures of the States concerned as well as of without the Consent of
the States concerned as well as of without the Consent of the Legislatures of
the Congress.
The Congress shall have Power to dispose of and make all needful Rules and
the Territory or other Property belonging to the United Regulations respecting
the United Regulations respecting the Territory or other Property belonging to
the United States, or of any particular State. any Claims of
The United States shall guarantee to every State in this Union a Republican
the Legislature, or of the Executive (when the Legislature Application of
the Executive (when the Legislature Application of the Legislature, or of
the Legislature Application of the Legislature, or of the Executive (when
The Congress, whenever two thirds of both Houses shall deem it necessary, shall
the Application of the propose Amendments to this Constitution, or, on
the propose Amendments to this Constitution, or, on the Application of
the several States, shall call a Convention for Legislatures of two thirds of
the Legislatures of Purposes, as part of this Constitution, when ratified by
the several States, or by Conventions in three fourths three fourths of
the one or the other Mode of Ratification may be proposed by the thereof, as
the other Mode of Ratification may be proposed by the thereof, as the one or
the thereof, as the one or the other Mode of Ratification may be proposed by
the Year One Congress; Provided that no Amendment which may be made prior to
the first and thousand eight hundred and eight shall in any Manner affect
the Ninth Section of the first Article; and that no State, fourth Clauses in
the first Article; and that no State, fourth Clauses in the Ninth Section of
the Senate. without its Consent, shall be deprived of its equal Suffrage in
the Adoption of this All Debts contracted and Engagements entered into, before
the United States under this Constitution, shall be as valid against
the Confederation. Constitution, as under
the Laws of the United States which shall be made in This Constitution, and
the United States which shall be made in This Constitution, and the Laws of
the Pursuance thereof; and all Treaties made, or which shall be made, under
the United States, shall be the supreme Law of the Land; and the Authority of
the supreme Law of the Land; and the Authority of the United States, shall be
the Land; and the Authority of the United States, shall be the supreme Law of
the Authority of the United States, shall be the supreme Law of the Land; and
the Constitution or Judges in every State shall be bound thereby, any Thing in
the Contrary notwithstanding. Laws of any State to
The Senators and Representatives before mentioned, and the Members of the
the Members of the The Senators and Representatives before mentioned, and
the The Senators and Representatives before mentioned, and the Members of
the United States and of the several States, shall be bound by Oath or
the several States, shall be bound by Oath or the United States and of
the United required as a Qualification to any Office or public Trust under
The Ratification of the Conventions of nine States, shall be sufficient for the
the Conventions of nine States, shall be sufficient for the The Ratification of
the The Ratification of the Conventions of nine States, shall be sufficient for
the States so ratifying the Same. Establishment of this Constitution between
the Same. Establishment of this Constitution between the States so ratifying
the Unanimous Consent of the States present the Done in Convention by
the States present the Done in Convention by the Unanimous Consent of
the Done in Convention by the Unanimous Consent of the States present
the Year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred Seventeenth Day of September in
the Independence of the United States of America the and Eighty seven and of
the United States of America the and Eighty seven and of the Independence of
the and Eighty seven and of the Independence of the United States of America
the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or prohibiting
the freedom of speech, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging
the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition of
the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition of the press; or
the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition of the press; or the right of
the Government for a redress of grievances.
the security of a free State, the A well regulated Militia, being necessary to
the A well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a free State,
the people to keep and bear Arms, shall not be infringed. right of
the No Soldier shall, in time of peace be quartered in any house, without
the Owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by consent of
The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and
the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and The right of
the place to be searched, and the affirmation, and particularly describing
the affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be searched, and
the land or naval forces, or in the Militia, when in actual service in time in
the Militia, when in actual service in time in the land or naval forces, or in
the same offense of War or public danger; nor shall any person be subject for
the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy and In all criminal prosecutions,
the right to a speedy and In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy
the State and district wherein the crime public trial, by an impartial jury of
the crime public trial, by an impartial jury of the State and district wherein
the nature and cause of the ascertained by law, and to be informed of
the ascertained by law, and to be informed of the nature and cause of
the witnesses against him; to have compulsory accusation; to be confronted with
the Assistance of process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have
the value in controversy shall exceed twenty In Suits at common law, where
the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a dollars,
the United States, than jury, shall be otherwise re-examined in any Court of
the rules of the common law. according to
the common law. according to the rules of
The enumeration in the Constitution, of certain rights, shall not be construed
the Constitution, of certain rights, shall not be construed The enumeration in
the people. to deny or disparage others retained by
The powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor
the United States by the Constitution, nor The powers not delegated to
the Constitution, nor The powers not delegated to the United States by
the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to prohibited by it to
the States respectively, or to prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to
the people.
The Judicial power of the United States shall not be construed to extend to any
the United States shall not be construed to extend to any The Judicial power of
the United States suit in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of
The Electors shall meet in their respective states, and vote by ballot for
the same state with themselves; they shall name in their ballots the person of
the person of the same state with themselves; they shall name in their ballots
the person voted for as voted for as President, and in distinct ballots
the number of President, and of all persons voted for as Vice-President and of
the seat of the government of the United States, directed to the President of
the government of the United States, directed to the President of the seat of
the United States, directed to the President of the seat of the government of
the President of the seat of the government of the United States, directed to
the Senate;
The President of the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and House of
the Senate shall, in the presence of the Senate and House of The President of
the presence of the Senate and House of The President of the Senate shall, in
the Senate and House of The President of the Senate shall, in the presence of
the certificates and the votes shall then be counted; Representatives, open all
the votes shall then be counted; Representatives, open all the certificates and
The person having the greatest Number of votes for President, shall be the
the greatest Number of votes for President, shall be the The person having
the The person having the greatest Number of votes for President, shall be
the whole number of Electors President, if such number be a majority of
the persons having appointed; and if no person have such majority, then from
the highest numbers not exceeding three on the list of those voted for as
the list of those voted for as the highest numbers not exceeding three on
the House of Representatives shall choose immediately, by ballot, President,
the President. But in choosing the President, the votes shall be taken by
the President, the votes shall be taken by the President. But in choosing
the votes shall be taken by the President. But in choosing the President,
the representation from each state having one vote; a quorum for this states,
the states, and purpose shall consist of a member or members from two-thirds of
the states shall be necessary to a choice. And if the House a majority of all
the House a majority of all the states shall be necessary to a choice. And if
the right of choice of Representatives shall not choose a President whenever
the fourth day of March next following, then shall devolve upon them, before
the Vice-President shall act as President, as in the case of the death or other
the case of the death or other the Vice-President shall act as President, as in
the death or other the Vice-President shall act as President, as in the case of
the President. constitutional disability of
The person having the greatest number of votes as Vice-President, shall be the
the greatest number of votes as Vice-President, shall be the The person having
the The person having the greatest number of votes as Vice-President, shall be
the whole number of Electors Vice-President, if such number be a majority of
the two highest numbers appointed, and if no person have a majority, then from
the list, the Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the on
the Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for the on the list,
the Vice-President; a quorum for the on the list, the Senate shall choose
the on the list, the Senate shall choose the Vice-President; a quorum for
the whole number of Senators, and a purpose shall consist of two-thirds of
the whole number shall be necessary to a choice. But no person majority of
the office of President shall be eligible to constitutionally ineligible to
the United States. that of Vice-President of
the party shall have been duly convicted, shall exist within the United whereof
the United whereof the party shall have been duly convicted, shall exist within
the United States, and subject to the 1. All persons born or naturalized in
the 1. All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject to
the United States and of the State jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of
the State jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the United States and of
the privileges or immunities of citizens of the United States; nor shall any
the United States; nor shall any the privileges or immunities of citizens of
the equal protection of the law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction
the law; nor deny to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of
the several States according to 2. Representatives shall be apportioned among
the whole number of persons in each State, their respective numbers, counting
the right to vote at any election for the excluding Indians not taxed. But when
the excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right to vote at any election for
the United States, choice of electors for President and Vice-President of
the Executive and Judicial officers of a State, or Representatives in Congress,
the members of the Legislature thereof, is denied to any of the male
the Legislature thereof, is denied to any of the male the members of
the male the members of the Legislature thereof, is denied to any of
the inhabitants of such State, being twenty-one years of age, and citizens of
the basis of representation therein shall be reduced in the or other crime,
the or other crime, the basis of representation therein shall be reduced in
the number of such male citizens shall bear to the whole proportion which
the whole proportion which the number of such male citizens shall bear to
the President and Vice-President, or hold any office, civil or military, under
the United States, or as a member of member of Congress, or as an officer of
the Constitution of the United States, shall have engaged in support
the United States, shall have engaged in support the Constitution of
the same, or given aid or comfort to the insurrection or rebellion against
the insurrection or rebellion against the same, or given aid or comfort to
The validity of the public debt of the United States, authorized by law, 4.
the public debt of the United States, authorized by law, 4. The validity of
the United States, authorized by law, 4. The validity of the public debt of
the suppressing insurrection or rebellion, shall not be questioned. But neither
the United States, or any claim for in aid of insurrection or rebellion against
the loss or emancipation of any slave; but all such debts, obligations and
The Congress shall have power to enforce, by appropriate legislation, the 5.
the 5. The Congress shall have power to enforce, by appropriate legislation,
The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or 1.
the United States to vote shall not be denied or 1. The right of citizens of
the United States or by any State on account of race, color, or abridged by
The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2.
The Congress shall have power to lay and collect taxes on incomes, from
the several States, and whatever source derived, without apportionment among
The Senate of the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each
the United States shall be composed of two Senators from each The Senate of
the people thereof, for six years; and each Senator shall State, elected by
The electors in each State shall have the qualifications have one vote.
the qualifications have one vote. The electors in each State shall have
the most numerous branch of the State legislatures. requisite for electors of
the State legislatures. requisite for electors of the most numerous branch of
the representation of any State in the Senate, the When vacancies happen in
the Senate, the When vacancies happen in the representation of any State in
the When vacancies happen in the representation of any State in the Senate,
the legislature of any State may empower the vacancies: Provided, That
the vacancies: Provided, That the legislature of any State may empower
the people fill the executive thereof to make temporary appointments until
the executive thereof to make temporary appointments until the people fill
the legislature may direct. vacancies by election as
the election or term of This amendment shall not be so construed as to affect
the Constitution. any Senator chosen before it becomes valid as part of
the ratification of this article the manufacture, sale, 1. After one year from
the manufacture, sale, 1. After one year from the ratification of this article
the importation thereof into, or transportation of intoxicating liquors within,
the exportation thereof from the United States and all territory subject to or
the United States and all territory subject to or the exportation thereof from
the jurisdiction thereof for beverage purposes is hereby prohibited.
The Congress and the several States shall have concurrent power to enforce 2.
the several States shall have concurrent power to enforce 2. The Congress and
the Constitution by the legislatures of the several States, as amendment to
the legislatures of the several States, as amendment to the Constitution by
the several States, as amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of
the Constitution, within seven years from the date of the provided in
the date of the provided in the Constitution, within seven years from
the provided in the Constitution, within seven years from the date of
the States by the Congress. submission hereof to
the Congress. submission hereof to the States by
The right of citizens of the United States to vote shall not be denied or
the United States to vote shall not be denied or The right of citizens of
the United States or by any State on account of sex. abridged by
The terms of the President and Vice President shall end at noon on the 20th 1.
the President and Vice President shall end at noon on the 20th 1. The terms of
the 20th 1. The terms of the President and Vice President shall end at noon on
the terms of Senators and Representatives at noon on the 3d day of January, and
the 3d day of January, and the terms of Senators and Representatives at noon on
the years in which such terms would have ended if this day of January, of
the terms of their successors shall then article had not been ratified; and
The Congress shall assemble at least once in every year, and such meeting 2.
the 3d day of January, unless they shall by law appoint shall begin at noon on
the time fixed for the beginning of the term of the President, the 3. If, at
the beginning of the term of the President, the 3. If, at the time fixed for
the term of the President, the 3. If, at the time fixed for the beginning of
the President, the 3. If, at the time fixed for the beginning of the term of
the 3. If, at the time fixed for the beginning of the term of the President,
the Vice President elect shall become President elect shall have died,
the time fixed for President. If a President shall not have been chosen before
the beginning of his term, or if the President elect shall have failed to
the President elect shall have failed to the beginning of his term, or if
the Vice President elect shall act as President until a President qualify, then
the Congress may by law provide for the case wherein shall have qualified; and
the case wherein shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for
the manner in which one who is to declaring who shall then act as President, or
The Congress may by law provide for the case of the death of any of the 4.
the case of the death of any of the 4. The Congress may by law provide for
the death of any of the 4. The Congress may by law provide for the case of
the 4. The Congress may by law provide for the case of the death of any of
the House of Representatives may choose a President whenever persons from whom
the right of choice shall have devolved upon them, and for the case of the
the case of the the right of choice shall have devolved upon them, and for
the the right of choice shall have devolved upon them, and for the case of
the persons from whom the Senate may choose a Vice President death of any of
the Senate may choose a Vice President death of any of the persons from whom
the right of choice shall have devolved upon them. whenever
the 15th day of October following the 5. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on
the 5. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect on the 15th day of October following
the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment to
the legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment to the Constitution by
the amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of
the date of its submission. several States within seven years from
The eighteenth article of amendment to the Constitution of the United States 1.
the Constitution of the United States 1. The eighteenth article of amendment to
the United States 1. The eighteenth article of amendment to the Constitution of
The transportation or importation into any State, Territory, or possession 2.
the United States for delivery or use therein of intoxicating liquors, in of
the laws thereof, is hereby prohibited. violation of
The article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 3.
the Constitution by conventions in the several States, as provided amendment to
the several States, as provided amendment to the Constitution by conventions in
the Constitution, within seven years from the date of the submission hereof in
the date of the submission hereof in the Constitution, within seven years from
the submission hereof in the Constitution, within seven years from the date of
the States by the Congress. to
the Congress. to the States by
the office of the President more than twice, 1. No person shall be elected to
the President more than twice, 1. No person shall be elected to the office of
the office of President, or acted as President, for and no person who has held
the office of the President more than once. But this shall be elected to
the President more than once. But this shall be elected to the office of
the office of President, when this Article shall not apply to any person holding
the Congress, and shall not prevent any person who may Article was proposed by
the office of President, or acting as President, during the term be holding
the term be holding the office of President, or acting as President, during
the office of within which this Article becomes operative from holding
the remainder of such term. President or acting as President during
the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment to
the legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment to the Constitution by
the amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of
the date of its submission to the States several States within seven years from
the States several States within seven years from the date of its submission to
the Congress. by
The District constituting the seat of Government of the United States shall 1.
the seat of Government of the United States shall 1. The District constituting
the United States shall 1. The District constituting the seat of Government of
the Congress may direct: A number of electors of appoint in such manner as
the whole number of Senators and President and Vice President equal to
the District would be entitled if it were Representatives in Congress to which
the least populous State; they shall be in a State, but in no event more than
the States, but they shall be considered, for addition to those appointed by
the purposes of the election of President and Vice President, to be electors
the election of President and Vice President, to be electors the purposes of
the District and perform such appointed by a State; and they shall meet in
the twelfth article of amendment. duties as provided by
The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2.
The right of citizens of the United States to vote in any primary or other 1.
the United States to vote in any primary or other 1. The right of citizens of
the United States or any State by reason of failure to denied or abridged by
The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2.
the removal of the President from office or of his death or 1. In case of
the President from office or of his death or 1. In case of the removal of
the Vice President shall become President. resignation,
the office of the Vice President, the 2. Whenever there is a vacancy in
the Vice President, the 2. Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of
the 2. Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of the Vice President,
the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Senate 3. Whenever
the President pro tempore of the Senate 3. Whenever the President transmits to
the Senate 3. Whenever the President transmits to the President pro tempore of
the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration that he and
the House of Representatives his written declaration that he and the Speaker of
the powers and duties of his office, and until he is unable to discharge
the contrary, such powers and duties transmits to them a written declaration to
the Vice President as Acting President. shall be discharged by
the Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers 4. Whenever
the principal officers 4. Whenever the Vice President and a majority of either
the executive departments or of such other body as Congress may by law of
the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of provide, transmit to
the Senate and the Speaker of provide, transmit to the President pro tempore of
the Speaker of provide, transmit to the President pro tempore of the Senate and
the House of Representatives their written declaration that the President is
the President is the House of Representatives their written declaration that
the powers and duties of his office, the Vice President unable to discharge
the Vice President unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office,
the powers and duties of the office as Acting shall immediately assume
the office as Acting shall immediately assume the powers and duties of
the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Thereafter, when
the President pro tempore of the Thereafter, when the President transmits to
the Thereafter, when the President transmits to the President pro tempore of
the Speaker of the House of Representatives his written declaration Senate and
the House of Representatives his written declaration Senate and the Speaker of
the powers and duties of his office that no inability exists, he shall resume
the Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers of unless
the principal officers of unless the Vice President and a majority of either
the executive department or of such other body as Congress may by law provide,
the President pro tempore of the Senate and the transmit within four days to
the Senate and the transmit within four days to the President pro tempore of
the transmit within four days to the President pro tempore of the Senate and
the House of Representatives their written declaration that the Speaker of
the Speaker of the House of Representatives their written declaration that
the powers and duties of his office. Thereupon President is unable to discharge
the issue, assembling within forty eight hours for that Congress shall decide
the Congress, within twenty one days after purpose if not in session. If
the latter written declaration, or, if Congress is not in session, receipt of
the President is unable to discharge the two thirds vote of both Houses that
the two thirds vote of both Houses that the President is unable to discharge
the Vice President shall continue to discharge powers and duties of his office,
the same as Acting President; otherwise, the President shall resume the powers
the President shall resume the powers the same as Acting President; otherwise,
the powers the same as Acting President; otherwise, the President shall resume
The right of citizens of the United States, who are eighteen years of age or 1.
the United States, who are eighteen years of age or 1. The right of citizens of
the United States or by any older, to vote shall not be denied or abridged by
The Congress shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate 2.
the compensation for the services of the Senators and No law, varying
the services of the Senators and No law, varying the compensation for
the Senators and No law, varying the compensation for the services of
their respective Numbers, which may be included within this Union, according to
their Speaker and other Officers; and The House of Representatives shall choose
their other Officers, and also a President pro tempore, The Senate shall choose
their Judgment require publish the same, excepting such Parts as may in
their The Senators and Representatives shall receive a Compensation for
their Attendance at the Session of Peace, be privileged from Arrest during
their respective Houses, and in going to and returning from the same; and for
their Journal, and proceed to reconsider it. If after Objections at large on
their Adjournment in like Manner as if he had signed it, unless the Congress by
their respective Writings Times to Authors and Inventors the exclusive Right to
their respective States, and vote by Ballot for two The Electors shall meet in
their Votes; which Day shall be the same throughout the which they shall give
their respective Offices, and he shall have Power to relating to the Duties of
their next Session. of
their Consideration such Measures as he shall judge Union, and recommend to
their Offices during good Behavior, and shall, at stated Times, receive for
their Services a Compensation which shall not be diminished during their
their their Services a Compensation which shall not be diminished during
their Authority; to all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other shall be made, under
their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort. No Person them, or in adhering to
their persons, houses, papers, and The right of the people to be secure in
their respective states, and vote by ballot for The Electors shall meet in
their ballots the person of the same state with themselves; they shall name in
their jurisdiction. States, or any place subject to
their respective numbers, counting the whole number of persons in each State,
their successors shall then article had not been ratified; and the terms of
their written declaration that the President is the House of Representatives
their written declaration that the Speaker of the House of Representatives
them as may be employed in the Service of the United governing such Part of
them for President; and if no Person have a immediately choose by Ballot one of
them by Ballot the Vice-President.
them to such Time as he Respect to the Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn
them Aid and Comfort. No Person them, or in adhering to their Enemies, giving
them against Invasion; and on Form of Government, and shall protect each of
them a written declaration to the contrary, such powers and duties transmits to
them, shall, without the Consent of holding any Office of Profit or Trust under
them, and in Case of Disagreement between them, with Houses, or either of
them, with Houses, or either of them, and in Case of Disagreement between
them, or in adhering to their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort. No Person
them, before the fourth day of March next following, then shall devolve upon
them, and for the case of the the right of choice shall have devolved upon
them. Emolument from the United States, or any of
them. whenever the right of choice shall have devolved upon
themselves. And they shall make a List of all the Persons voted for, and with
themselves; they shall name in their ballots the person of the same state with
then fill such Vacancies. shall
then be counted. The Person having the greatest Number of Votes Votes shall
then the House of Representatives shall have an equal Number of Votes,
then from the five highest on the List the said House shall in like Majority,
then act as the President and Vice President, declaring what Officer shall
then be counted; Representatives, open all the certificates and the votes shall
then from the persons having appointed; and if no person have such majority,
then shall devolve upon them, before the fourth day of March next following,
then from the two highest numbers appointed, and if no person have a majority,
then article had not been ratified; and the terms of their successors shall
then the Vice President elect shall act as President until a President qualify,
then act as President, or the manner in which one who is to declaring who shall
there be more than one who have such Majority, and Electors appointed; and if
there Number of Votes of the Electors shall be the Vice President. But if
there is a vacancy in the office of the Vice President, the 2. Whenever
Thereafter, when the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the
thereby, any Thing in the Constitution or Judges in every State shall be bound
therein shall be reduced in the or other crime, the basis of representation
therein of intoxicating liquors, in of the United States for delivery or use
therein, escaping into another, shall, in Consequence of any Law or Regulation
thereof shall issue Writs of Election to fill such Vacancies. Authority
thereof may during the Recess of the Legislature of any State, the Executive
thereof may direct, Each State shall appoint, in such Manner as the Legislature
thereof to make temporary appointments until the people fill the executive
thereof into, or transportation of intoxicating liquors within, the importation
thereof from the United States and all territory subject to or the exportation
thereof for beverage purposes is hereby prohibited. the jurisdiction
thereof, for six Years; and each Senator shall State, chosen by the Legislature
thereof, and of foreign Coin, and fix the To coin Money, regulate the Value
thereof, and foreign States, Citizens or Subjects. State, or the Citizens
thereof, No Person held to Service or Labour in one State, under the Laws
thereof, as the one or the other Mode of Ratification may be proposed by the
thereof, are citizens of the United States and of the State jurisdiction
thereof, is denied to any of the male the members of the Legislature
thereof, for six years; and each Senator shall State, elected by the people
thereof, is hereby prohibited. violation of the laws
thereof. Officer
thereof. proved, and the Effect
thereof. But Congress may by a vote of two-thirds of each House, remove enemies
thereof; Representatives, shall be prescribed in each State by the Legislature
thereof; and all Treaties made, or which shall be made, under the Pursuance
thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or prohibiting the free exercise
Thereupon President is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office.
they shall by Law direct. The Number of Years, in such Manner as
they shall be assembled in Consequence of the first Election, Immediately after
they shall be divided as equally as may be into three Classes. The Seats of the
they be equally divided. shall have no Vote, unless
they shall be on Oath or Affirmation. When the President of the that Purpose,
they shall by Law appoint a be on the first Monday in December, unless
They shall in all Cases, except Treason, Felony and Breach of the States.
they shall not be questioned in any other any Speech or Debate in either House,
they shall make a List of all the Persons voted for, and with themselves. And
they shall sign and certify, and of the Number of Votes for each; which List
they shall give their Votes; which Day shall be the same throughout the which
they think may by Law vest the Appointment of such inferior Officers, as
they shall name in their ballots the person of the same state with themselves;
they shall make distinct lists of all persons voted for as Vice-President, and
they shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to votes for each, which lists
they reside. No State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge wherein
they shall by law appoint shall begin at noon on the 3d day of January, unless
they shall be in a State, but in no event more than the least populous State;
they shall be considered, for addition to those appointed by the States, but
they shall meet in the District and perform such appointed by a State; and
Thing but of Marque and Reprisal; coin Money; emit Bills of Credit; make any
Thing in the Constitution or Judges in every State shall be bound thereby, any
things to be seized. persons or
think proper to admit, shall not be prohibited by the Congress prior to shall
think may by Law vest the Appointment of such inferior Officers, as they
think proper; he shall receive Ambassadors and other public Ministers; he shall
third Class at the Expiration of the sixth Year, so that one third may be
third may be third Class at the Expiration of the sixth Year, so that one
thirds of the Members present. convicted without the Concurrence of two
thirds of that House shall agree to pass the Bill, it such Reconsideration two
thirds of that House, it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by two
thirds of the Senate and House of Representatives, according be repassed by two
thirds of the Senators present concur; and he shall Treaties, provided two
thirds of both Houses shall deem it necessary, shall The Congress, whenever two
thirds of the several States, shall call a Convention for Legislatures of two
thirds vote of both Houses that the President is unable to discharge the two
thirty Thousand, but each State Representatives shall not exceed one for every
thirty No person shall be a Senator who shall not have attained to the Age of
thirty-five Years, and been fourteen Years a have attained to the Age of
this Constitution for the ourselves and our Posterity, do ordain and establish
this Union, according to their respective Numbers, which may be included within
this Execution the foregoing Powers, and all other Powers vested by
this Purpose shall consist of a Member or Members from two-thirds of the for
this Constitution, shall be eligible to the Office the time of the Adoption of
this Constitution, the Laws of the United States, and Treaties made, or which
this Union; but no new States New States may be admitted by the Congress into
this Constitution shall be so construed as to Prejudice States; and nothing in
this Union a Republican The United States shall guarantee to every State in
this Constitution, or, on the Application of the propose Amendments to
this Constitution, when ratified by the Legislatures of Purposes, as part of
this All Debts contracted and Engagements entered into, before the Adoption of
this Constitution, shall be as valid against the United States under
This Constitution, and the Laws of the United States which shall be made in
this Constitution; but no religious Test shall ever be Affirmation, to support
this Constitution between the States so ratifying the Same. Establishment of
this states, the representation from each state having one vote; a quorum for
this article by appropriate 2. Congress shall have power to enforce
this article. provisions of
this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce
This amendment shall not be so construed as to affect the election or term of
this article the manufacture, sale, 1. After one year from the ratification of
this article by appropriate legislation.
This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 3.
this article by appropriate legislation. Congress shall have power to enforce
this day of January, of the years in which such terms would have ended if
this article. ratification of
This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 6.
this shall be elected to the office of the President more than once. But
this Article shall not apply to any person holding the office of President, when
this Article becomes operative from holding the office of within which
This article shall be inoperative unless it shall have been ratified as an 2.
this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce
this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce
this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power to enforce
Thomas Mifflin, Robert Morris, George Clymer, Pennsylvania - Benjamin Franklin,
Thomas Fitzsimons, Jared Ingersoll, James Wilson, Gouvernour Morris
Thomas Jenifer, Daniel Carroll Maryland - James McHenry, Daniel of St
those bound to Service for a Term of Years, and excluding Indians not including
those Present, be entered on the Journal. shall, at the Desire of one fifth of
those of another: nor shall Vessels bound to, or from, Ports of one State over
those in which a State shall be Party, the supreme Court shall have original
those voted for as the highest numbers not exceeding three on the list of
those appointed by the States, but they shall be considered, for addition to
thousand eight hundred and eight, but a tax or duty may be imposed the Year one
thousand eight hundred and eight shall in any Manner affect the first and
thousand seven hundred Seventeenth Day of September in the Year of our Lord one
Thousand, but each State Representatives shall not exceed one for every thirty
three fifths of all other Persons. taxed,
three Years after the first Meeting The actual Enumeration shall be made within
three Classes. The Seats of the they shall be divided as equally as may be into
three days, nor to any other Place than that the other, adjourn for more than
three fourths of the several States, or by Conventions in three fourths
three fourths three fourths of the several States, or by Conventions in
three on the list of those voted for as the highest numbers not exceeding
three, made, the State of New Hampshire shall be entitled to choose
three-fourths of the amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of
three-fourths of the amendment to the Constitution by the legislatures of
three. six, Virginia ten, North Carolina five, South Carolina five and Georgia
throughout the United States; uniform
throughout the United States; of Bankruptcies
throughout the which they shall give their Votes; which Day shall be the same
time by Law make or alter such Regulations, except but the Congress may at any
time to time Each House shall keep a Journal of its Proceedings, and from
time Each House shall keep a Journal of its Proceedings, and from time to
Time for which he was elected, No Senator or Representative shall, during the
time to time. Expenditures of all public Money shall be published from
time of Peace, enter into any Agreement or Compact Troops, or Ships of War in
Time of choosing the Electors, and the Day on The Congress may determine the
time of the Adoption of this Constitution, shall be eligible to the Office the
time to time give to the Congress Information of the State of the He shall from
time give to the Congress Information of the State of the He shall from time to
Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn them to such Time as he Respect to the
Time as he Respect to the Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn them to such
time to time ordain and and in such inferior Courts as the Congress may from
time ordain and and in such inferior Courts as the Congress may from time to
time of peace be quartered in any house, without the No Soldier shall, in
time of war, but in a manner to be prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor in
time in the land or naval forces, or in the Militia, when in actual service in
time fixed for the beginning of the term of the President, the 3. If, at the
time fixed for President. If a President shall not have been chosen before the
time. Expenditures of all public Money shall be published from time to
time; and no Person holding any Office under the United States, during such
Times to Authors and Inventors the exclusive Right to their respective Writings
Times, Places and Manner of holding Elections for Senators and The
Times, receive for his Services, a Compensation, The President shall, at stated
Times, receive for their Offices during good Behavior, and shall, at stated
Title of Nobility shall be granted by the United States: And no Person No
Title of Nobility.
Title, of any kind the Congress, accept of any present, Emolument, Office, or
to form a more perfect Union, We the People of the United States, in Order
to defence, promote the general Welfare, and secure the Blessings of Liberty
to the Age of No Person shall be a Representative who shall not have attained
to their respective Numbers, which may be included within this Union, according
to the whole Number of free Persons, which shall be determined by adding
to Service for a Term of Years, and excluding Indians not including those bound
to choose three, made, the State of New Hampshire shall be entitled
to fill such Vacancies. Authority thereof shall issue Writs of Election
to the Age of thirty No person shall be a Senator who shall not have attained
to try all Impeachments. When sitting for The Senate shall have the sole Power
to removal from Judgment in Cases of Impeachment shall not extend further than
to hold and enjoy any Office of honor, Trust or Office, and disqualification
to Indictment, Trial, Judgment and Punishment, according to liable and subject
to liable and subject to Indictment, Trial, Judgment and Punishment, according
to the Place of Choosing Senators. as
to do its own Members, and a Majority of each shall constitute a Quorum
to day, and may be Business; but a smaller number may adjourn from day
to compel the Attendance of absent Members, in such Manner, and authorized
to time Each House shall keep a Journal of its Proceedings, and from time
to any other Place than that the other, adjourn for more than three days, nor
to be ascertained by Law, and paid out of the Treasury of the United Services,
to and returning from the same; and for their respective Houses, and in going
to any civil Office under the Authority of the United States which be appointed
to the President of the United shall, before it become a Law, be presented
to that House in which it shall have originated, who shall enter the Objections
to reconsider it. If after Objections at large on their Journal, and proceed
to pass the Bill, it such Reconsideration two thirds of that House shall agree
to the other House, by which it shall be sent, together with the Objections,
to him, the Same shall be a Law, excepted) after it shall have been presented
to which the Concurrence of the Senate and Every Order, Resolution, or Vote
to the President of the United States; and before the Same shall be presented
to the Rules and Limitations prescribed in the Case of a Bill.
To lay and collect Taxes, Duties, Imposts and The Congress shall have Power
to pay the Debts and provide for the common Defence and general Excises,
To borrow money on the credit of the United States;
To regulate Commerce with foreign Nations, and among the several States, and
To establish an uniform Rule of Naturalization, and uniform Laws on the subject
To coin Money, regulate the Value thereof, and of foreign Coin, and fix the
To provide for the Punishment of counterfeiting the Securities and current Coin
To establish Post Offices and Post Roads;
To promote the Progress of Science and useful Arts, by securing for limited
to Authors and Inventors the exclusive Right to their respective Writings Times
to their respective Writings Times to Authors and Inventors the exclusive Right
To constitute Tribunals inferior to the supreme Court;
to the supreme Court; To constitute Tribunals inferior
To define and punish Piracies and Felonies committed on the high Seas, and
To declare War, grant Letters of Marque and Reprisal, and make Rules concerning
To raise and support Armies, but no Appropriation of Money to that Use shall be
to that Use shall be To raise and support Armies, but no Appropriation of Money
To provide and maintain a Navy;
To make Rules for the Government and Regulation of the land and naval Forces;
To provide for calling forth the Militia to execute the Laws of the Union,
to execute the Laws of the Union, To provide for calling forth the Militia
To provide for organizing, arming, and disciplining, the Militia, and for
to the States respectively, the Appointment of the Officers, States, reserving
to the discipline and the Authority of training the Militia according
To exercise exclusive Legislation in all Cases whatsoever, over such District
to exercise like Authority over all Places purchased by the Consent States, and
To make all Laws which shall be necessary and proper for carrying into
to admit, shall not be prohibited by the Congress prior to shall think proper
to shall think proper to admit, shall not be prohibited by the Congress prior
to the No capitation, or other direct, Tax shall be laid, unless in Proportion
to be taken. Census or Enumeration herein before directed
to the No Preference shall be given by any Regulation of Commerce or Revenue
to enter, clear, or pay Duties in another. one State, be obliged
to time. Expenditures of all public Money shall be published from time
to the Revision and Control United States; and all such Laws shall be subject
to the whole Number of Senators and Representatives a Number of Electors, equal
to which the State may be entitled in the Congress: but no Senator or
to the Seat of the Government of the United States, directed to transmit sealed
to transmit sealed to the Seat of the Government of the United States, directed
to a Choice. In States, and a Majority of all the States shall be necessary
to the Office the time of the Adoption of this Constitution, shall be eligible
to that Office who shall not of President; neither shall any Person be eligible
to the Age of thirty-five Years, and been fourteen Years a have attained
to discharge the Powers and Duties of the said Resignation, or Inability
to the best of my Ability, preserve, President of the United States, and will
to the Duties of their respective Offices, and he shall have Power to relating
to relating to the Duties of their respective Offices, and he shall have Power
to make He shall have Power, by and with the Advice and Consent of the Senate,
to fill up all Vacancies that may happen during The President shall have Power
to time give to the Congress Information of the State of the He shall from time
to the Congress Information of the State of the He shall from time to time give
to their Consideration such Measures as he shall judge Union, and recommend
to the Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn them to such Time as he Respect
to such Time as he Respect to the Time of Adjournment, he may adjourn them
to time ordain and and in such inferior Courts as the Congress may from time
to all Cases, in Law and Equity, arising under The judicial Power shall extend
to all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other shall be made, under their Authority;
to all Cases of admiralty and maritime public Ministers and Consuls;
to Controversies to which the United States shall be a Party; to Jurisdiction;
to which the United States shall be a Party; to Jurisdiction; to Controversies
to Jurisdiction; to Controversies to which the United States shall be a Party;
to Law and Fact, with such Exceptions, and have appellate Jurisdiction, both as
to their Enemies, giving them Aid and Comfort. No Person them, or in adhering
to the shall be convicted of Treason unless on the Testimony of two Witnesses
to declare the Punishment of Treason, but no The Congress shall have power
to the public Acts, Records, Full Faith and Credit shall be given in each State
to all Privileges and Immunities The Citizens of each State shall be entitled
to be executive Authority of the State from which he fled, be delivered up,
to the State having Jurisdiction of the Crime. removed
to Service or Labour in one State, under the Laws thereof, No Person held
to whom such Service or Labour may be due. of the Party
to dispose of and make all needful Rules and The Congress shall have Power
to the United Regulations respecting the Territory or other Property belonging
to Prejudice States; and nothing in this Constitution shall be so construed as
to every State in this Union a Republican The United States shall guarantee
to this Constitution, or, on the Application of the propose Amendments
to all Intents and proposing Amendments, which, in either Case, shall be valid
to the Year One Congress; Provided that no Amendment which may be made prior
to the Contrary notwithstanding. Laws of any State
to support this Constitution; but no religious Test shall ever be Affirmation,
to any Office or public Trust under the United required as a Qualification
to assemble, and to petition of the press; or the right of the people peaceably
to petition of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and
to the security of a free State, the A well regulated Militia, being necessary
to keep and bear Arms, shall not be infringed. right of the people
to be prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor in time of war, but in a manner
to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and The right of the people
to be searched, and the affirmation, and particularly describing the place
to be seized. persons or things
to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, No person shall be held
to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any
to be a witness against himself, nor be deprived of life, criminal case
to a speedy and In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall enjoy the right
to be informed of the nature and cause of the ascertained by law, and
to be confronted with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory accusation;
to have compulsory accusation; to be confronted with the witnesses against him;
to have the Assistance of process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and
to the rules of the common law. according
to deny or disparage others retained by the people.
to the United States by the Constitution, nor The powers not delegated
to the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to prohibited by it
to the States respectively, or to prohibited by it to the States, are reserved
to prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or
to extend to any The Judicial power of the United States shall not be construed
to any The Judicial power of the United States shall not be construed to extend
to votes for each, which lists they shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed
to the President of the seat of the government of the United States, directed
to a choice. And if the House a majority of all the states shall be necessary
to a choice. But no person majority of the whole number shall be necessary
to the office of President shall be eligible to constitutionally ineligible
to constitutionally ineligible to the office of President shall be eligible
to their jurisdiction. States, or any place subject
to enforce this article by appropriate 2. Congress shall have power
to the 1. All persons born or naturalized in the United States, and subject
to any person within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the law; nor deny
to 2. Representatives shall be apportioned among the several States according
to vote at any election for the excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right
to any of the male the members of the Legislature thereof, is denied
to the whole proportion which the number of such male citizens shall bear
to any State legislature, or as an executive or judicial officer of any State,
to the insurrection or rebellion against the same, or given aid or comfort
to enforce, by appropriate legislation, the 5. The Congress shall have power
to vote shall not be denied or 1. The right of citizens of the United States
to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power
to lay and collect taxes on incomes, from The Congress shall have power
to any census or enumeration. without regard
to fill such executive authority of such State shall issue writs of election
to make temporary appointments until the people fill the executive thereof
to affect the election or term of This amendment shall not be so construed as
to or the exportation thereof from the United States and all territory subject
to enforce 2. The Congress and the several States shall have concurrent power
to the Constitution by the legislatures of the several States, as amendment
to the States by the Congress. submission hereof
to vote shall not be denied or The right of citizens of the United States
to enforce this article by appropriate legislation. Congress shall have power
to the beginning of his term, or if the President elect shall have failed
to declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in which one who is
to the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment
to the Constitution of the United States 1. The eighteenth article of amendment
to the Constitution by conventions in the several States, as provided amendment
to the States by the Congress.
to the office of the President more than twice, 1. No person shall be elected
to which some other person was elected President more than two years of a term
to the office of the President more than once. But this shall be elected
to any person holding the office of President, when this Article shall not apply
to the Constitution by the legislatures of three-fourths of the amendment
to the States several States within seven years from the date of its submission
to the whole number of Senators and President and Vice President equal
to which the District would be entitled if it were Representatives in Congress
to those appointed by the States, but they shall be considered, for addition
to be electors the purposes of the election of President and Vice President,
to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power
to vote in any primary or other 1. The right of citizens of the United States
to denied or abridged by the United States or any State by reason of failure
to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power
to the President pro tempore of the Senate 3. Whenever the President transmits
to discharge the powers and duties of his office, and until he is unable
to them a written declaration to the contrary, such powers and duties transmits
to the contrary, such powers and duties transmits to them a written declaration
to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of provide, transmit
to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Vice President unable
to the President pro tempore of the Thereafter, when the President transmits
to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the transmit within four days
to discharge the powers and duties of his office. Thereupon President is unable
to assemble, determines by within twenty one days after Congress is required
to discharge the two thirds vote of both Houses that the President is unable
to discharge powers and duties of his office, the Vice President shall continue
to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any older,
to enforce this article by appropriate 2. The Congress shall have power
to, or from, Ports of one State over those of another: nor shall Vessels bound
together with the Objections, to the other House, by which it shall be sent,
together America. He shall hold his Office during the Term of four Years, and,
Tonnage, keep No State shall, without the Consent of Congress, lay any duty of
training the Militia according to the discipline and the Authority of
Tranquility, provide for the common establish Justice, insure domestic
transmit sealed to the Seat of the Government of the United States, directed to
transmit sealed to votes for each, which lists they shall sign and certify, and
transmit to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of provide,
transmit within four days to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the
transmits to the President pro tempore of the Senate 3. Whenever the President
transmits to them a written declaration to the contrary, such powers and duties
transmits to the President pro tempore of the Thereafter, when the President
transportation of intoxicating liquors within, the importation thereof into, or
transportation or importation into any State, Territory, or possession 2. The
Treason against the United States, shall consist only in levying War against
Treason unless on the Testimony of two Witnesses to the shall be convicted of
Treason shall work Corruption of Blood, or Forfeiture except Attainder of
Treason, Felony and Breach of the States. They shall in all Cases, except
Treason, shall be removed from Office on Impeachment for, and Conviction of,
Treason, but no The Congress shall have power to declare the Punishment of
Treason, Felony, or other Crime, who shall A Person charged in any State with
Treasury of the United Services, to be ascertained by Law, and paid out of the
Treasury of the any State on Imports or Exports, shall be for the Use of the
Treasury, but in Consequence of Appropriations No Money shall be drawn from the
Treaties made, or which this Constitution, the Laws of the United States, and
Treaties made, or which shall be made, under the Pursuance thereof; and all
Treaties, provided two thirds of the Senators present concur; and he shall
Treaty, Alliance, or Confederation; grant Letters No State shall enter into any
Trial of all Crimes, except in Cases of Impeachment, shall be by Jury; and The
Trial shall be held in the State where the said Crimes shall have been such
Trial shall be at such committed; but when not committed within any State, the
trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact tried by a dollars, the right of
Trial, Judgment and Punishment, according to liable and subject to Indictment,
trial, by an impartial jury of the State and district wherein the crime public
Tribes; with the Indian
Tribunals inferior to the supreme Court; To constitute
tried by a dollars, the right of trial by jury shall be preserved, and no fact
tried, the Chief Justice shall preside: And no Person shall be United States is
Troops, or Ships of War in time of Peace, enter into any Agreement or Compact
Trust or Office, and disqualification to hold and enjoy any Office of honor,
Trust under them, shall, without the Consent of holding any Office of Profit or
Trust or Profit under the United Representative, or Person holding an Office of
Trust under the United required as a Qualification to any Office or public
try all Impeachments. When sitting for The Senate shall have the sole Power to
twelfth article of amendment. duties as provided by the
Twelfth. In Witness whereof We have hereunto subscribed our Names.
twenty five Years, and been seven Years a Citizen of the United States, and who
twenty In Suits at common law, where the value in controversy shall exceed
twenty one days after purpose if not in session. If the Congress, within
twenty one days after Congress is required to assemble, determines by within
twenty-one years of age, and citizens of the inhabitants of such State, being
twenty-one years of age in such State. number of male citizens
twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any to be
twice, 1. No person shall be elected to the office of the President more than
two Senators from each The Senate of the United States shall be composed of
two thirds of the Members present. convicted without the Concurrence of
two Houses shall be sitting. in which the
two thirds of that House shall agree to pass the Bill, it such Reconsideration
two thirds of that House, it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if approved by
two thirds of the Senate and House of Representatives, according be repassed by
two Years; for a longer Term than
two The Electors shall meet in their respective States, and vote by Ballot for
two or more who have equal Votes, the Senate shall choose from should remain
two thirds of the Senators present concur; and he shall Treaties, provided
two or more States; between a State and Citizens of Controversies between
two Witnesses to the shall be convicted of Treason unless on the Testimony of
two or more States, or parts of States, State be formed by the Junction of
two thirds of both Houses shall deem it necessary, shall The Congress, whenever
two thirds of the several States, shall call a Convention for Legislatures of
two highest numbers appointed, and if no person have a majority, then from the
two Senators from each The Senate of the United States shall be composed of
two years of a term to which some other person was elected President more than
two thirds vote of both Houses that the President is unable to discharge the
two-thirds of the for this Purpose shall consist of a Member or Members from
two-thirds of the states, and purpose shall consist of a member or members from
two-thirds of the whole number of Senators, and a purpose shall consist of
two-thirds of each House, remove enemies thereof. But Congress may by a vote of
two-thirds, expel a Member. disorderly Behavior, and, with the Concurrence of
unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, and until he is
unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the Vice President
unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office. Thereupon President is
unable to discharge the two thirds vote of both Houses that the President is
Unanimous Consent of the States present the Done in Convention by the
under the United States: but the Party convicted shall nevertheless be Profit
under such Penalties as each House may provide.
under the Authority of the United States which be appointed to any civil Office
under the United States, during such time; and no Person holding any Office
under them, shall, without the Consent of holding any Office of Profit or Trust
under the United Representative, or Person holding an Office of Trust or Profit
under The judicial Power shall extend to all Cases, in Law and Equity, arising
under their Authority; to all Cases affecting Ambassadors, other shall be made,
under Grants of different States, and between a same State claiming Lands
under such Regulations as the Congress shall make.
under the Laws thereof, No Person held to Service or Labour in one State,
under this Constitution, shall be as valid against the United States
under the Confederation. Constitution, as
under the Pursuance thereof; and all Treaties made, or which shall be made,
under the United required as a Qualification to any Office or public Trust
under the President and Vice-President, or hold any office, civil or military,
under any State, who, having previously taken an oath, as a United States, or
uniform throughout the United States;
uniform Rule of Naturalization, and uniform Laws on the subject To establish an
uniform Laws on the subject To establish an uniform Rule of Naturalization, and
Union a Republican The United States shall guarantee to every State in this
Union, We the People of the United States, in Order to form a more perfect
Union, according to their respective Numbers, which may be included within this
Union, To provide for calling forth the Militia to execute the Laws of the
Union, and recommend to their Consideration such Measures as he shall judge
Union; but no new States New States may be admitted by the Congress into this
United States, in Order to form a more perfect Union, We the People of the
United States of America.
United States, which shall consist of a Senate and House of Representatives.
United States, and who twenty five Years, and been seven Years a Citizen of the
United States, and within every subsequent Term of ten of the Congress of the
United States shall be composed of two Senators from each The Senate of the
United States, and who shall not, Years, and been nine Years a Citizen of the
United States shall be President of the Senate, but The Vice President of the
United States. President of the
United States is tried, the Chief Justice shall preside: And no Person shall be
United States: but the Party convicted shall nevertheless be Profit under the
United Services, to be ascertained by Law, and paid out of the Treasury of the
United States which be appointed to any civil Office under the Authority of the
United States, during such time; and no Person holding any Office under the
United shall, before it become a Law, be presented to the President of the
United States; and before the Same shall be presented to the President of the
United States; but all Duties, Imposts and Excises shall be Welfare of the
United States; uniform throughout the
United States; To borrow money on the credit of the
United States; of Bankruptcies throughout the
United States; of the
United governing such Part of them as may be employed in the Service of the
United the acceptance of Congress, become the Seat of the Government of the
United States, or in any Department or Constitution in the Government of the
United States: And no Person No Title of Nobility shall be granted by the
United States; and all such Laws shall be subject to the Revision and Control
United States of The executive Power shall be vested in a President of the
United Representative, or Person holding an Office of Trust or Profit under the
United States, directed to transmit sealed to the Seat of the Government of the
United States.
United States, at No person except a natural born Citizen, or a Citizen of the
United States. Resident within the
United States, or any of them. Emolument from the
United States, and will to the best of my Ability, preserve, President of the
United States." protect and defend the Constitution of the
United The President shall be Commander in Chief of the Army and Navy of the
United States; he may require the Opinion, in writing, of the Service of the
United States, except in Grant Reprieves and Pardons for Offenses against the
United States, whose Appointments are not herein and all other Officers of the
United States. the Officers of the
United States, The President, Vice President and all civil Officers of the
United States, shall be vested in one supreme Court, The judicial Power of the
United States, and Treaties made, or which this Constitution, the Laws of the
United States shall be a Party; to Jurisdiction; to Controversies to which the
United States, shall consist only in levying War against Treason against the
United Regulations respecting the Territory or other Property belonging to the
United States, or of any particular State. any Claims of the
United States shall guarantee to every State in this Union a Republican The
United States under this Constitution, shall be as valid against the
United States which shall be made in This Constitution, and the Laws of the
United States, shall be the supreme Law of the Land; and the Authority of the
United States and of the several States, shall be bound by Oath or the
United required as a Qualification to any Office or public Trust under the
United States of America the and Eighty seven and of the Independence of the
United States, than jury, shall be otherwise re-examined in any Court of the
United States by the Constitution, nor The powers not delegated to the
United States shall not be construed to extend to any The Judicial power of the
United States suit in law or equity, commenced or prosecuted against one of the
United States, directed to the President of the seat of the government of the
United States. that of Vice-President of the
United whereof the party shall have been duly convicted, shall exist within the
United States, and subject to the 1. All persons born or naturalized in the
United States and of the State jurisdiction thereof, are citizens of the
United States; nor shall any the privileges or immunities of citizens of the
United States, choice of electors for President and Vice-President of the
United States, or in any way abridged, except for participation in rebellion,
United States, or under any State, who, having previously taken an oath, as a
United States, or as a member of member of Congress, or as an officer of the
United States, shall have engaged in support the Constitution of the
United States, authorized by law, 4. The validity of the public debt of the
United States nor any State shall assume or pay any debt or obligation incurred
United States, or any claim for in aid of insurrection or rebellion against the
United States to vote shall not be denied or 1. The right of citizens of the
United States or by any State on account of race, color, or abridged by the
United States shall be composed of two Senators from each The Senate of the
United States and all territory subject to or the exportation thereof from the
United States to vote shall not be denied or The right of citizens of the
United States or by any State on account of sex. abridged by the
United States 1. The eighteenth article of amendment to the Constitution of the
United States for delivery or use therein of intoxicating liquors, in of the
United States shall 1. The District constituting the seat of Government of the
United States to vote in any primary or other 1. The right of citizens of the
United States or any State by reason of failure to denied or abridged by the
United States, who are eighteen years of age or 1. The right of citizens of the
United States or by any older, to vote shall not be denied or abridged by the
unless they be equally divided. shall have no Vote,
unless they shall by Law appoint a be on the first Monday in December,
unless the Congress by their Adjournment in like Manner as if he had signed it,
unless when The privilege of the Writ of Habeas Corpus shall not be suspended,
unless in Proportion to the No capitation, or other direct, Tax shall be laid,
unless actually with another State, or with a foreign Power, or engage in War,
unless on the Testimony of two Witnesses to the shall be convicted of Treason
unless on a presentment or indictment of a Grand Jury, except in cases arising
unless it shall have been ratified as an 3. This article shall be inoperative
unless they shall by law appoint shall begin at noon on the 3d day of January,
unless it shall have been ratified as an 6. This article shall be inoperative
unless it shall have been ratified as an 3. The article shall be inoperative
unless it shall have been ratified as an 2. This article shall be inoperative
unless the Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers of
unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and effects, against
until such enumeration shall be shall have at Least one Representative; and
until the next Meeting of the Legislature, which make temporary Appointments
until the Disability be President, and such Officer shall act accordingly,
until the people fill the executive thereof to make temporary appointments
until a President qualify, then the Vice President elect shall act as President
until a President act shall be selected, and such person shall act accordingly
until he is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, and
until an election of Representatives shall Representatives, shall take effect,
unusual punishments inflicted. and
up all Vacancies that may happen during The President shall have Power to fill
up on Claim be discharged from such Service or Labour, But shall be delivered
up, to be executive Authority of the State from which he fled, be delivered
upon any subject principal Officer in each of the executive Departments,
upon probable cause, supported by Oath or no Warrants shall issue, but
upon them, before the fourth day of March next following, then shall devolve
upon them, and for the case of the the right of choice shall have devolved
upon them. whenever the right of choice shall have devolved
upon President shall nominate a Vice President who shall take office
Use shall be To raise and support Armies, but no Appropriation of Money to that
Use of the Treasury of the any State on Imports or Exports, shall be for the
use therein of intoxicating liquors, in of the United States for delivery or
use, without just compensation. taken for public
useful Arts, by securing for limited To promote the Progress of Science and
vacancies happen in the Representation from any State, the Executive When
Vacancies happen by Resignation, or otherwise, chosen every second Year; and if
Vacancies that may happen during The President shall have Power to fill up all
vacancies happen in the representation of any State in the Senate, the When
vacancies by election as the legislature may direct.
Vacancies. Authority thereof shall issue Writs of Election to fill such
Vacancies. shall then fill such
vacancies: Provided, That the legislature of any State may empower the
vacancy in the office of the Vice President, the 2. Whenever there is a
vacated at the Expiration of the second Senators of the first Class shall be
valid to all Intents and proposing Amendments, which, in either Case, shall be
valid against the United States under this Constitution, shall be as
valid as part of the Constitution. any Senator chosen before it becomes
validity of the public debt of the United States, authorized by law, 4. The
Value thereof, and of foreign Coin, and fix the To coin Money, regulate the
value in controversy shall exceed twenty In Suits at common law, where the
varying the compensation for the services of the Senators and No law,
Vessels bound to, or from, Ports of one State over those of another: nor shall
vest the Appointment of such inferior Officers, as they think may by Law
vested in a Congress of the All legislative Powers herein granted shall be
vested by this Execution the foregoing Powers, and all other Powers
vested in a President of the United States of The executive Power shall be
vested in one supreme Court, The judicial Power of the United States, shall be
Vice President of the United States shall be President of the Senate, but The
Vice President, or when he shall exercise the Office of in the absence of the
Vice President. But if there Number of Votes of the Electors shall be the
Vice President, and the Congress may by Office, the same shall devolve on the
Vice President, declaring what Officer shall then act as the President and
Vice President and all civil Officers of the United States, The President,
Vice President shall end at noon on the 20th 1. The terms of the President and
Vice President elect shall become President elect shall have died, the
Vice President elect shall act as President until a President qualify, then the
Vice President elect shall have qualified, neither a President elect nor a
Vice President shall have qualified. or
Vice President death of any of the persons from whom the Senate may choose a
Vice President equal to the whole number of Senators and President and
Vice President, to be electors the purposes of the election of President and
Vice President, for electors for President or election for President or
Vice President, or for Senator or Representative in Congress, shall not be
Vice President shall become President. resignation, the
Vice President, the 2. Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of the
Vice President who shall take office upon President shall nominate a
Vice President as Acting President. shall be discharged by the
Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers 4. Whenever the
Vice President unable to discharge the powers and duties of his office, the
Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers of unless the
Vice President shall continue to discharge powers and duties of his office, the
Vice-President chosen for the same Term, be elected, as follows: with the
Vice-President and of the number of President, and of all persons voted for as
Vice-President shall act as President, as in the case of the death or other the
Vice-President of the United States. that of
Vice-President of the United States, choice of electors for President and
Vice-President, one of whom, at least, shall not be an inhabitant President and
Vice-President, and they shall make distinct lists of all persons voted for as
Vice-President, shall be the The person having the greatest number of votes as
Vice-President, if such number be a majority of the whole number of Electors
Vice-President, or hold any office, civil or military, under the President and
Vice-President. them by Ballot the
Vice-President; a quorum for the on the list, the Senate shall choose the
violated, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be
violation of the laws thereof, is hereby prohibited.
Violence. cannot be convened) against domestic
Virginia ten, North Carolina five, South Carolina five and Georgia three. six,
Virginia George Washington - President and deputy from
Virginia - John Blair, James Madison Jr.
void. claims shall be held illegal and
Vote to which the Concurrence of the Senate and Every Order, Resolution, or
vote by Ballot for two The Electors shall meet in their respective States, and
vote by ballot for The Electors shall meet in their respective states, and
vote at any election for the excluding Indians not taxed. But when the right to
vote of two-thirds of each House, remove enemies thereof. But Congress may by a
vote shall not be denied or 1. The right of citizens of the United States to
vote shall not be denied or The right of citizens of the United States to
vote in any primary or other 1. The right of citizens of the United States to
vote of both Houses of Congress. confirmation by a majority
vote of both Houses that the President is unable to discharge the two thirds
vote shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or by any older, to
Vote, unless they be equally divided. shall have no
Vote. have one
vote. The electors in each State shall have the qualifications have one
Vote; a quorum taken by States, the Representation from each State having one
vote; a quorum for this states, the representation from each state having one
voted for, and with themselves. And they shall make a List of all the Persons
voted for as President, and in distinct ballots the person voted for as
voted for as voted for as President, and in distinct ballots the person
voted for as Vice-President, and they shall make distinct lists of all persons
voted for as Vice-President and of the number of President, and of all persons
voted for as the highest numbers not exceeding three on the list of those
Votes of both Houses shall be shall become a Law. But in all such Cases the
Votes for each; which List they shall sign and certify, and of the Number of
Votes shall then be counted. The Person having the greatest Number of Votes
Votes Votes shall then be counted. The Person having the greatest Number of
Votes shall be Manner choose the President. But in choosing the President, the
Votes of the Electors shall be the Vice President. But if there Number of
votes for each, which lists they shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to
votes shall then be counted; Representatives, open all the certificates and the
votes for President, shall be the The person having the greatest Number of
votes shall be taken by the President. But in choosing the President, the
votes as Vice-President, shall be the The person having the greatest number of
Votes, then the House of Representatives shall have an equal Number of
Votes, the Senate shall choose from should remain two or more who have equal
Votes; which Day shall be the same throughout the which they shall give their
voting for and determined by Yeas and Nays, and the Names of the Persons
War in time of Peace, enter into any Agreement or Compact Troops, or Ships of
War against Treason against the United States, shall consist only in levying
War or public danger; nor shall any person be subject for the same offense of
War, grant Letters of Marque and Reprisal, and make Rules concerning To declare
War, unless actually with another State, or with a foreign Power, or engage in
war, but in a manner to be prescribed by consent of the Owner, nor in time of
Warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or no
was elected, No Senator or Representative shall, during the Time for which he
was elected President more than two years of a term to which some other person
was proposed by the Congress, and shall not prevent any person who may Article
Washington - President and deputy from Virginia George
Water; Captures on Land and
way abridged, except for participation in rebellion, United States, or in any
We the People of the United States, in Order to form a more perfect Union,
We have hereunto subscribed our Names. Twelfth. In Witness whereof
Weights and Measures; Standard of
Welfare of the United States; but all Duties, Imposts and Excises shall be
Welfare, and secure the Blessings of Liberty to defence, promote the general
well as of without the Consent of the Legislatures of the States concerned as
well regulated Militia, being necessary to the security of a free State, the A
were Representatives in Congress to which the District would be entitled if it
what may be absolutely necessary for executing on Imports or Exports, except
what Officer shall then act as the President and Vice President, declaring
whatever source derived, without apportionment among the several States, and
whatever, from any King, Prince or foreign State.
whatsoever, over such District To exercise exclusive Legislation in all Cases
when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State in which he shall be shall not,
When vacancies happen in the Representation from any State, the Executive
when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State for which he shall be chosen.
when he shall exercise the Office of in the absence of the Vice President, or
When sitting for The Senate shall have the sole Power to try all Impeachments.
When the President of the that Purpose, they shall be on Oath or Affirmation.
when The privilege of the Writ of Habeas Corpus shall not be suspended, unless
when called into the actual States, and of the Militia of the several States,
when not committed within any State, the Trial shall be at such committed; but
when ratified by the Legislatures of Purposes, as part of this Constitution,
when in actual service in time in the land or naval forces, or in the Militia,
when the right to vote at any election for the excluding Indians not taxed. But
When vacancies happen in the representation of any State in the Senate, the
when this Article shall not apply to any person holding the office of President,
when the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Thereafter,
whenever two thirds of both Houses shall deem it necessary, shall The Congress,
whenever the right of choice of Representatives shall not choose a President
whenever persons from whom the House of Representatives may choose a President
whenever the right of choice shall have devolved upon them.
Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of the Vice President, the 2.
Whenever the President transmits to the President pro tempore of the Senate 3.
Whenever the Vice President and a majority of either the principal officers 4.
where the said Crimes shall have been such Trial shall be held in the State
where the value in controversy shall exceed twenty In Suits at common law,
wherein the crime public trial, by an impartial jury of the State and district
wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any law which shall abridge
wherein shall have qualified; and the Congress may by law provide for the case
whereof shall have been increased shall have been created, or the Emoluments
whereof We have hereunto subscribed our Names. Twelfth. In Witness
whereof the party shall have been duly convicted, shall exist within the United
which shall consist of a Senate and House of Representatives. United States,
which he shall be shall not, when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State in
which may be included within this Union, according to their respective Numbers,
which shall be determined by adding to the whole Number of free Persons,
which make temporary Appointments until the next Meeting of the Legislature,
which he shall be chosen. when elected, be an Inhabitant of that State for
which the two Houses shall be sitting. in
which he was elected, No Senator or Representative shall, during the Time for
which be appointed to any civil Office under the Authority of the United States
which shall have passed the House of Representatives and the Senate, Every Bill
which it shall have originated, who shall enter the Objections to that House in
which it shall be sent, together with the Objections, to the other House, by
which Case it shall not be a Law. prevent its Return, in
which the Concurrence of the Senate and Every Order, Resolution, or Vote to
which the Same shall be, for the Erection of of the Legislature of the State in
which shall be necessary and proper for carrying into To make all Laws
which the State may be entitled in the Congress: but no Senator or to
which List they shall sign and certify, and of the Number of Votes for each;
which they shall give their Votes; which Day shall be the same throughout the
which Day shall be the same throughout the which they shall give their Votes;
which shall neither be increased nor diminished during the Period for which he
which he which shall neither be increased nor diminished during the Period for
which shall be established by Law: but the Congress otherwise provided for, and
which shall expire at the End the Recess of the Senate, by granting Commissions
which shall not be diminished during their their Services a Compensation
which this Constitution, the Laws of the United States, and Treaties made, or
which the United States shall be a Party; to Jurisdiction; to Controversies to
which a State shall be Party, the supreme Court shall have original those in
which such Acts, Records and Proceedings shall be Laws prescribe the Manner in
which he fled, be delivered up, to be executive Authority of the State from
which may be made prior to the Year One Congress; Provided that no Amendment
which shall be made in This Constitution, and the Laws of the United States
which shall be made, under the Pursuance thereof; and all Treaties made, or
which district shall have been previously shall have been committed,
which lists they shall sign and certify, and transmit sealed to votes for each,
which shall abridge wherein they reside. No State shall make or enforce any law
which the number of such male citizens shall bear to the whole proportion
which such terms would have ended if this day of January, of the years in
which one who is to declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in
which some other person was elected President more than two years of a term to
which this Article becomes operative from holding the office of within
which the District would be entitled if it were Representatives in Congress to
which, in either Case, shall be valid to all Intents and proposing Amendments,
who shall not have attained to the Age of No Person shall be a Representative
who twenty five Years, and been seven Years a Citizen of the United States, and
who shall not have attained to the Age of thirty No person shall be a Senator
who shall not, Years, and been nine Years a Citizen of the United States, and
who shall enter the Objections to that House in which it shall have originated,
who have such Majority, and Electors appointed; and if there be more than one
who have equal Votes, the Senate shall choose from should remain two or more
who shall not of President; neither shall any Person be eligible to that Office
who shall A Person charged in any State with Treason, Felony, or other Crime,
who shall then act as President, or the manner in which one who is to declaring
who is to declaring who shall then act as President, or the manner in which one
who has held the office of President, or acted as President, for and no person
who may Article was proposed by the Congress, and shall not prevent any person
who shall take office upon President shall nominate a Vice President
who are eighteen years of age or 1. The right of citizens of the United States,
who, having previously taken an oath, as a United States, or under any State,
whole Number of free Persons, which shall be determined by adding to the
whole Number of Senators and Representatives a Number of Electors, equal to the
whole Number of shall be the President, if such Number be a Majority of the
whole number of Electors President, if such number be a majority of the
whole number of Electors Vice-President, if such number be a majority of the
whole number of Senators, and a purpose shall consist of two-thirds of the
whole number shall be necessary to a choice. But no person majority of the
whole number of persons in each State, their respective numbers, counting the
whole proportion which the number of such male citizens shall bear to the
whole number of Senators and President and Vice President equal to the
whom one at least shall not lie an Inhabitant of the same State persons, of
whom such Service or Labour may be due. of the Party to
whom the House of Representatives may choose a President whenever persons from
whom the Senate may choose a Vice President death of any of the persons from
whom, at least, shall not be an inhabitant President and Vice-President, one of
whose Appointments are not herein and all other Officers of the United States,
will not admit of delay. invaded, or in such imminent Danger as
will faithfully execute the Office of "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I
will to the best of my Ability, preserve, President of the United States, and
William Samuel Johnson, Roger Sherman Connecticut -
William Livingston, David Brearley, William Paterson, Jonathan New Jersey -
William Paterson, Jonathan New Jersey - William Livingston, David Brearley,
William Blount, Richard Dobbs Spaight, Hugh Williamson North Carolina -
William Few, Abraham Baldwin Georgia -
William Jackson, Secretary Attest:
Williamson North Carolina - William Blount, Richard Dobbs Spaight, Hugh
Wilson, Gouvernour Morris Thomas Fitzsimons, Jared Ingersoll, James
with the Concurrence of two-thirds, expel a Member. disorderly Behavior, and,
with Amendments as on other Bills. but the Senate may propose or concur
with his States; If he approve he shall sign it, but if not he shall return it,
with the Objections, to the other House, by which it shall be sent, together
with foreign Nations, and among the several States, and To regulate Commerce
with the Indian Tribes;
with another State, or with a foreign Power, or engage in War, unless actually
with a foreign Power, or engage in War, unless actually with another State, or
with the Vice-President chosen for the same Term, be elected, as follows:
with themselves. And they shall make a List of all the Persons voted for, and
with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, to make He shall have Power, by and
with the Advice and Consent of the Senate, shall appoint nominate, and by and
with Houses, or either of them, and in Case of Disagreement between them,
with such Exceptions, and have appellate Jurisdiction, both as to Law and Fact,
with Treason, Felony, or other Crime, who shall A Person charged in any State
with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory accusation; to be confronted
with themselves; they shall name in their ballots the person of the same state
within this Union, according to their respective Numbers, which may be included
within three Years after the first Meeting The actual Enumeration shall be made
within every subsequent Term of ten of the Congress of the United States, and
within ten Days (Sundays any Bill shall not be returned by the President
within the United States. Resident
within that Period any other shall have been elected, and he shall not receive
within any State, the Trial shall be at such committed; but when not committed
within the Jurisdiction of any other State; nor any shall be formed or erected
within the United whereof the party shall have been duly convicted, shall exist
within its jurisdiction the equal protection of the law; nor deny to any person
within seven years from the date of the provided in the Constitution,
within seven years from the date of its submission. several States
within seven years from the date of the submission hereof in the Constitution,
within which this Article becomes operative from holding the office of
within seven years from the date of its submission to the States several States
within four days to the President pro tempore of the Senate and the transmit
within forty eight hours for that Congress shall decide the issue, assembling
within twenty one days after purpose if not in session. If the Congress,
within twenty one days after Congress is required to assemble, determines by
within, the importation thereof into, or transportation of intoxicating liquors
without the Concurrence of two thirds of the Members present. convicted
without the Consent of Neither House, during the Session of Congress, shall,
without the Consent of holding any Office of Profit or Trust under them, shall,
without the Consent of the Congress, lay any Imposts or Duties No State shall,
without the Consent of Congress, lay any duty of Tonnage, keep No State shall,
without the Consent of the Legislatures of the States concerned as well as of
without its Consent, shall be deprived of its equal Suffrage in the Senate.
without the No Soldier shall, in time of peace be quartered in any house,
without due process of law; nor shall private property be liberty, or property,
without just compensation. taken for public use,
without due process of State deprive any person of life, liberty, or property,
without apportionment among the several States, and whatever source derived,
without regard to any census or enumeration.
Witness whereof We have hereunto subscribed our Names. Twelfth. In
witness against himself, nor be deprived of life, criminal case to be a
Witnesses to the shall be convicted of Treason unless on the Testimony of two
witnesses against him; to have compulsory accusation; to be confronted with the
witnesses in his favor, and to have the Assistance of process for obtaining
work Corruption of Blood, or Forfeiture except Attainder of Treason shall
would have ended if this day of January, of the years in which such terms
would be entitled if it were Representatives in Congress to which the District
Writ of Habeas Corpus shall not be suspended, unless when The privilege of the
writing, of the Service of the United States; he may require the Opinion, in
Writings Times to Authors and Inventors the exclusive Right to their respective
Writs of Election to fill such Vacancies. Authority thereof shall issue
writs of election to fill such executive authority of such State shall issue
written declaration that he and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his
written declaration to the contrary, such powers and duties transmits to them a
written declaration that the President is the House of Representatives their
written declaration Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives his
written declaration that the Speaker of the House of Representatives their
written declaration, or, if Congress is not in session, receipt of the latter
Year by the People of the several States, and the Electors in each State shall
Year one thousand eight hundred and eight, but a tax or duty may be imposed the
Year One Congress; Provided that no Amendment which may be made prior to the
Year of our Lord one thousand seven hundred Seventeenth Day of September in the
year from the ratification of this article the manufacture, sale, 1. After one
Year, of the second Class at the Expiration of the fourth Year, and of the
Year, and of the Year, of the second Class at the Expiration of the fourth
Year, so that one third may be third Class at the Expiration of the sixth
Year, and such Meeting shall The Congress shall assemble at least once in every
year, and such meeting 2. The Congress shall assemble at least once in every
Year; and if Vacancies happen by Resignation, or otherwise, chosen every second
Years a Citizen of the United States, and who twenty five Years, and been seven
Years after the first Meeting The actual Enumeration shall be made within three
Years a Citizen of the United States, and who shall not, Years, and been nine
Years a have attained to the Age of thirty-five Years, and been fourteen
years of age, and citizens of the inhabitants of such State, being twenty-one
years of age in such State. number of male citizens twenty-one
years from the date of the provided in the Constitution, within seven
years in which such terms would have ended if this day of January, of the
years from the date of its submission. several States within seven
years from the date of the submission hereof in the Constitution, within seven
years of a term to which some other person was elected President more than two
years from the date of its submission to the States several States within seven
years of age or 1. The right of citizens of the United States, who are eighteen
Years, and been seven Years a Citizen of the United States, and who twenty five
Years, and excluding Indians not including those bound to Service for a Term of
Years, in such Manner as they shall by Law direct. The Number of
Years, and been nine Years a Citizen of the United States, and who shall not,
Years, and, together America. He shall hold his Office during the Term of four
Years, and been fourteen Years a have attained to the Age of thirty-five
Years; and each Senator shall State, chosen by the Legislature thereof, for six
Years; for a longer Term than two
years; and each Senator shall State, elected by the people thereof, for six
Yeas and Nays of the Members of either House on any question Secrecy; and the
Yeas and Nays, and the Names of the Persons voting for and determined by
York six, New Jersey four, Pennsylvania eight, Delaware one, Maryland five, New
York - Alexander Hamilton New
